New Mexico, session 2026, SB240.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF NEW MEXICO:
SECTION 1. SEVERANCE TAX BONDS--AUTHORIZATIONS--
APPROPRIATION OF PROCEEDS.--
A. The state board of finance may issue and sell
severance tax bonds in compliance with the Severance Tax
Bonding Act in an amount not to exceed the total of the
amounts authorized for purposes specified in this act. The
state board of finance shall schedule the issuance and sale
of the bonds in the most expeditious and economical manner
possible upon a finding by the board that the project has
been developed sufficiently to justify the issuance and that
the project can proceed to contract within a reasonable time. SFC/SB 240
Page 1

The state board of finance shall further take the appropriate
steps necessary to comply with the federal Internal Revenue
Code of 1986, as amended. Proceeds from the sale of the
bonds are appropriated for the purposes specified in this
act.
B. The agencies named in this act shall certify to
the state board of finance when the money from the proceeds
of the severance tax bonds appropriated in this section is
needed for the purposes specified in the applicable section
of this act. If an agency has not certified the need for
severance tax bond proceeds for a particular project by the
end of fiscal year 2028, the authorization for that project
is void.
C. Before an agency may certify for the need of
severance tax bond proceeds, the project must be developed
sufficiently so that the agency reasonably expects to:
(1) incur within six months after the

applicable bond proceeds are available for the project a

substantial binding obligation to a third party to expend at

least five percent of the bond proceeds for the project; and

(2) spend at least eighty-five percent of

the bond proceeds within three years after the applicable

bond proceeds are available for the project.

D. Except as otherwise specifically provided by

law:
SFC/SB 240
Page 2

(1) the unexpended balance from the proceeds
of severance tax bonds appropriated in this act for a project
shall revert to the severance tax bonding fund no later than
the following dates:
(a) for a project for which severance
tax bond proceeds were appropriated to match federal grants,
six months after completion of the project;
(b) for a project for which severance
tax bond proceeds were appropriated to purchase vehicles,
including emergency vehicles and other vehicles that require
special equipment; heavy equipment; books; educational
technology; or other equipment or furniture that is not
related to a more inclusive construction or renovation
project, at the end of the fiscal year two years following
the fiscal year in which the severance tax bond proceeds were
made available for the purchase; and
(c) for any other project for which

severance tax bonds were appropriated, within six months of

completion of the project, but no later than the end of

fiscal year 2030; and

(2) all remaining balances from the proceeds

of severance tax bonds appropriated for a project in this act

shall revert to the severance tax bonding fund three months

after the latest reversion date specified for that type of

project in Paragraph (1) of this subsection.
SFC/SB 240
Page 3

E. Except for appropriations to the capital
program fund, money from severance tax bond proceeds provided
pursuant to this act shall not be used to pay indirect
project costs.
F. Except for a project that was originally funded
using a tax-exempt loan or bond issue, a project involving
repayment of debt previously incurred shall be funded through
the issuance of taxable severance tax bonds with a term that
does not extend beyond the fiscal year in which they are
issued.
G. Money that is appropriated from the proceeds of
severance tax bonds pursuant to this act shall not be subject
to a binding written agreement with a third party prior to
the authorized state agency's approval to enter into that
agreement.
H. For the purposes of this section, "unexpended
balance" means the remainder of an appropriation after

reserving for unpaid costs and expenses subject to a binding

written agreement with a third party.

SECTION 2. GENERAL FUND APPROPRIATIONS--LIMITATIONS--

REVERSIONS.--

A. Except as otherwise specifically provided by

law, the general fund appropriations made pursuant to this

act may be expended in fiscal years 2027 through 2030;

provided that the unexpended balance of an appropriation made
SFC/SB 240
Page 4

in this act from the general fund shall revert to the general
fund:
(1) no later than September 30 following:
(a) the end of fiscal year 2028 for a
project for which an appropriation was made to purchase
vehicles, including emergency vehicles and other vehicles
that require special equipment; heavy equipment; books;
educational technology; or other equipment or furniture that
is not related to a more inclusive construction or renovation
project; or
(b) the end of fiscal year 2030 for a
project for which an appropriation was made related to an
inclusive construction or renovation project; or
(2) within six months of completion of the
project for any other project for which an appropriation was
made, but no later than the end of fiscal year 2030.
B. The agencies named in this act shall certify to

the department of finance and administration that the money

appropriated in this act is needed for the purposes specified

in the applicable section of this act. If an agency has not

certified the need for the appropriation for a particular

project by the end of fiscal year 2028, the authorization for

that project is void.

C. Money that is appropriated from the general

fund pursuant to this act shall not be subject to a binding
SFC/SB 240
Page 5

written agreement with a third party prior to the authorized
state agency's approval to enter into that agreement.
D. For the purposes of this section, "unexpended
balance" means the remainder of an appropriation after
reserving for unpaid costs and expenses subject to a binding
written agreement with a third party.
SECTION 3. FUND APPROPRIATIONS OTHER THAN GENERAL
FUND--LIMITATIONS--REVERSIONS.--
A. Except as otherwise specifically provided by
law, the appropriations made pursuant to this act from funds
other than the general fund may be expended in fiscal years
2027 through 2030; provided that:
(1) the unexpended balance of an
appropriation made in this act from a fund other than the
general fund shall revert to the originating fund no later
than the following dates:
(a) for a project for which an

appropriation was made to match federal grants, six months

after completion of the project;

(b) for a project for which an

appropriation was made to purchase vehicles, including

emergency vehicles and other vehicles that require special

equipment; heavy equipment; books; educational technology; or

other equipment or furniture that is not related to a more

inclusive construction or renovation project, at the end of
SFC/SB 240
Page 6

the fiscal year two years following the fiscal year in which
the appropriation was made for the purchase; and
(c) for any other project for which an
appropriation was made, within six months of completion of
the project, but no later than the end of fiscal year 2030;
and
(2) all remaining balances from an
appropriation made in this act for a project shall revert
three months after the latest reversion date specified for
that type of project in Paragraph (1) of this subsection.
B. Except for appropriations to the capital
program fund, money from appropriations made in this act
shall not be used to pay indirect project costs.
C. Money that is appropriated from a fund other
than the general fund pursuant to this act shall not be
subject to a binding written agreement with a third party
prior to the authorized state agency's approval to enter into

that agreement.

D. For the purposes of this section, "unexpended

balance" means the remainder of an appropriation after

reserving for unpaid costs and expenses subject to a binding

written agreement with a third party.

SECTION 4. ADMINISTRATIVE OFFICE OF THE COURTS

PROJECT--SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--Pursuant to the provisions of

Section 1 of this act, upon certification by the
SFC/SB 240
Page 7

administrative office of the courts that the need exists for
the issuance of the bonds, seventeen million dollars
($17,000,000) is appropriated to the administrative office of
the courts to plan, design, construct, replace, furnish and
equip improvements to magistrate courts statewide, including
up to six million five hundred thousand dollars ($6,500,000)
for a magistrate court in Sandoval county, up to ten million
dollars ($10,000,000) for a magistrate court in Cibola county
and at least five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) for
emergency repairs and small projects statewide.
SECTION 5. BERNALILLO COUNTY METROPOLITAN COURT
PROJECT--SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--Pursuant to the provisions of
Section 1 of this act, upon certification by the Bernalillo
county metropolitan court that the need exists for the
issuance of the bonds, one million eight hundred thousand
dollars ($1,800,000) is appropriated to the Bernalillo county
metropolitan court to plan, design, construct, furnish and

equip improvements to escalators at the Bernalillo county

metropolitan court in Albuquerque in Bernalillo county.

SECTION 6. CAPITAL PROGRAM FUND PROJECTS--SEVERANCE TAX

BONDS.--Pursuant to the provisions of Section 1 of this act,

upon certification by the facilities management division of

the general services department that the need exists for the

issuance of the bonds, the following amounts are appropriated

to the capital program fund for the following purposes:
SFC/SB 240
Page 8

1. nine hundred thousand dollars ($900,000) to
plan, design, construct, furnish and equip improvements to a
state-owned building in White Rock in Los Alamos county;
2. seventy-five million dollars ($75,000,000) to
plan, design, construct, furnish and equip a forensic unit at
the New Mexico behavioral health institute at Las Vegas in
San Miguel county;
3. ninety-five million dollars ($95,000,000) to
plan, design, construct, furnish and equip a new executive
office building in Santa Fe in Santa Fe county;
4. three million dollars ($3,000,000) to plan,
design, construct, furnish and equip improvements to
correctional facilities statewide;
5. five million fifty thousand dollars
($5,050,000) to plan, design, construct, furnish and equip
improvements to state-owned facilities statewide;
6. two million five hundred thousand dollars

($2,500,000) to plan, design, construct, furnish and equip a

new facility for the New Mexico state police in Grants in

Cibola county;

7. two million dollars ($2,000,000) to plan,

design, construct, furnish and equip improvements to veteran

cemeteries and memorials statewide;

8. one million five hundred thousand dollars

($1,500,000) to plan, design, construct, renovate, repair,
SFC/SB 240
Page 9

furnish and equip improvements to job centers statewide;
9. five million dollars ($5,000,000) to plan,
design, construct, renovate, equip, furnish and make
improvements to the Mora county courthouse in Mora in Mora
county;
10. ten million dollars ($10,000,000) to plan,
design, construct, furnish and equip an emergency operations
center for the homeland security and emergency management
department in Santa Fe in Santa Fe county; and
11. two million five hundred thousand dollars
($2,500,000) to plan, design, renovate, furnish and equip an
analytical laboratory for testing for per- and
polyfluoroalkyl substances and other emerging environmental
contaminants in Albuquerque in Bernalillo county.
SECTION 7. COURT OF APPEALS PROJECT--SEVERANCE TAX
BONDS.--Pursuant to the provisions of Section 1 of this act,
upon certification by the court of appeals that the need

exists for the issuance of the bonds, one million two hundred

thousand dollars ($1,200,000) is appropriated to the court of

appeals to plan, design, construct, furnish and equip

improvements to the court of appeals building in Albuquerque

in Bernalillo county.

SECTION 8. CULTURAL AFFAIRS DEPARTMENT PROJECT--

SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--Pursuant to the provisions of Section 1

of this act, upon certification by the cultural affairs
SFC/SB 240
Page 10

department that the need exists for the issuance of the
bonds, three million dollars ($3,000,000) is appropriated to
the cultural affairs department to plan, design, construct,
furnish and equip improvements to sites and facilities at
museums, monuments, historic sites and cultural facilities
statewide.
SECTION 9. CUMBRES AND TOLTEC SCENIC RAILROAD
COMMISSION PROJECT--SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--Pursuant to the
provisions of Section 1 of this act, upon certification by
the Cumbres and Toltec scenic railroad commission that the
need exists for the issuance of the bonds, two million
dollars ($2,000,000) is appropriated to the Cumbres and
Toltec scenic railroad commission to plan, design, construct,
furnish and equip improvements to tracks and related
infrastructure, including the Cumbres pass pavilion, and to
passenger cars used by the Cumbres and Toltec scenic railroad
between New Mexico and Colorado.

SECTION 10. SECOND JUDICIAL DISTRICT COURT PROJECT--

SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--Pursuant to the provisions of Section 1

of this act, upon certification by the second judicial

district court that the need exists for the issuance of the

bonds, seven hundred fifty thousand dollars ($750,000) is

appropriated to the second judicial district court to plan,

design, construct, furnish and equip improvements to the

second judicial district court in Albuquerque in Bernalillo
SFC/SB 240
Page 11

county.
SECTION 11. ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT DEPARTMENT PROJECT--
SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--Pursuant to the provisions of Section 1
of this act, upon certification by the economic development
department that the need exists for the issuance of the
bonds, five million dollars ($5,000,000) is appropriated to
the economic development department to plan, design,
construct, furnish and equip main street and arts and
cultural districts statewide.
SECTION 12. HIGHER EDUCATION DEPARTMENT PROJECT--
SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--Pursuant to the provisions of Section 1
of this act, upon certification by the higher education
department that the need exists for the issuance of the
bonds, ten million dollars ($10,000,000) is appropriated to
the higher education department to plan, design, construct,
equip and furnish early child care facilities and
instructional laboratories, including outdoor spaces, at

higher education institutions statewide.

SECTION 13. PUBLIC EDUCATION DEPARTMENT PROJECTS--

SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--Pursuant to the provisions of Section 1

of this act, upon certification by the public education

department that the need exists for the issuance of the

bonds, the following amounts are appropriated to the public

education department for the following purposes:

1. one million dollars ($1,000,000) to plan,
SFC/SB 240
Page 12

design, construct, furnish and equip a suite of science,
technology, engineering and mathematics classrooms and
learning commons at East Mountain high school in the
Albuquerque public school district in Bernalillo county; and
2. three million dollars ($3,000,000) to plan,
design and construct a career and technical education center,
including training spaces and classrooms, at Rio Grande
preparatory institute in the Las Cruces public school
district in Dona Ana county.
SECTION 14. ENERGY, MINERALS AND NATURAL RESOURCES
DEPARTMENT PROJECTS--SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--Pursuant to the
provisions of Section 1 of this act, upon certification by
the energy, minerals and natural resources department that
the need exists for the issuance of the bonds, the following
amounts are appropriated to the energy, minerals and natural
resources department for the following purposes:
1. thirteen million dollars ($13,000,000) to

purchase vehicles and to plan, design, construct, furnish and

equip a wildfire response facility for the forestry division

in Santa Fe in Santa Fe county and for forestry division

facilities statewide;

2. twenty million dollars ($20,000,000) to plan,

design, construct, furnish and equip improvements to state

parks, including restrooms and infrastructure, statewide; and

3. seven million five hundred thousand dollars
SFC/SB 240
Page 13

($7,500,000) to plan, design and construct watershed
restoration and community wildfire protection improvements,
including forest thinning, statewide.
SECTION 15. OFFICE OF THE STATE ENGINEER PROJECTS--
SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--Pursuant to the provisions of Section 1
of this act, upon certification by the office of the state
engineer that the need exists for the issuance of the bonds,
the following amounts are appropriated to the office of the
state engineer for the following purposes:
1. one million dollars ($1,000,000) to plan,
design, construct and equip improvements to infrastructure
and the shoreline at Ute reservoir in Quay county;
2. one million dollars ($1,000,000) to plan,
design and construct river channel improvements above
Elephant Butte dam statewide; and
3. one million five hundred thousand dollars
($1,500,000) to plan, design, construct and equip

improvements at the office of the state engineer's water

measurement and metering facilities statewide.

SECTION 16. DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENT PROJECTS--

SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--Pursuant to the provisions of Section 1

of this act, upon certification by the department of

environment that the need exists for the issuance of the

bonds, the following amounts are appropriated to the

department of environment for the following purposes:
SFC/SB 240
Page 14

1. one million five hundred thousand dollars
($1,500,000) to plan, design, construct, equip and improve
wastewater systems, including a wastewater treatment plant
and infrastructure, in Lovington in Lea county;
2. two million five hundred thousand dollars
($2,500,000) to acquire property, easements and rights of way
for and to plan, design, construct and equip sewer line
improvements in Ruidoso in Lincoln county;
3. one million five hundred thousand dollars
($1,500,000) to acquire property and easements for and to
plan, design, construct, improve and equip water, wastewater
and effluent systems in Pecos in San Miguel county;
4. one million dollars ($1,000,000) to plan,
design, construct and equip water lines and distribution
systems for fire suppression in Corrales in Sandoval county;
5. five hundred ninety thousand dollars ($590,000)
to plan, design, construct and equip a septage receiving

station in Taos in Taos county; and

6. ten million dollars ($10,000,000) to plan,

design, construct, equip and improve the wastewater treatment

plant, including a clarifier and sludge processing system, in

Bosque Farms in Valencia county.

SECTION 17. STATE FAIR COMMISSION PROJECT--SEVERANCE

TAX BONDS.--Pursuant to the provisions of Section 1 of this

act, upon certification by the state fair commission that the
SFC/SB 240
Page 15

need exists for the issuance of the bonds, one million five
hundred thousand dollars ($1,500,000) is appropriated to the
state fair commission to plan, design, construct, furnish and
equip improvements to facilities at the state fairgrounds in
Albuquerque in Bernalillo county.
SECTION 18. INDIAN AFFAIRS DEPARTMENT PROJECTS--
SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--Pursuant to the provisions of Section 1
of this act, upon certification by the Indian affairs
department that the need exists for the issuance of the
bonds, the following amounts are appropriated to the Indian
affairs department for the following purposes:
1. one million dollars ($1,000,000) to plan,
design, construct, repair, equip and improve public entrances
at the Indian pueblo cultural center in Albuquerque in
Bernalillo county;
2. three million two hundred thirty thousand
dollars ($3,230,000) to plan, design, construct, equip and

improve parks and playgrounds in the Pueblo of Laguna in

Cibola county;

3. two million five hundred thousand dollars

($2,500,000) to plan, design, construct, furnish and equip an

emergency management building for the Mescalero Apache Tribe

in Otero county;

4. two million dollars ($2,000,000) to plan,

design, construct and renovate a fire station in the Pueblo
SFC/SB 240
Page 16

of Santa Clara in Rio Arriba county;
5. four million dollars ($4,000,000) to plan,
design, construct, furnish and equip a science, technology,
engineering, arts and mathematics facility and to improve
other facilities at Navajo preparatory school in Farmington
in San Juan county;
6. forty thousand dollars ($40,000) to plan,
design, construct and improve community spaces in the Pueblo
of Jemez in Sandoval county;
7. four million dollars ($4,000,000) to plan,
design, construct, repair, renovate, furnish and equip the
performing arts and career center amphitheater at the Santa
Fe Indian school in Santa Fe county; and
8. four million dollars ($4,000,000) for site
preparation, to acquire a building and to plan, design,
construct, furnish and equip a community wellness facility,
including utility infrastructure, in the Pueblo of Picuris in

Taos county.

SECTION 19. DEPARTMENT OF INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY

PROJECT--SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--Pursuant to the provisions of

Section 1 of this act, upon certification by the department

of information technology that the need exists for the

issuance of the bonds, twenty million dollars ($20,000,000)

is appropriated to the department of information technology

to plan, design, purchase, construct and equip infrastructure
SFC/SB 240
Page 17

to stabilize and modernize public safety radio communications
systems statewide.
SECTION 20. INTERSTATE STREAM COMMISSION PROJECT--
SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--Pursuant to the provisions of Section 1
of this act, upon certification by the interstate stream
commission that the need exists for the issuance of the
bonds, one million two hundred thousand dollars ($1,200,000)
is appropriated to the interstate stream commission to plan,
design, construct, equip and install irrigation water control
improvements to the Hillside irrigation ditch adjacent to
county road 1115 in San Juan county.
SECTION 21. DEPARTMENT OF FINANCE AND ADMINISTRATION
PROJECT--SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--Pursuant to the provisions of
Section 1 of this act, upon certification by the department
of finance and administration that the need exists for the
issuance of the bonds, five million dollars ($5,000,000) is
appropriated to the department of finance and administration

to plan, design, construct, furnish and equip critical

infrastructure, buildings and building systems owned and

operated by local public bodies and to purchase, install and

equip vehicles and equipment that are essential for public

safety statewide.

SECTION 22. LOCAL GOVERNMENT DIVISION OF THE DEPARTMENT

OF FINANCE AND ADMINISTRATION PROJECTS--SEVERANCE TAX

BONDS.--Pursuant to the provisions of Section 1 of this act,
SFC/SB 240
Page 18

upon certification by the local government division of the
department of finance and administration that the need exists
for the issuance of the bonds, the following amounts are
appropriated to the local government division of the
department of finance and administration for the following
purposes:
1. five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) to
plan, design, construct, equip, install, renovate and improve
Los Altos park in Albuquerque in Bernalillo county;
2. nine hundred thirty thousand dollars ($930,000)
to acquire land for and to plan, design, construct, equip and
furnish phase 3 and 4 improvements to the Edward C. Sandoval
north valley baseball complex, including lighting, in
Albuquerque in Bernalillo county;
3. six hundred thousand dollars ($600,000) to
plan, design, construct, furnish and equip the old village
hall revitalization project in Los Ranchos de Albuquerque in

Bernalillo county;

4. four hundred forty thousand dollars ($440,000)

to plan, design, construct and equip a cultural plaza

facility in Chaves county;

5. two million dollars ($2,000,000) to plan,

design, construct, renovate, repair and equip improvements to

the swimming pool in Milan in Cibola county;

6. three million dollars ($3,000,000) to construct
SFC/SB 240
Page 19

and improve a parking lot at the county fairgrounds in Clovis
in Curry county;
7. three million dollars ($3,000,000) to plan,
design, construct, replace and improve city parks, including
playgrounds, shelters, bathrooms, lighting, ball fields,
fencing and irrigation systems, in Clovis in Curry county;
8. three million dollars ($3,000,000) to plan,
design, construct, equip and improve Apodaca park, an aquatic
playground and multi-use trails in Las Cruces in Dona Ana
county;
9. one million five hundred ten thousand dollars
($1,510,000) to plan, design, construct, equip and furnish
the soccer and football fields at the municipal complex in
Sunland Park in Dona Ana county;
10. five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) to
plan, design, construct, equip and improve tennis courts in
Artesia in Eddy county;

11. seven hundred seventy thousand dollars

($770,000) to plan, design, construct, furnish and equip

improvements to the Chris B. Cordova veterans' memorial park

in Mosquero in Harding county;

12. eight hundred thousand dollars ($800,000) to

plan, design, construct, furnish, equip and improve the Short

park softball field in Lordsburg in Hidalgo county;

13. five hundred seventy thousand dollars
SFC/SB 240
Page 20

($570,000) to plan, design, construct, furnish and equip the
baseball fields and other park improvements in Carrizozo in
Lincoln county;
14. one million dollars ($1,000,000) to purchase,
replace and install artificial turf at the Joe Vargas
veterans memorial complex in Gallup in McKinley county;
15. three million dollars ($3,000,000) to plan,
design, construct, renovate and equip improvements to the Red
Rock park concessions facility in Gallup in McKinley county;
16. three million five hundred thousand dollars
($3,500,000) to plan, design, construct, renovate, furnish
and equip the county detention center in Rio Arriba county;
17. six hundred ten thousand dollars ($610,000) to
plan, design, construct and equip a park in Cuba in Sandoval
county;
18. eight hundred ninety thousand dollars
($890,000) to plan, design, construct, furnish and equip

improvements to the Pena Blanca community center in Pena

Blanca in Sandoval county;

19. one million seven hundred thousand dollars

($1,700,000) to plan, design and construct a youth baseball

field and associated amenities at the Rio Rancho sports

complex north in Rio Rancho in Sandoval county;

20. one million dollars ($1,000,000) to plan,

design, construct and improve the plaza and downtown Santa Fe
SFC/SB 240
Page 21

in Santa Fe county;
21. six hundred twenty thousand dollars ($620,000)
to plan, design, construct, equip and improve parks in Truth
or Consequences in Sierra county;
22. seven hundred ninety thousand dollars
($790,000) to plan, design, construct, furnish, equip and
improve the rodeo complex in Socorro in Socorro county;
23. three hundred ten thousand dollars ($310,000)
to provide urgent or emergency funding for infrastructure and
equipment needs statewide;
24. three million dollars ($3,000,000) to plan,
design, construct, equip and furnish an acute care hospital
in Valencia county; and
25. one million dollars ($1,000,000) to plan,
design, construct the skate park in Belen in Valencia county.
SECTION 23. DEPARTMENT OF MILITARY AFFAIRS PROJECT--
SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--Pursuant to the provisions of Section 1

of this act, upon certification by the department of military

affairs that the need exists for the issuance of the bonds,

two million dollars ($2,000,000) is appropriated to the

department of military affairs to plan, design, construct,

furnish and equip improvements to readiness centers, staging

areas and challenge program properties statewide.

SECTION 24. SECRETARY OF STATE PROJECT--SEVERANCE TAX

BONDS.--Pursuant to the provisions of Section 1 of this act,
SFC/SB 240
Page 22

upon certification by the secretary of state that the need
exists for the issuance of the bonds, six million dollars
($6,000,000) is appropriated to the secretary of state to
purchase, equip and install tabulators and other election
equipment statewide.
SECTION 25. SPACEPORT AUTHORITY PROJECT--SEVERANCE TAX
BONDS.--Pursuant to the provisions of Section 1 of this act,
upon certification by the spaceport authority that the need
exists for the issuance of the bonds, four million dollars
($4,000,000) is appropriated to the spaceport authority to
plan, design, construct, furnish and equip infrastructure
improvements to runways and facilities at spaceport America
in Sierra county.
SECTION 26. SUPREME COURT BUILDING COMMISSION PROJECT--
SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--Pursuant to the provisions of Section 1
of this act, upon certification by the supreme court building
commission that the need exists for the issuance of the

bonds, four million dollars ($4,000,000) is appropriated to

the supreme court building commission to plan, design,

construct, repair, furnish, equip and improve the basement of

the supreme court building in Santa Fe in Santa Fe county.

SECTION 27. TAXATION AND REVENUE DEPARTMENT PROJECT--

SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--Pursuant to the provisions of Section 1

of this act, upon certification by the taxation and revenue

department that the need exists for the issuance of the
SFC/SB 240
Page 23

bonds, two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000) is
appropriated to the taxation and revenue department to
purchase, equip and install a scanning machine for the
taxation and revenue department in Santa Fe county.
SECTION 28. DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION PROJECTS--
SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--Pursuant to the provisions of Section 1
of this act, upon certification by the department of
transportation that the need exists for the issuance of the
bonds, the following amounts are appropriated to the
department of transportation for the following purposes:
1. four million nine hundred thousand dollars
($4,900,000) to acquire easements and rights of way for and
to plan, design, construct and equip improvements to the
Canal street bridge area, including canal syphons, drainage,
streets and sidewalks, in Hatch in Dona Ana county;
2. two million five hundred thousand dollars
($2,500,000) to plan, design, construct and repair streets in

the Pinecliff, Pinecrest, Pine Lodge and Innsbrook Village

subdivisions and on Eagle drive and Country Club drive in

Ruidoso in Lincoln county;

3. one million dollars ($1,000,000) to plan,

design, construct and improve interstate 10, including exit

ramps, in Deming in Luna county;

4. two million five hundred thousand dollars

($2,500,000) to plan, design and construct a landfill access
SFC/SB 240
Page 24

road near 29th avenue NW and Encino road in Sandoval county;
5. two million five hundred thousand dollars
($2,500,000) to plan, design, construct, improve and extend a
road noise mitigation project on New Mexico highway 285 north
of Santa Fe in Santa Fe county; and
6. five million dollars ($5,000,000) to plan,
design, construct and equip electric vehicle infrastructure
statewide.
SECTION 29. BOARD OF REGENTS OF EASTERN NEW MEXICO
UNIVERSITY PROJECT--SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--Pursuant to the
provisions of Section 1 of this act, upon certification by
the board of regents of eastern New Mexico university that
the need exists for the issuance of the bonds, one million
three hundred thousand dollars ($1,300,000) is appropriated
to the board of regents of eastern New Mexico university to
plan, design, construct and equip improvements, including
sidewalks, infrastructure and parking lots, at the Roswell

branch campus of eastern New Mexico university in Roswell in

Chaves county.

SECTION 30. BOARD OF REGENTS OF THE NEW MEXICO

INSTITUTE OF MINING AND TECHNOLOGY PROJECT--SEVERANCE TAX

BONDS.--Pursuant to the provisions of Section 1 of this act,

upon certification by the board of regents of the New Mexico

institute of mining and technology that the need exists for

the issuance of the bonds, five hundred thousand dollars
SFC/SB 240
Page 25

($500,000) is appropriated to the board of regents of the
New Mexico institute of mining and technology to plan,
design, construct, furnish and equip an academic laboratory
for evaluating and mitigating artificial-intelligence-enabled
threats to United States critical infrastructure and
advancing artificial intelligence security research at the
New Mexico institute of mining and technology in Socorro,
Hidalgo and Eddy counties.
SECTION 31. BOARD OF REGENTS OF THE UNIVERSITY OF
NEW MEXICO PROJECT--SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--Pursuant to the
provisions of Section 1 of this act, upon certification by
the board of regents of the university of New Mexico that the
need exists for the issuance of the bonds, fifteen million
dollars ($15,000,000) is appropriated to the board of regents
of the university of New Mexico to acquire property for and
to plan, design, construct, equip and furnish clinical
facilities to improve rural access to health care in San

Miguel county.

SECTION 32. BOARD OF REGENTS OF WESTERN NEW MEXICO

UNIVERSITY PROJECT--SEVERANCE TAX BONDS.--Pursuant to the

provisions of Section 1 of this act, upon certification by

the board of regents of western New Mexico university that

the need exists for the issuance of the bonds, one million

dollars ($1,000,000) is appropriated to the board of regents

of western New Mexico university to plan, design, construct,
SFC/SB 240
Page 26

equip, install and furnish improvements to the athletic
fields at western New Mexico university in Silver City in
Grant county.
SECTION 33. AGING AND LONG-TERM SERVICES DEPARTMENT
PROJECTS--GENERAL FUND.--The following amounts are
appropriated from the general fund to the aging and long-term
services department for the following purposes:
1. fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) to plan,
design, construct, repair, improve and equip facilities at
the Bear Canyon senior center in Albuquerque in Bernalillo
county;
2. one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) to
acquire land and rights of way for and to plan, design,
construct and furnish property at Los Volcanes senior center
in Albuquerque in Bernalillo county;
3. four hundred sixty thousand dollars ($460,000)
to purchase and install a backup generator for the elder

center in the Pueblo of Isleta in Bernalillo county;

4. two hundred ten thousand dollars ($210,000) to

plan, design and construct an outdoor fitness area and

pickleball court at the Tijeras senior center in Tijeras in

Bernalillo county;

5. one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) to

plan, design and construct a garden shade structure at a

senior center in Tijeras in Bernalillo county;
SFC/SB 240
Page 27

6. seventy thousand dollars ($70,000) to purchase
and equip a transit van for a senior athletics program in
Roswell in Chaves county;
7. one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000)
to purchase and equip a truck and utility trailer, including
towing accessories, for a senior athletics program in Roswell
in Chaves county;
8. three hundred seventy thousand dollars
($370,000) to plan, design, construct, furnish and equip a
senior health care center in the Pueblo of Laguna in Cibola
county;
9. fifty-five thousand dollars ($55,000) to
purchase, equip and install kitchen equipment and security
cameras for a senior center in Melrose in Curry county;
10. one hundred twenty thousand dollars ($120,000)
to purchase and equip vehicles for a senior center in Melrose
in Curry county;

11. one million twenty-five thousand dollars

($1,025,000) to acquire property and to plan, design,

construct, repair, replace, expand, improve, equip and

furnish the Eastside senior center in Las Cruces in Dona Ana

county;

12. two hundred thirty thousand dollars ($230,000)

to purchase and equip an accessible van for senior services

in Vaughn in Guadalupe county;
SFC/SB 240
Page 28

13. two hundred twenty-five thousand dollars
($225,000) to plan, design, construct, furnish and make
improvements to a senior center, including a commercial
kitchen, in Harding county;
14. seventy-five thousand dollars ($75,000) to
plan, design, construct and renovate accessibility and
bathrooms at the Eunice senior center in Eunice in Lea
county;
15. eighty-five thousand dollars ($85,000) to
purchase and equip vehicles and meal equipment for the Church
Rock senior center in the Church Rock chapter of the Navajo
Nation in McKinley county;
16. eighty thousand dollars ($80,000) to purchase
and install kitchen and dining equipment for a senior center
in the Coyote Canyon chapter of the Navajo Nation in McKinley
county;
17. one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) to

purchase and equip meal equipment for a senior center in the

Nahodishgish chapter of the Navajo Nation in McKinley county;

18. one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000)

to plan, design, construct, upgrade and improve plumbing at a

senior center in the Pinedale chapter of the Navajo Nation in

McKinley county;

19. one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) to

plan, design, construct and equip a senior center storage
SFC/SB 240
Page 29

building in the Pueblo Pintado chapter of the Navajo Nation
in McKinley county;
20. two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000) to
plan, design, construct, equip and furnish a senior center
for the Tse'Lichii chapter of the Navajo Nation in McKinley
county;
21. one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) to
plan, design, construct, furnish and equip a garage for a
senior center in the Thoreau chapter of the Navajo Nation in
McKinley county;
22. one hundred eighty-five thousand dollars
($185,000) to plan, design, construct, improve, furnish and
equip senior assisted living housing in Espanola in Santa Fe
and Rio Arriba counties;
23. twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) to
purchase and equip a vehicle for senior transportation to
county social services, meal programs and recreational

activities in Alcalde in Rio Arriba county;

24. fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) to plan,

design and construct a water capture and storage system,

including a purification system, for the Coyote senior center

in Coyote in Rio Arriba county;

25. twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) to

purchase and equip vehicles for and to plan, design,

construct, furnish and improve a senior center in the
SFC/SB 240
Page 30

Jicarilla Apache Nation in Dulce in Rio Arriba county;
26. fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) to plan,
design, construct, renovate, purchase, equip and install a
walk-in freezer and refrigerator at El Rito senior center in
El Rito in Rio Arriba county;
27. fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) to purchase
and equip accessible vehicles for the Espanola senior center
in Espanola in Rio Arriba county;
28. twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) to
purchase and equip a meal delivery vehicle for a senior
center in Tierra Amarilla in Rio Arriba county;
29. two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000) to
purchase and equip vehicles for and to plan, design,
construct, expand, equip, furnish and improve the Blanco and
Lower Valley senior centers in San Juan county;
30. one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) to
plan, design, construct, purchase, equip and furnish an

outdoor patio for the Crystal senior center in the Crystal

chapter of the Navajo Nation in San Juan county;

31. two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000)

to plan and design a long-term senior care facility for the

Gadii'ahi/To'Koi chapter of the Navajo Nation in San Juan

county; and

32. twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) to

plan, design, construct, purchase, equip, replace and improve
SFC/SB 240
Page 31

equipment, including walk-in freezers and refrigerators, at
the Ken James senior center in Truth or Consequences in
Sierra county.
SECTION 34. CULTURAL AFFAIRS DEPARTMENT PROJECTS--
GENERAL FUND.--The following amounts are appropriated from
the general fund to the cultural affairs department for the
following purposes:
1. six hundred thirty-five thousand dollars
($635,000) to plan, design, construct, repair, equip and
improve exhibits and facilities at the national Hispanic
cultural center in Albuquerque in Bernalillo county;
2. two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000) to
plan, design, construct, repair, equip and improve exhibits
and facilities at the Bosque Redondo memorial and Fort Sumner
historic site in De Baca county;
3. three hundred fifty thousand dollars ($350,000)
to plan, design, construct, repair, equip and improve

exhibits and facilities at the Fort Selden historic site in

Dona Ana county;

4. four hundred fifty thousand dollars ($450,000)

to plan, design, construct, repair, equip and improve

exhibits and facilities at the Lincoln historic site in

Lincoln county;

5. one million four hundred twenty-seven thousand

dollars ($1,427,000) to plan, design, construct, repair,
SFC/SB 240
Page 32

equip and improve exhibits and facilities at the New Mexico
museum of space history in Alamogordo in Otero county;
6. one hundred eighty-five thousand dollars
($185,000) to plan, design, construct, repair, equip and
improve exhibits and facilities at Los Luceros historic site
in Alcalde in Rio Arriba county;
7. one hundred ninety thousand dollars ($190,000)
to plan, design, construct, repair, equip and improve
exhibits and facilities at the Jemez historic site in
Sandoval county;
8. three hundred fifty thousand dollars ($350,000)
to plan, design, construct, repair, equip and improve
exhibits and facilities at the Coronado historic site in
Bernalillo in Sandoval county;
9. three hundred five thousand dollars ($305,000)
to purchase equipment and to plan, design, construct, repair
and improve exhibits and facilities at the center for

New Mexico archaeology in Santa Fe county;

10. four hundred seventy-five thousand dollars

($475,000) to plan, design, construct, repair, equip and

improve exhibits and facilities at the museum of

international folk art in Santa Fe in Santa Fe county;

11. two hundred fifteen thousand dollars

($215,000) to plan, design, construct, repair, equip and

improve exhibits and facilities at the New Mexico history
SFC/SB 240
Page 33

museum in Santa Fe in Santa Fe county;
12. three hundred seventy-five thousand dollars
($375,000) to plan, design, construct, repair, equip and
improve exhibits and facilities at the New Mexico museum of
art in Santa Fe in Santa Fe county;
13. six hundred seventy-five thousand dollars
($675,000) to plan, design, construct, repair, equip and
improve exhibits and facilities at the museum of Indian arts
and culture in Santa Fe in Santa Fe county;
14. seven hundred twenty-five thousand dollars
($725,000) to plan, design, construct, repair, improve and
equip exhibits, water conservation features and children's
garden amenities at the Santa Fe botanical garden in Santa Fe
county;
15. seven hundred seventy thousand dollars
($770,000) to purchase and install equipment and to plan,
design, construct, improve and equip buildings and grounds,

including accessibility and safety upgrades, at the Santa Fe

children's museum in Santa Fe county;

16. two hundred seventy-five thousand dollars

($275,000) to plan, design, construct, furnish, equip and

improve a contemporary arts and cinema facility, including

theater seating, in Santa Fe in Santa Fe county; and

17. six hundred ten thousand dollars ($610,000) to

plan, design, construct, repair, equip and improve exhibits
SFC/SB 240
Page 34

and facilities at the New Mexico museum of natural history
and science in Albuquerque in Bernalillo county.
SECTION 35. CUMBRES AND TOLTEC SCENIC RAILROAD
COMMISSION PROJECT--GENERAL FUND.--Two hundred eight thousand
dollars ($208,000) is appropriated from the general fund to
the Cumbres and Toltec scenic railroad commission to plan,
design, construct and improve the depot and facilities of the
Cumbres and Toltec scenic railroad in Chama in Rio Arriba
county.
SECTION 36. DISTRICT ATTORNEY OF THE FIRST JUDICIAL
DISTRICT PROJECTS--GENERAL FUND.--The following amounts are
appropriated from the general fund to the district attorney
of the first judicial district for the following purposes:
1. three hundred twenty-five thousand dollars
($325,000) to purchase and equip furniture, cubicles and
information technology for the first judicial district
attorney's office in Santa Fe county; and

2. two hundred twenty-five thousand dollars

($225,000) to purchase and equip vehicles for the first

judicial district attorney's office in Santa Fe county.

SECTION 37. DISTRICT ATTORNEY OF THE SECOND JUDICIAL

DISTRICT PROJECT--GENERAL FUND.--One hundred twenty thousand

dollars ($120,000) is appropriated from the general fund to

the district attorney of the second judicial district to

plan, design, construct, renovate, furnish and equip an annex
SFC/SB 240
Page 35

for the second judicial district attorney's office in
Bernalillo county.
SECTION 38. DISTRICT ATTORNEY OF THE SIXTH JUDICIAL
DISTRICT PROJECT--GENERAL FUND.--Two hundred twenty thousand
dollars ($220,000) is appropriated from the general fund to
the district attorney of the sixth judicial district to
purchase and equip vehicles for the sixth judicial district
attorney's office in Silver City in Grant county.
SECTION 39. THIRD JUDICIAL DISTRICT COURT PROJECT--
GENERAL FUND.--Eight hundred thousand dollars ($800,000) is
appropriated from the general fund to the third judicial
district court to plan, design, construct, equip and expand
the third judicial district court, including court rooms,
judges' chambers and administrative space, in Dona Ana
county.
SECTION 40. EARLY CHILDHOOD EDUCATION AND CARE
DEPARTMENT PROJECTS--GENERAL FUND.--The following amounts are

appropriated from the general fund to the early childhood

education and care department for the following purposes:

1. one million sixty thousand dollars ($1,060,000)

to plan, design, construct, purchase and equip an early

childhood education, family development and child care

facility in Albuquerque in Bernalillo county;

2. three hundred fifteen thousand dollars

($315,000) to plan, design, construct and expand phase 2 of a
SFC/SB 240
Page 36

preschool facility for children and families experiencing
homelessness in Albuquerque in Bernalillo county;
3. four hundred fifty thousand dollars ($450,000)
to plan, design, construct, furnish and equip phase 2 of the
early childhood center building for the region 9 education
cooperative in Ruidoso in Lincoln county; and
4. three hundred seventy thousand dollars
($370,000) to plan, design, construct, renovate, furnish and
equip buildings, facilities and grounds, including
infrastructure, information technology and wiring, at an
early childhood development center in the Santa Fe public
school district in Santa Fe county.
SECTION 41. HIGHER EDUCATION DEPARTMENT PROJECTS--
GENERAL FUND.--The following amounts are appropriated from
the general fund to the higher education department for the
following purposes:
1. eight hundred thirty thousand dollars

($830,000) to plan, design and construct health education

facilities, including information technology and

infrastructure, at all central New Mexico community college

campuses in Bernalillo and Sandoval counties;

2. fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) to plan,

design, construct, equip, improve and install solar parking

and electric vehicle stations, including information

technology and infrastructure, at all central New Mexico
SFC/SB 240
Page 37

community college campuses in Bernalillo and Sandoval
counties;
3. two hundred sixty-five thousand dollars
($265,000) to plan, design, construct and make improvements
to power systems, including uninterruptible power supplies,
grid power conditioning, information technology and
infrastructure, at all central New Mexico community college
campuses in Bernalillo and Sandoval counties;
4. fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) to purchase
and equip simulators for the nursing program at Navajo
technical university in Crownpoint in McKinley county;
5. one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000)
to purchase and equip vehicles for Mesalands community
college in Quay county;
6. two hundred ten thousand dollars ($210,000) to
purchase and equip ambulance training simulators for San Juan
college in San Juan county;

7. one million six hundred ten thousand dollars

($1,610,000) to plan, design, construct, furnish and equip a

class A burn tower for the fire science training program at

San Juan college in Farmington in San Juan county;

8. one million seven hundred twenty-five thousand

dollars ($1,725,000) to purchase and equip well control

training simulators for the school of energy at San Juan

college in Farmington in San Juan county;
SFC/SB 240
Page 38

9. two hundred eighty thousand dollars ($280,000)
to plan, design, construct and equip water system
improvements, including a fire suppression water storage
tank, for the Shiprock agriculture multipurpose center at
Dine college in Shiprock in San Juan county;
10. two million dollars ($2,000,000) to plan,
design, construct and equip an athletic facility in Las Vegas
in San Miguel county;
11. fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) to plan,
design, construct, furnish, equip and improve the campus,
including landscaping, sidewalks, signage and accessibility,
at Luna community college in Las Vegas in San Miguel county;
12. two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000)
to purchase, equip and install information technology and
related infrastructure at Luna community college in Las Vegas
in San Miguel county;
13. one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) to

purchase, equip and install broadcast infrastructure for the

KSFR radio broadcast program at Santa Fe community college in

Santa Fe county;

14. fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000) to purchase

electrical training equipment for the automotive technologies

program at Santa Fe community college in Santa Fe county;

15. one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) to

purchase, equip and install information technology and
SFC/SB 240
Page 39

related infrastructure for the film and television workforce
training program at Santa Fe community college in Santa Fe
county;
16. seventy thousand dollars ($70,000) to plan,
design, construct, purchase and equip water treatment
learning systems for the water treatment operator program at
Santa Fe community college in Santa Fe county; and
17. ninety-five thousand dollars ($95,000) to
purchase and install welding equipment for the welding
program at Santa Fe community college in Santa Fe county.
SECTION 42. PUBLIC EDUCATION DEPARTMENT PROJECTS--
GENERAL FUND.--The following amounts are appropriated from
the general fund to the public education department for the
following purposes:
1. one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) to
plan, design, construct, renovate, furnish and equip
buildings, facilities and grounds, including infrastructure,

information technology and wiring, at Solare collegiate

charter school in Bernalillo county;

2. one hundred five thousand dollars ($105,000) to

purchase and equip vehicles and to plan, design, construct,

renovate, furnish and equip buildings, facilities and

grounds, including infrastructure, information technology and

wiring, at South Valley academy charter school in Bernalillo

county;
SFC/SB 240
Page 40

3. one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) to
plan, design, construct, renovate, furnish and equip
buildings, facilities and grounds, including infrastructure,
information technology and wiring, at the 21st Century public
academy charter school in Albuquerque in Bernalillo county;
4. three hundred sixty thousand dollars ($360,000)
to plan, design, construct, renovate, furnish and equip
buildings and grounds, including infrastructure, information
technology and wiring, at the Albuquerque aviation academy in
Albuquerque in Bernalillo county;
5. two hundred seventy-five thousand dollars
($275,000) to plan, design, construct, purchase, renovate,
expand, furnish and equip buildings and grounds, including
classrooms, libraries and multipurpose areas, at ACES
technical charter school in Albuquerque in Bernalillo county;
6. seventy-five thousand dollars ($75,000) to
plan, design, construct, furnish, equip and improve

buildings, facilities and grounds at the Albuquerque

collegiate charter school in Albuquerque in Bernalillo

county;

7. fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) to plan,

design, construct, renovate, furnish and equip buildings,

facilities and grounds, including infrastructure, information

technology, wiring and parking and bus areas, at the

Albuquerque school of excellence charter school in
SFC/SB 240
Page 41

Albuquerque in Bernalillo county;
8. one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) to
purchase and equip activity buses with wheelchair lifts for
the Albuquerque sign language academy in Albuquerque in
Bernalillo county;
9. two hundred twenty thousand dollars ($220,000)
to plan, design, construct and renovate a performing arts
building for the Albuquerque sign language academy in
Albuquerque in Bernalillo county;
10. one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000)
to plan, design, construct, renovate, furnish and equip
buildings, facilities and grounds, including infrastructure,
information technology and wiring, at the Altura preparatory
school in Albuquerque in Bernalillo county;
11. one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000)
to design, plan, construct, renovate, furnish and equip
buildings, facilities and grounds, including infrastructure,

information technology and wiring, at Cottonwood classical

preparatory charter school in Albuquerque in Bernalillo

county;

12. one hundred twenty-five thousand dollars

($125,000) to purchase and install commercial kitchen

equipment at Menaul school to expand food service capacity in

Albuquerque in Bernalillo county;

13. three hundred fifty thousand dollars
SFC/SB 240
Page 42

($350,000) to purchase and equip vehicles and equipment for
Menaul school in Albuquerque in Bernalillo county;
14. ninety-five thousand dollars ($95,000) to
plan, design, construct, renovate, furnish and equip
buildings, facilities and grounds, including infrastructure,
information technology and wiring, at the Coors boulevard
campus of the Mission Achievement and Success charter school
in Albuquerque in Bernalillo county;
15. twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) to
plan, design, construct, renovate, furnish and equip
buildings, facilities and grounds, including infrastructure,
information technology and wiring, at the New America charter
school in Albuquerque in Bernalillo county;
16. six hundred five thousand dollars ($605,000)
to plan, design, construct, renovate, equip and improve the
New Mexico academy for the media arts in Albuquerque in
Bernalillo county;

17. fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) to plan,

design, construct, purchase and equip security systems and

technology upgrades at the New Mexico academy for the media

arts in Albuquerque in Bernalillo county;

18. twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) to

purchase and install equipment and to plan, design,

construct, renovate, furnish and equip buildings and grounds,

including infrastructure and information technology, at
SFC/SB 240
Page 43

Northpoint charter school in Albuquerque in Bernalillo
county;
19. one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) to
purchase and install equipment, including security and alarm
systems, information technology and classroom furniture, for
the Rio Grande academy of fine arts in Albuquerque in
Bernalillo county;
20. fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) to plan,
design, construct, renovate and equip facilities at the South
Valley preparatory school in Albuquerque in Bernalillo
county;
21. two hundred twenty-five thousand dollars
($225,000) to purchase and equip vehicles for South Valley
preparatory school in Albuquerque in Bernalillo county;
22. three hundred twenty-five thousand dollars
($325,000) to purchase, equip and install heating,
ventilation and air conditioning systems at the Montano

campus of the Montessori academy in Albuquerque in Bernalillo

county;

23. two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000)

to plan, design, construct, equip and furnish improvements at

Tierra Adentro: the New Mexico school of academics, arts and

artesania charter school in Albuquerque in Bernalillo county;

24. seventy-five thousand dollars ($75,000) to

plan, design, construct, purchase and equip security systems
SFC/SB 240
Page 44

and technology upgrades at Tierra Adentro: the New Mexico
school of academics, arts and artesania charter school in
Albuquerque in Bernalillo county;
25. one hundred eighty-five thousand dollars
($185,000) to plan, design, construct, renovate, furnish and
equip buildings, facilities and grounds, including
infrastructure, information technology and wiring, at the ACE
Leadership high school in the Albuquerque public school
district in Bernalillo county;
26. fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) to plan,
design, construct, purchase, improve and install technology
and communication systems at Adobe Acres elementary school in
the Albuquerque public school district in Bernalillo county;
27. two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000)
to plan, design, construct, repair, upgrade and renovate
classrooms, including the purchase and installation of
equipment, furniture, fixtures, bookshelves, books,

information technology and infrastructure, at Alameda

elementary school in the Albuquerque public school district

in Bernalillo county;

28. one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000)

to plan, design, construct, improve, purchase and install

technology and communications systems at Alamosa elementary

school in the Albuquerque public school district in

Bernalillo county;
SFC/SB 240
Page 45

29. sixty-six thousand dollars ($66,000) to plan,
design, construct and improve the cafeteria commons area,
including a mural, at Albuquerque high school in the
Albuquerque public school district in Bernalillo county;
30. twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) to
purchase and equip vehicles for the district Indian education
department in the Albuquerque public school district in
Bernalillo county;
31. one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000)
to purchase and equip vehicles for the district police
department in the Albuquerque public school district in
Bernalillo county;
32. one hundred five thousand dollars ($105,000)
to plan, design, construct, repair and renovate the grounds,
playgrounds, fields, sidewalks, bus drop-offs and pick-ups
and parking lots, including fencing, resurfacing, striping,
drainage improvements, traffic signs and landscaping, at

Alvarado elementary school in the Albuquerque public school

district in Bernalillo county;

33. two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000)

to plan, design, construct, repair, upgrade and renovate

classrooms, including the purchase and installation of

equipment, furniture, fixtures, bookshelves, books,

information technology and infrastructure, at Apache

elementary school in the Albuquerque public school district
SFC/SB 240
Page 46

in Bernalillo county;
34. fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) to plan,
design, construct, renovate, furnish and equip buildings and
grounds, including a courtyard, recreational spaces,
plumbing, information technology and heating, ventilation and
air conditioning systems, at the Archer academy of
accelerated learning in the Albuquerque public school
district in Bernalillo county;
35. one hundred seventy-five thousand dollars
($175,000) to plan, design, construct, purchase, improve and
install technology and communication systems at Armijo
elementary school in the Albuquerque public school district
in Bernalillo county;
36. fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) to plan,
design, construct, purchase, improve and install technology
and communication systems at Atrisco elementary school in the
Albuquerque public school district in Bernalillo county;

37. one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000)

to plan, design, construct, purchase, improve and install

technology and communication systems at Atrisco Heritage

academy high school in the Albuquerque public school district

in Bernalillo county;

38. seventy-five thousand dollars ($75,000) to

plan, design, construct, purchase, improve and install

technology and communication systems at Barcelona elementary
SFC/SB 240
Page 47

school in the Albuquerque public school district in
Bernalillo county;
39. seventy-five thousand dollars ($75,000) to
plan, design, construct and renovate the grounds, fields and
track areas, including the purchase and installation of
related equipment, sports equipment, fencing, bleachers,
track resurfacing, asphalt paving, drainage improvements,
turf and landscaping, at Bellehaven elementary school in the
Albuquerque public school district in Bernalillo county;
40. one hundred fifty-five thousand dollars
($155,000) to plan, design, construct, repair and renovate
the roof and exterior structures at Carlos Rey elementary
school in the Albuquerque public school district in
Bernalillo county;
41. two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000) to
plan, design, construct, repair and renovate building
interiors and grounds, including interior repair and

replacement of materials, sidewalks, bus drop-offs and

pick-ups, parking lots, fencing, basketball courts,

resurfacing, striping, drainage improvements, traffic signs

and landscaping, at Chamiza elementary school in the

Albuquerque public school district in Bernalillo county;

42. sixty thousand dollars ($60,000) to plan,

design, construct, purchase, improve and install technology

and communication systems at Chaparral elementary school in
SFC/SB 240
Page 48

the Albuquerque public school district in Bernalillo county;
43. one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) to
plan, design, construct, renovate, purchase and improve
security systems for grounds, infrastructure and facilities,
including secure entryways and related equipment, locks,
cameras and access-card security systems, fencing,
landscaping, telecommunications alarm upgrades and
information technology, at Chelwood elementary school in the
Albuquerque public school district in Bernalillo county;
44. two hundred seventy-five thousand dollars
($275,000) to plan, design, construct, renovate, furnish and
equip buildings, facilities and grounds, including
infrastructure, information technology, wiring and security
systems, at the Christine Duncan heritage academy charter
school in the Albuquerque public school district in
Bernalillo county;
45. one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000)

to plan, design, construct, repair and renovate building

exteriors, interiors and grounds, including interior repair

and replacement of materials, sidewalks, bus drop-offs and

pick-ups, parking lots, fencing, basketball courts,

resurfacing, striping, drainage improvements, traffic signs

and landscaping, at Cibola high school in the Albuquerque

public school district in Bernalillo county;

46. sixty thousand dollars ($60,000) to plan,
SFC/SB 240
Page 49

design, construct, renovate, furnish and equip buildings,
facilities and grounds, including infrastructure, information
technology and wiring, at the Cien Aguas international
charter school in the Albuquerque public school district in
Bernalillo county;
47. seventy-five thousand dollars ($75,000) to
plan, design, construct, purchase, improve and install
technology and communication systems at Comanche elementary
school in the Albuquerque public school district in
Bernalillo county;
48. fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) to plan,
design, construct, renovate, expand, furnish and equip
buildings, facilities and grounds, including infrastructure,
information technology and wiring, at the Coral community
charter school in the Albuquerque public school district in
Bernalillo county;
49. three hundred thousand dollars ($300,000) to

plan, design, construct, purchase, improve and install

technology and communication systems at Corrales elementary

school in the Albuquerque public school district in

Bernalillo county;

50. one hundred ninety thousand dollars ($190,000)

to plan, design, construct, repair and renovate the grounds,

sidewalks, bus drop-offs and pick-ups and parking lots,

including fencing, resurfacing, striping, drainage
SFC/SB 240
Page 50

improvements, traffic signs and landscaping, at Coyote Willow
family school in the Albuquerque public school district in
Bernalillo county;
51. one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) to
plan, design, construct, purchase, improve and install
technology and communication systems at Dennis Chavez
elementary school in the Albuquerque public school district
in Bernalillo county;
52. one hundred seventy-five thousand dollars
($175,000) to plan, design, construct, repair and renovate
building interiors and grounds, including interior repair
and replacement of materials, sidewalks, bus drop-offs and
pick-ups, parking lots, fencing, basketball courts,
resurfacing, striping, drainage improvements, traffic signs
and landscaping, at Desert Ridge middle school in the
Albuquerque public school district in Bernalillo county;
53. one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) to

plan, design, construct, renovate, furnish and equip

buildings and grounds, including infrastructure, information

technology and wiring, at the Digital Arts and Technology

academy in the Albuquerque public school district in

Bernalillo county;

54. one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) to

plan, design, construct, purchase, improve and install

technology and communication systems at Dolores Gonzales
SFC/SB 240
Page 51

elementary school in the Albuquerque public school district
in Bernalillo county;
55. five hundred fifty thousand dollars ($550,000)
to plan, design, construct, furnish and equip a suite of
science, technology, engineering and mathematics classrooms
and learning commons at East Mountain high school in the
Albuquerque public school district in Bernalillo county;
56. seventy-five thousand dollars ($75,000) to
plan, design, construct, purchase, improve and install
technology and communication systems at Edward Gonzales
elementary school in the Albuquerque public school district
in Bernalillo county;
57. fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) to purchase
equipment and to plan, design, construct, expand, equip and
furnish an aquatic center at north Domingo Baca park for
Eisenhower middle school in the Albuquerque public school
district in Bernalillo county;

58. twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) to

plan, design, construct, purchase, improve and install

technology and communication systems at Eisenhower middle

school in the Albuquerque public school district in

Bernalillo county;

59. five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) to

plan, design, construct, repair and renovate the roof and

exterior structures at Eldorado high school in the
SFC/SB 240
Page 52

Albuquerque public school district in Bernalillo county;
60. fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000) to purchase
equipment and to plan, design, construct, expand, equip and
furnish an aquatic center at north Domingo Baca park for
Eldorado high school in the Albuquerque public school
district in Bernalillo county;
61. one hundred seventy-five thousand dollars
($175,000) to plan, design, construct, repair and renovate
the roof and exterior structures at Emerson elementary school
in the Albuquerque public school district in Bernalillo
county;
62. fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) to plan,
design, construct, purchase, improve and install technology
and communication systems at Ernie Pyle middle school in the
Albuquerque public school district in Bernalillo county;
63. one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) to
plan, design, construct, repair, upgrade and renovate

classrooms, including the purchase and installation of

equipment, furniture, fixtures, bookshelves, books,

information technology and infrastructure, at Eugene Field

elementary school in the Albuquerque public school district

in Bernalillo county;

64. fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) to purchase

equipment and to plan, design, construct, expand, equip and

furnish an aquatic center at north Domingo Baca park for
SFC/SB 240
Page 53

Georgia O'Keeffe elementary school in the Albuquerque public
school district in Bernalillo county;
65. two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000)
to plan, design, construct, repair and renovate the grounds,
playgrounds, fields, sidewalks, bus drop-offs and pick-ups
and parking lots, including fencing, resurfacing, striping,
drainage improvements, traffic signs, landscaping and
improvements for code compliance, at Georgia O'Keeffe
elementary school in the Albuquerque public school district
in Bernalillo county;
66. four hundred seventy-six thousand dollars
($476,000) to plan, design, construct, purchase, improve and
install technology and communication systems at Grant middle
school in the Albuquerque public school district in
Bernalillo county;
67. fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) to plan,
design, construct and renovate the grounds, fields and track

areas, including the purchase and installation of related

equipment, sports equipment, fencing, bleachers, shade

structures, track resurfacing, asphalt paving, drainage

improvements, turf and landscaping, at Harrison middle school

in the Albuquerque public school district in Bernalillo

county;

68. two hundred thirty-seven thousand dollars

($237,000) to plan, design, construct, purchase, improve and
SFC/SB 240
Page 54

install technology and communication systems at Hawthorne
elementary school in the Albuquerque public school district
in Bernalillo county;
69. eighty-one thousand dollars ($81,000) to plan,
design, construct, purchase, improve and install technology
and communication systems at Hayes middle school in the
Albuquerque public school district in Bernalillo county;
70. three hundred fifty thousand dollars
($350,000) to plan, design, construct, renovate, furnish and
equip buildings, facilities and grounds, including
infrastructure, information technology and wiring, at the
Health Leadership high school in the Albuquerque public
school district in Bernalillo county;
71. seventy-five thousand dollars ($75,000) to
plan, design, construct, purchase, improve and install
technology and communication systems at Helen Cordero
elementary school in the Albuquerque public school district

in Bernalillo county;

72. sixty-five thousand dollars ($65,000) to plan,

design, construct, purchase and equip indoor and outdoor

signage, including support structures, at the Highland high

school north complex in the Albuquerque public school

district in Bernalillo county;

73. fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) to plan,

design, construct, purchase, improve and install technology
SFC/SB 240
Page 55

and communication systems at Highland high school in the
Albuquerque public school district in Bernalillo county;
74. one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) to
plan, design, construct, repair, upgrade and renovate
classrooms, including the purchase and installation of
equipment, furniture, fixtures, bookshelves, books,
information technology and infrastructure, at Hodgin
elementary school in the Albuquerque public school district
in Bernalillo county;
75. fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) to purchase
equipment and to plan, design, construct, expand, equip and
furnish an aquatic center at north Domingo Baca park for
Hoover middle school in the Albuquerque public school
district in Bernalillo county;
76. seventy-five thousand dollars ($75,000) to
plan, design, construct, purchase, improve and install
technology and communication systems at Hoover middle school

in the Albuquerque public school district in Bernalillo

county;

77. seventy-five thousand dollars ($75,000) to

plan, design, construct, purchase, improve and install

technology and communication systems at Inez elementary

school in the Albuquerque public school district in

Bernalillo county;

78. seventy-nine thousand dollars ($79,000) to
SFC/SB 240
Page 56

plan, design, construct, purchase, improve and install
technology and communication systems at Jackson middle school
in the Albuquerque public school district in Bernalillo
county;
79. three hundred forty-seven thousand two hundred
dollars ($347,200) to plan, design, purchase, improve and
install equipment, furniture, fixtures, bookshelves, books,
information technology and infrastructure in the wellness
room and staff restrooms at James Monroe middle school in the
Albuquerque public school district in Bernalillo county;
80. seventy-five thousand dollars ($75,000) to
plan, design, construct, repair and renovate the grounds,
playgrounds, sidewalks, bus drop-offs and pick-ups and
parking lots, including fencing, resurfacing, striping,
drainage improvements, traffic signs, shade structures and
landscaping, at the Janet Kahn school of integrated arts in
the Albuquerque public school district in Bernalillo county;

81. fifty-five thousand dollars ($55,000) to plan,

design, construct, repair and renovate the grounds,

playgrounds, sidewalks, bus drop-offs and pick-ups and

parking lots, including fencing, resurfacing, striping,

drainage improvements, traffic signs, shade structures and

landscaping, at Jimmy Carter middle school in the Albuquerque

public school district in Bernalillo county;

82. one hundred fifty-nine thousand five hundred
SFC/SB 240
Page 57

dollars ($159,500) to plan, design, construct, purchase,
improve and install technology and communication systems at
John Adams middle school in the Albuquerque public school
district in Bernalillo county;
83. seventy-five thousand dollars ($75,000) to
purchase equipment and to plan, design, construct, expand,
equip and furnish an aquatic center at north Domingo Baca
park for John Baker elementary school in the Albuquerque
public school district in Bernalillo county;
84. two hundred seventy-five thousand dollars
($275,000) to plan, design, construct, repair, upgrade and
renovate classrooms, including the purchase and installation
of equipment, furniture, fixtures, bookshelves, books,
information technology and infrastructure, at the juvenile
detention center school in the Albuquerque public school
district in Bernalillo county;
85. one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000)

to plan, design, construct, repair and renovate the roof and

exterior structures at Kennedy middle school in the

Albuquerque public school district in Bernalillo county;

86. fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) to plan,

design, construct, repair, upgrade and renovate classrooms,

including the purchase and installation of equipment,

furniture, fixtures, bookshelves, books, information

technology and infrastructure, at Kit Carson elementary
SFC/SB 240
Page 58

school in the Albuquerque public school district in
Bernalillo county;
87. three hundred thousand dollars ($300,000) to
acquire buildings and to plan, design, construct, renovate,
furnish and equip buildings, facilities and grounds,
including information technology, security systems and
wiring, at La Academia de Esperanza charter school in the
Albuquerque public school district in Bernalillo county;
88. one hundred seventy-five thousand dollars
($175,000) to plan, design, construct, repair and renovate
the grounds, playgrounds, shade structures, sidewalks, bus
drop-offs and pick-ups and parking lots, including fencing,
resurfacing, striping, drainage improvements, traffic signs,
landscaping and improvements for code compliance, at La Mesa
elementary school in the Albuquerque public school district
in Bernalillo county;
89. one hundred forty-two thousand five hundred

dollars ($142,500) to plan, design, construct, repair and

renovate the roof and exterior structures at Lavaland

elementary school in the Albuquerque public school district

in Bernalillo county;

90. one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000)

to plan, design, construct, repair, upgrade and renovate

classrooms, including the purchase and installation of

equipment, furniture, fixtures, bookshelves, books,
SFC/SB 240
Page 59

information technology and infrastructure, at Los Padillas
elementary school in the Albuquerque public school district
in Bernalillo county;
91. fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) to plan,
design, construct, purchase, equip and furnish
infrastructure, foundation and landscaping for outdoor
classrooms and learning spaces at Los Padillas wildlife
sanctuary in the Albuquerque public school district in
Bernalillo county;
92. three hundred sixty-nine thousand dollars
($369,000) to plan, design, construct, purchase, improve
and install technology and communication systems at
Lyndon B. Johnson middle school in the Albuquerque public
school district in Bernalillo county;
93. seventy-five thousand dollars ($75,000) to
plan, design, construct, purchase, improve and install
technology and communication systems at Madison middle school

in the Albuquerque public school district in Bernalillo

county;

94. three hundred thousand dollars ($300,000) to

plan, design, construct, purchase, improve and install

technology and communication systems at Manzano high school

in the Albuquerque public school district in Bernalillo

county;

95. fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) to plan,
SFC/SB 240
Page 60

design, construct, purchase, improve and install technology
and communication systems at Manzano Mesa elementary school
in the Albuquerque public school district in Bernalillo
county;
96. five hundred twelve thousand dollars
($512,000) to plan, design, construct, purchase, improve
and install technology and communication systems at
Marie M. Hughes elementary school in the Albuquerque public
school district in Bernalillo county;
97. two hundred fifty-five thousand dollars
($255,000) to plan, design, construct, purchase, renovate,
furnish, equip and expand facilities, including classrooms,
multipurpose areas, early childhood facilities, portables and
grounds, at Mark Armijo academy in the Albuquerque public
school district in Bernalillo county;
98. one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000)
to plan, design, construct, purchase, install and equip

security and information technology improvements at

Mark Armijo academy in the Albuquerque public school district

in Bernalillo county;

99. seventy-five thousand dollars ($75,000) to

plan, design, construct, purchase, improve and install

technology and communication systems at Mary Ann Binford

elementary school in the Albuquerque public school district

in Bernalillo county;
SFC/SB 240
Page 61

100. eighty-five thousand dollars ($85,000) to
plan, design, construct, purchase, improve and install
technology and communication systems at McCollum elementary
school in the Albuquerque public school district in
Bernalillo county;
101. one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) to
plan, design, construct, renovate, furnish and equip
buildings and grounds, including infrastructure, information
technology and wiring, at Mountain Mahogany community charter
school in the Albuquerque public school district in
Bernalillo county;
102. seventy-five thousand dollars ($75,000) to
plan, design, construct, purchase, improve and install
technology and communication systems at Navajo elementary
school in the Albuquerque public school district in
Bernalillo county;
103. twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) to

purchase equipment and to plan, design, construct, expand,

equip and furnish an aquatic center at north Domingo Baca

park for Onate elementary school in the Albuquerque public

school district in Bernalillo county;

104. seventy-five thousand dollars ($75,000) to

plan, design, construct and renovate the grounds, fields and

track areas, including the purchase and installation of

related equipment, sports equipment, fencing, bleachers,
SFC/SB 240
Page 62

track resurfacing, asphalt paving, drainage improvements,
turf and landscaping, at Onate elementary school in the
Albuquerque public school district in Bernalillo county;
105. three hundred thirty-five thousand four
hundred dollars ($335,400) to plan, design, construct, repair
and renovate the grounds, playgrounds and sidewalks,
including fencing, resurfacing, drainage improvements,
landscaping and improvements for code compliance, at Painted
Sky elementary school in the Albuquerque public school
district in Bernalillo county;
106. two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000)
to plan, design, construct, purchase, improve and install
technology and communication systems at Petroglyph elementary
school in the Albuquerque public school district in
Bernalillo county;
107. two hundred seventy-five thousand dollars
($275,000) to plan, design, construct, renovate, purchase and

equip Public Academy for the performing arts charter school,

including a portable stage, sound equipment, performance

lights, portable seating, security system and information

technology, in the Albuquerque public school district in

Bernalillo county;

108. one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) to

plan, design, construct, purchase, improve and install

technology and communication systems at Rio Grande high
SFC/SB 240
Page 63

school in the Albuquerque public school district in
Bernalillo county;
109. eight hundred fifteen thousand dollars
($815,000) to purchase and install equipment and to plan,
design, construct, renovate, furnish and equip buildings and
grounds, including infrastructure and information technology,
at Robert F. Kennedy charter school in the Albuquerque public
school district in Bernalillo county;
110. twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) to
plan, design, construct, purchase, improve and install
technology and communication systems at Rudolfo Anaya
elementary school in the Albuquerque public school district
in Bernalillo county;
111. twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) to
purchase equipment and to plan, design, construct, expand,
equip and furnish an aquatic center at north Domingo Baca
park for S. Y. Jackson elementary school in the Albuquerque

public school district in Bernalillo county;

112. twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) to

plan, design, construct, purchase, improve and install

technology and communication systems at S. Y. Jackson

elementary school in the Albuquerque public school district

in Bernalillo county;

113. fifty-five thousand dollars ($55,000) to

plan, design, construct, repair and renovate the grounds,
SFC/SB 240
Page 64

playgrounds, shade structures, sidewalks, bus drop-offs and
pick-ups and parking lots, including fencing, resurfacing,
striping, drainage improvements, traffic signs, walkways and
landscaping, at Sandia Base elementary school in the
Albuquerque public school district in Bernalillo county;
114. fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) to plan,
design, construct, purchase, improve and install technology
and communication systems at Sandia high school in the
Albuquerque public school district in Bernalillo county;
115. one hundred thirty thousand dollars
($130,000) to plan, design, construct, repair, upgrade and
renovate classrooms, including the purchase and installation
of equipment, furniture, fixtures, bookshelves, books,
information technology and infrastructure, at School on
Wheels high school in the Albuquerque public school district
in Bernalillo county;
116. two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000)

to plan, design, construct, purchase, improve and install

technology and communication systems at Seven Bar elementary

school in the Albuquerque public school district in

Bernalillo county;

117. one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) to

purchase and install equipment and to plan, design,

construct, renovate, furnish and equip buildings and grounds,

including infrastructure and information technology, at
SFC/SB 240
Page 65

Siembra Leadership high school in the Albuquerque public
school district in Bernalillo county;
118. twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) to
plan, design, construct, purchase, improve and install
technology and communication systems at Sierra Vista
elementary school in the Albuquerque public school district
in Bernalillo county;
119. twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) to
plan, design, construct, purchase, improve and install
technology and communication systems at Sombra del Monte
elementary school in the Albuquerque public school district
in Bernalillo county;
120. twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) to
plan, design, construct, purchase, improve and install
technology and communication systems at Sunset View
elementary school in the Albuquerque public school district
in Bernalillo county;

121. two hundred fifty-five thousand dollars

($255,000) to plan, design, construct, purchase, improve and

install technology and communication systems at Susie Rayos

Marmon elementary school in the Albuquerque public school

district in Bernalillo county;

122. three hundred seventy-five thousand dollars

($375,000) to plan, design, construct, equip and improve the

Technology Leadership high school in the Albuquerque public
SFC/SB 240
Page 66

school district in Bernalillo county;
123. two hundred seventy-five thousand dollars
($275,000) to plan, design, construct, equip and install
security upgrades and technology equipment for Technology
Leadership high school in the Albuquerque public school
district in Bernalillo county;
124. two hundred three thousand dollars ($203,000)
to plan, design, construct, renovate, furnish and equip
buildings, facilities and grounds, including infrastructure,
information technology and wiring, at the International
school at Mesa Del Sol in the Albuquerque public school
district in Bernalillo county;
125. three hundred seventy-five thousand dollars
($375,000) to plan, design, construct, repair and renovate
the grounds, playgrounds, sidewalks, bus drop-offs and
pick-ups and parking lots, including fencing, resurfacing,
striping, drainage improvements, traffic signs, landscaping

and improvements for code compliance, at Tierra Antigua

elementary school in the Albuquerque public school district

in Bernalillo county;

126. two hundred twenty-five thousand dollars

($225,000) to plan, design, construct, repair, upgrade and

renovate classrooms, including the purchase and installation

of equipment, furniture, fixtures, bookshelves, books,

information technology and infrastructure, at Tomasita
SFC/SB 240
Page 67

elementary school in the Albuquerque public school district
in Bernalillo county;
127. three hundred forty-five thousand dollars
($345,000) to plan, design, construct, purchase, improve and
install technology and communication systems at Tony
Hillerman middle school in the Albuquerque public school
district in Bernalillo county;
128. five hundred twenty-one thousand six hundred
dollars ($521,600) to plan, design, construct, purchase,
improve and install technology and communication systems at
Tres Volcanes community collaborative school in the
Albuquerque public school district in Bernalillo county;
129. one hundred five thousand dollars ($105,000)
to plan, design, construct, purchase, improve and install
technology and communication systems at Truman middle school
in the Albuquerque public school district in Bernalillo
county;

130. one hundred fifty-two thousand dollars

($152,000) to plan, design, construct, purchase, improve and

install technology and communication systems at Valle Vista

elementary school in the Albuquerque public school district

in Bernalillo county;

131. one hundred seventy-five thousand dollars

($175,000) to plan, design, construct, repair, upgrade and

renovate classrooms, including the purchase and installation
SFC/SB 240
Page 68

of equipment, furniture, fixtures, bookshelves, books,
information technology and infrastructure, at Van Buren
middle school in the Albuquerque public school district in
Bernalillo county;
132. three hundred twenty-one thousand dollars
($321,000) to plan, design, construct, purchase, improve and
install technology and communication systems at Ventana Ranch
elementary school in the Albuquerque public school district
in Bernalillo county;
133. four hundred seventy-five thousand dollars
($475,000) to plan, design, construct, purchase, improve and
install technology and communication systems at Volcano Vista
high school in the Albuquerque public school district in
Bernalillo county;
134. two hundred twenty thousand dollars
($220,000) to plan, design, construct, repair and renovate
the roof and exterior structures at Washington middle school

in the Albuquerque public school district in Bernalillo

county;

135. two hundred twenty-three thousand dollars

($223,000) to plan, design, construct, purchase, improve and

install technology and communication systems at West Mesa

high school in the Albuquerque public school district in

Bernalillo county;

136. two hundred twenty-five thousand dollars
SFC/SB 240
Page 69

($225,000) to plan, design, construct, purchase, equip and
furnish outdoor site improvements, including play equipment,
seating, shade structures, walkways and landscaping, at
Wilson middle school in the Albuquerque public school
district in Bernalillo county;
137. one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) to
plan, design, construct, repair, upgrade and renovate
classrooms, including the purchase and installation of
equipment, furniture, fixtures, bookshelves, books,
information technology and infrastructure, at Zia elementary
school in the Albuquerque public school district in
Bernalillo county;
138. one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000)
to plan, design and construct improvements at the school bus
barn, including water wells, shade structures and electrical
systems, in the Dexter consolidated school district in Chaves
county;

139. three hundred thousand dollars ($300,000) to

plan, design, construct, equip and improve a cafeteria and

gymnasium, including sanitation and plumbing lines, in the

Dexter consolidated school district in Chaves county;

140. four hundred thousand dollars ($400,000) to

purchase, equip and install cold storage units for cafeterias

in the Dexter consolidated school district in Chaves county;

141. one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) to
SFC/SB 240
Page 70

purchase a tractor and equipment for the maintenance
department in the Dexter consolidated school district in
Chaves county;
142. one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000)
to plan, design, construct, furnish, equip and improve the
main gymnasium, including display features, in the Lake
Arthur municipal school district in Chaves county;
143. forty thousand dollars ($40,000) to plan,
design, construct, equip and install a student-designed and
student-built public art structure at Grants high school in
the Grants-Cibola county school district in Cibola county;
144. two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000)
to purchase and equip an activity bus for the Springer
municipal school district in Colfax county;
145. seven hundred fifty thousand dollars
($750,000) to plan, design, construct, demolish, remove and
replace the athletic field bleachers and press box in the

Texico municipal school district in Curry county;

146. three million four hundred twenty-five

thousand dollars ($3,425,000) to plan, design, construct,

equip and furnish a centralized family support center,

including multi-use spaces for staff, students and community

and specialized programs, in the Las Cruces public school

district in Dona Ana county;

147. four hundred thousand dollars ($400,000) to
SFC/SB 240
Page 71

plan, design and construct a career and technical education
center, including training spaces and classrooms, at Rio
Grande preparatory institute in the Las Cruces public school
district in Dona Ana county;
148. five hundred fifty thousand dollars
($550,000) to plan, design, construct, replace, renovate and
install equipment and shade structures in the playground area
at Jefferson Montessori academy in the Carlsbad municipal
school district in Eddy county;
149. one hundred seventy-one thousand dollars
($171,000) to purchase and equip maintenance and heavy
equipment for the Cobre consolidated school district in Grant
county;
150. two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000)
to plan, design, construct, improve, equip and furnish
buildings and grounds at Aldo Leopold charter school in
Silver City in Grant county;

151. three hundred twenty thousand dollars

($320,000) to purchase and equip vehicles for the Silver

consolidated school district in Grant county;

152. two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000)

to purchase and equip activity buses for the Santa Rosa

consolidated school district in Guadalupe county;

153. two hundred seventy thousand dollars

($270,000) to purchase and equip a bus for the Animas public
SFC/SB 240
Page 72

school district in Hidalgo county;
154. two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000) to
plan, design, construct, remodel and expand the cafeteria at
Dugan-Tarango middle school in the Lordsburg municipal school
district in Hidalgo county;
155. nine hundred thousand dollars ($900,000) to
plan, design, construct and improve playground surfacing for
elementary schools in the Lovington municipal school district
in Lea county;
156. three hundred thousand dollars ($300,000) to
purchase and equip an activity bus for the Tatum municipal
school district in Lea county;
157. fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) to plan,
design, construct and improve gymnasium floors and water
systems in the Hondo Valley public school district in Lincoln
county;
158. one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) to

plan, design, construct, furnish and equip a greenhouse in

the Hondo Valley public school district in Lincoln county;

159. ninety thousand dollars ($90,000) to purchase

and equip vehicles for agriculture programs in the Hondo

Valley public school district in Lincoln county;

160. four hundred fifty thousand dollars

($450,000) to plan, design, construct, renovate, purchase and

equip an accessible elevator at the region 9 education
SFC/SB 240
Page 73

cooperative main office in Ruidoso in Lincoln county;
161. one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000)
to plan, design, construct and renovate Memorial stadium,
including accessible seating, at Deming high school in the
Deming public school district in Luna county;
162. two hundred seventy-five thousand dollars
($275,000) to plan, design, construct, renovate and equip a
gymnasium, including bleachers, lockers, stages and lighting,
at Hozho academy charter school in Gallup in McKinley county;
163. one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) to
plan, design, construct, equip and improve facilities in the
Mora independent school district in Mora county;
164. two hundred seventy thousand dollars
($270,000) to purchase and equip a mobile learning physics
laboratory for school districts in the northwest regional
education cooperative 2 in Rio Arriba, Sandoval and Taos
counties;

165. eight hundred fifty thousand dollars

($850,000) to plan, design, construct, equip and install

improvements to career and technical education facilities at

Alamogordo high school in the Alamogordo public school

district in Otero county;

166. eight hundred thousand dollars ($800,000) to

plan, design, construct, furnish and equip a transportation

facility for the Alamogordo public school district in Otero
SFC/SB 240
Page 74

county;
167. two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000) to
plan, design, construct, equip and improve school facilities,
including information technology and heating, ventilation and
air conditioning systems, in the Chama Valley independent
school district in Rio Arriba county;
168. one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) to
plan, design, construct and install bleachers at the
multipurpose athletic field at McCurdy charter school in
Espanola in Rio Arriba county;
169. one hundred twenty thousand dollars
($120,000) to purchase and equip a skid steer loader for
building maintenance in the Espanola public school district
in Rio Arriba county;
170. two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000)
to plan, design, construct, purchase and equip a teacherage,
including infrastructure and housing, in the Espanola public

school district in Rio Arriba county;

171. one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) to

purchase equipment for and to plan, design, construct and

renovate facilities for trades programs at the Espanola

public school district in Rio Arriba county;

172. seventy-five thousand dollars ($75,000) to

purchase and equip vehicles for building maintenance,

information technology and security in the Espanola public
SFC/SB 240
Page 75

school district in Rio Arriba county;
173. two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000) to
purchase and equip a food truck for a career technical
education program in the Jemez Mountain public school
district in Rio Arriba county;
174. three hundred twenty thousand dollars
($320,000) to purchase and equip an activity bus for the Dora
consolidated school district in Roosevelt county;
175. two hundred twenty thousand dollars
($220,000) to plan, design, construct, improve and equip the
Elida school playground, including standard safety materials,
removal of pea gravel and installation of a concrete barrier,
in the Elida municipal school district in Roosevelt county;
176. one hundred seventy thousand dollars
($170,000) to plan, design, construct and equip security
fencing, gates and access controls at Animas elementary
school in the Farmington municipal school district in

San Juan county;

177. one hundred thirty-two thousand dollars

($132,000) to plan, design, construct and equip security

fencing, gates and access controls at Bluffview elementary

school in the Farmington municipal school district in

San Juan county;

178. four hundred thousand dollars ($400,000) to

plan, design, construct, furnish and equip an accessible
SFC/SB 240
Page 76

facility for concessions, restrooms and ticketing at
Farmington high school in the Farmington municipal school
district in San Juan county;
179. five hundred seventy-eight thousand dollars
($578,000) to plan, design, construct, replace, furnish,
equip and improve a sports facility, including stadium
bleachers and accessibility, at Farmington high school in
Farmington in San Juan county;
180. one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000)
to plan, design, construct, repair and improve the roof of
the Farmington municipal school district operations center in
San Juan county;
181. twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) to
plan, design, construct, improve and equip track and field
throwing areas at Hermosa middle school in the Farmington
municipal school district in San Juan county;
182. twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) to

plan, design, construct, improve and equip track and field

throwing areas at Mesa View middle school in the Farmington

municipal school district in San Juan county;

183. one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000)

to plan, design, construct, repair, equip and improve

lighting and electrical systems in the field house at Piedra

Vista high school in the Farmington municipal school district

in San Juan county;
SFC/SB 240
Page 77

184. two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000)
to plan, design, construct and equip track and field
facilities at Piedra Vista high school in the Farmington
municipal school district in San Juan county;
185. twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) to
plan, design, construct, improve and equip track and field
throwing areas at Tibbetts middle school in the Farmington
municipal school district in San Juan county;
186. two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000)
to purchase, equip and replace buses in the Las Vegas city
public school district in San Miguel county;
187. one hundred forty-five thousand dollars
($145,000) to purchase and equip maintenance vehicles,
including lift and tow packages, for the Las Vegas city
public school district in San Miguel county;
188. fifty-five thousand dollars ($55,000) to
purchase and equip vehicles for the Las Vegas city public

school district in San Miguel county;

189. two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000)

to acquire a building to serve as the district's theater arts

facility and to plan, design, construct, furnish, equip and

renovate the Kiva theatre in the west Las Vegas public school

district in San Miguel county;

190. one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) to

plan, design, construct and renovate parking lots and bus
SFC/SB 240
Page 78

areas at Cuba middle school in the Cuba independent school
district in Sandoval county;
191. five hundred forty-six thousand dollars
($546,000) to purchase and install equipment and to plan,
design, construct, renovate, furnish and equip buildings and
grounds, including infrastructure and information technology,
at the ASK academy in Rio Rancho in Sandoval county;
192. fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) to purchase,
equip and install security and fire alarm systems at Explore
academy charter school in Rio Rancho in Sandoval county;
193. five hundred fifty thousand dollars
($550,000) to plan, design, construct, purchase, equip and
furnish improvements to buildings and grounds, including
information technology, wiring, safety systems and
instructional spaces, at Sandoval academy of bilingual
education in Rio Rancho in Sandoval county;
194. eighty thousand dollars ($80,000) to plan,

design, construct and replace a parking lot for Cielo Azul

elementary school in the Rio Rancho public school district in

Sandoval county;

195. two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000) to

plan, design, construct and equip an athletic locker room at

Cleveland high school in the Rio Rancho public school

district in Sandoval county;

196. one hundred twenty-five thousand dollars
SFC/SB 240
Page 79

($125,000) to plan, design, construct and renovate the
marching band rehearsal field, including an observation
tower, fencing and flatwork, at Cleveland high school in the
Rio Rancho public school district in Sandoval county;
197. seventy-nine thousand dollars ($79,000) to
plan, design, construct, purchase, equip and install shade
structures for playgrounds at Joe Harris elementary school in
the Rio Rancho public school district in Sandoval county;
198. two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000) to
plan, design and construct tennis courts at Lincoln middle
school in the Rio Rancho public school district in Sandoval
county;
199. forty thousand dollars ($40,000) to
purchase, equip and install interactive display monitors at
Martin Luther King, Jr. elementary school in the Rio Rancho
public school district in Sandoval county;
200. four hundred thousand dollars ($400,000) to

plan, design, construct and replace storefront systems

outside of the media center at Mountain View middle school in

the Rio Rancho public school district in Sandoval county;

201. one hundred ninety thousand dollars

($190,000) to plan, design, construct, demolish, remove

and replace the basketball court in the main gymnasium at

Rio Rancho high school in the Rio Rancho public school

district in Sandoval county;
SFC/SB 240
Page 80

202. one hundred twenty-five thousand dollars
($125,000) to plan, design, construct and improve the
marching band field, including gates, perimeter berms,
resurfacing and restriping, at Rio Rancho high school in the
Rio Rancho public school district in Sandoval county;
203. two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000) to
plan, design, construct and equip a press box for the
Rio Rancho high school softball complex in the Rio Rancho
public school district in Sandoval county;
204. six hundred thousand dollars ($600,000) to
purchase and equip school buses for the Rio Rancho public
school district in Sandoval county;
205. sixty thousand dollars ($60,000) to plan and
design an expansion to the bus parking lot in the Rio Rancho
public school district in Sandoval county;
206. three hundred fifty thousand dollars
($350,000) to plan, design, construct and replace an intercom

system at Vista Grande elementary school in the Rio Rancho

public school district in Sandoval county;

207. five hundred fifty thousand dollars

($550,000) to plan, design, construct, repair and replace the

roof at Turquoise Trail charter school in Santa Fe county;

208. two hundred seventy-five thousand dollars

($275,000) to purchase and equip information technology and

furniture at Estancia Valley classical academy in Edgewood in
SFC/SB 240
Page 81

Santa Fe county;
209. one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000)
to plan, design, construct and replace synthetic turf on
playing fields in the Pojoaque Valley public school district
in Santa Fe county;
210. seventy-five thousand dollars ($75,000) to
plan, design, construct, renovate, expand and equip
classrooms, including a gym and security systems, at the
Monte del Sol charter school in Santa Fe in Santa Fe county;
211. one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) to
purchase and equip vehicles for the Monte del Sol charter
school in Santa Fe in Santa Fe county;
212. six hundred eighty-five thousand dollars
($685,000) for site preparation and to plan, design and
construct a film and classroom building at the New Mexico
school for the arts in Santa Fe in Santa Fe county;
213. fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) to purchase,

equip and install vehicles and equipment, including

playground equipment, an access control system and campus

fencing, at the Sun Mountain community school in Santa Fe in

Santa Fe county;

214. one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000)

to plan, design, construct, renovate, purchase and equip

facilities, buildings and grounds, including information

technology and wiring, at Thrive community school in Santa Fe
SFC/SB 240
Page 82

in Santa Fe county;
215. sixty-one thousand dollars ($61,000) to plan,
design and construct accessibilty improvements, including
parking lot ramp access, restroom renovations and Braille
signage, at the academy for technology and the classics in
the Santa Fe public school district in Santa Fe county;
216. thirty-seven thousand dollars ($37,000) to
develop a site master plan for the academy for technology and
the classics in the Santa Fe public school district in
Santa Fe county;
217. one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) to
plan, design and construct affordable housing for Santa Fe
public school district employees in Santa Fe county;
218. two hundred eighty-six thousand dollars
($286,000) to purchase and equip activity buses for the Truth
or Consequences municipal school district in Sierra county;
219. two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000)

to plan, design, construct and equip an outdoor learning

center at Parkview elementary school, including landscaping,

learning stations and an amphitheater, in the Socorro

consolidated school district in Socorro county;

220. twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) to

purchase and equip vehicles for the Mesa Vista consolidated

school district in Taos county;

221. one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000)
SFC/SB 240
Page 83

to plan, design, construct, replace and equip the playground
at Ojo Caliente elementary school in the Mesa Vista
consolidated school district in Taos county;
222. three hundred fifty thousand dollars
($350,000) to plan, design, construct and improve buildings
and grounds, including modular buildings, drainage, fencing
and outdoor play structures and equipment, at Roots and Wings
community school in Taos county;
223. eighty-one thousand dollars ($81,000) to
plan, design, construct, renovate and equip a commercial
kitchen at the Taos academy charter school in Taos in Taos
county;
224. one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) for
site preparation for a building for the Taos integrated
school of the arts in Taos county;
225. one hundred seventy-five thousand dollars
($175,000) to purchase and equip buses for Anansi charter

school in the Taos municipal school district in Taos county;

226. fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) to plan,

design, construct, improve and equip the Kiser elementary

school playground in the Clayton municipal school district in

Union county;

227. three hundred thousand dollars ($300,000) to

purchase and equip an activity bus for the Belen consolidated

school district in Valencia county; and
SFC/SB 240
Page 84

228. three hundred fifty thousand dollars
($350,000) to purchase and equip school activity buses and a
portable bus barn for the School of Dreams academy in
Los Lunas in Valencia county.
SECTION 43. DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENT PROJECTS--GENERAL
FUND.--The following amounts are appropriated from the
general fund to the department of environment for the
following purposes:
1. five hundred thirty thousand dollars ($530,000)
to plan, design, construct and equip a non-potable water
reuse treatment plant, including water distribution pipelines
and pumping facilities, for the Albuquerque-Bernalillo county
water utility authority in Albuquerque in Bernalillo county;
2. three hundred twenty-five thousand dollars
($325,000) to plan, design, construct, equip and improve a
water collection system from the Albuquerque-Bernalillo
county water utility authority to Carnuel in Bernalillo

county;

3. one million one hundred twenty-five thousand

dollars ($1,125,000) to acquire rights of way and to plan,

design, construct and expand water and wastewater systems for

the Albuquerque-Bernalillo county water utility authority in

the South Valley in Bernalillo county;

4. twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) to plan,

design, construct, equip and improve the Tijeras reuse
SFC/SB 240
Page 85

reservoir and pump station facility for the
Albuquerque-Bernalillo county water utility authority in
Bernalillo county;
5. two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000)
to plan, design and construct water system improvements,
including a fluoride treatment system, for the Tranquillo
Pines mutual domestic water consumers association in
Bernalillo county;
6. four hundred sixty-one thousand dollars
($461,000) to plan, design, construct and improve the Paa-Ko
wastewater treatment plant, including air blower
replacements, for the Paa-Ko communities sewer association in
Bernalillo county;
7. two hundred seventy-five thousand dollars
($275,000) to plan, design, construct, install, repair and
improve drainage infrastructure at the Pat Baca open space in
Albuquerque in Bernalillo county;

8. one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) to

plan, design and construct aquifer storage and recovery

facilities for the Albuquerque-Bernalillo county water

utility authority in Bernalillo county;

9. fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) to plan,

design, construct and improve the westside wastewater

treatment plant, including a sequencing batch reactor, in the

Pueblo of Isleta in Bernalillo county;
SFC/SB 240
Page 86

10. one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000)
to purchase and equip solid waste equipment in Catron county;
11. two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000)
to plan, design, construct, furnish and equip water system
improvements for the Quemado Lake water association in Catron
county;
12. three hundred twenty-five thousand dollars
($325,000) to acquire property, easements and rights of way
and to plan, design and construct water system improvements,
including water line replacement, for the Fambrough mutual
domestic water consumers association in Chaves county;
13. seven hundred ninety-one thousand dollars
($791,000) to plan, design, construct and improve water
systems, including water lines, meter and gate valves,
supervisory control and data acquisition systems, backup
generators and booster pumps, for the Greenfield mutual
domestic water consumers association in Chaves county;

14. five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) to

plan, design, construct and improve water and wastewater

systems, including sewer and water lines, in Hagerman in

Chaves county;

15. six hundred thousand dollars ($600,000) to

plan, design, construct and improve a wastewater treatment

plant in Hagerman in Chaves county;

16. seven hundred thousand dollars ($700,000) to
SFC/SB 240
Page 87

plan, design, construct and equip water system improvements
in Lake Arthur in Chaves county;
17. seven hundred thousand dollars ($700,000) to
plan, design, construct, equip and install a sewer system in
Lake Arthur in Chaves county;
18. two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000)
to plan, design, construct, renovate, replace, improve and
equip water and wastewater system improvements, including
wastewater lift stations and a direct transmission line from
the well house to the tank, in the Bluewater water and
sanitation district in Cibola county;
19. two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000) to
purchase and equip public works equipment, including a dump
truck, bucket truck and water truck, for the public works
department in Milan in Cibola county;
20. six hundred thousand dollars ($600,000) to
purchase and equip solid waste vehicles and equipment,

including a trash collection truck, wheel loader, trash

transfer trailer and attachments, for Raton in Colfax county;

21. one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) to

purchase and equip solid waste disposal equipment, including

dumpsters, in Springer in Colfax county;

22. two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000) to

plan, design and construct a water well at a youth farm for

the Anthony water and sanitation district in Dona Ana county;
SFC/SB 240
Page 88

23. one million five hundred fifty thousand
dollars ($1,550,000) to plan, design, construct, repair and
improve the wastewater system in the south central area in
Dona Ana county;
24. four hundred fifty thousand dollars ($450,000)
to plan, design, construct and replace water systems,
including fire hydrants, for the Garfield mutual domestic
water consumers' and mutual sewage works association in
Dona Ana county;
25. one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000)
to purchase and equip automatic meter readers and related
equipment, including protective boxes, for the Leasburg
mutual domestic water consumers association in Dona Ana
county;
26. three hundred forty-four thousand dollars
($344,000) to acquire easements and rights of way and to
plan, design, construct, purchase and equip water system

improvements, including a generator for the Valle del Rio

service area, for the lower Rio Grande public water works

authority in Dona Ana county;

27. seventy-five thousand dollars ($75,000) to

plan, design and develop a wastewater asset management plan

for the San Pablo mutual domestic water consumers association

in Dona Ana county;

28. one million dollars ($1,000,000) to acquire
SFC/SB 240
Page 89

property and to plan, design and construct flood control
improvements in Chaparral in Dona Ana county;
29. six hundred twenty-five thousand dollars
($625,000) to plan, design, construct, expand, equip and
improve a solid waste and recycling facility in Chaparral in
Dona Ana county;
30. two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000)
to plan, design, construct, renovate and equip the south
central regional wastewater treatment laboratory in La Mesa
in Dona Ana county;
31. six hundred twenty thousand dollars ($620,000)
to purchase and equip a compactor for the Corralitos regional
landfill in Las Cruces in Dona Ana county;
32. one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) to
acquire property for and to plan, design and construct a
detention pond and channel system near interstate 25 in
Radium Springs in Dona Ana county;

33. two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000) to

plan, design, construct and rehabilitate wastewater

infrastructure, including the south lift stations and force

mains, in Sunland Park in Dona Ana county;

34. one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) to

purchase, equip and install automated meter readers for the

Malaga mutual domestic water consumers and sewage works

association in Eddy county;
SFC/SB 240
Page 90

35. fifty-five thousand dollars ($55,000) to
purchase and equip heavy equipment, including a forklift, for
the Malaga mutual domestic water consumers and sewage works
association in Eddy county;
36. one million five hundred sixteen thousand
dollars ($1,516,000) to plan, design, construct and improve
water lines in the east Greene street area in Carlsbad in
Eddy county;
37. four hundred twenty thousand dollars
($420,000) to plan, design, construct and equip the Shaw
street lift station in Carlsbad in Eddy county;
38. one million dollars ($1,000,000) to plan,
design, construct, expand, equip and furnish water system
improvements, including a water transmission line connecting
Santa Clara to Hanover, in Grant county;
39. fifty-five thousand dollars ($55,000) to plan,
design, construct, equip and furnish improvements at a

recycling center for the Southwest solid waste authority in

Grant county;

40. two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000) to

plan, design, construct, furnish and equip water system

improvements for the Tyrone water and wastewater association

in Grant county;

41. fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) to purchase

and equip a utility vehicle for the Arenas Valley water
SFC/SB 240
Page 91

development association in Grant county;
42. three hundred thousand dollars ($300,000) to
plan, design, construct, equip, furnish and improve water
systems, including water meters, in Santa Clara in Grant
county;
43. seventy-five thousand dollars ($75,000) to
plan, design, construct and equip water system improvements
for the Hanover mutual domestic water consumer's association
in Santa Clara in Grant county;
44. fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) to plan,
design, construct and improve a water system, including
infrastructure, for the Sangre de Cristo regional mutual
domestic water consumers and sewage works association in
Guadalupe county;
45. one hundred five thousand dollars ($105,000)
to plan, design, construct, replace, improve and install
water system infrastructure and fire hydrants in Mosquero in

Harding county;

46. four hundred fifty thousand dollars ($450,000)

to purchase and equip solid waste trucks for Lordsburg in

Hidalgo county;

47. one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) to

plan, design, construct and improve the water system in

Virden in Hidalgo county;

48. nine hundred thousand dollars ($900,000) to
SFC/SB 240
Page 92

acquire easements and rights of way and to plan, design,
construct, replace and equip water and sewer system
improvements, including infrastructure and water lines, in
Eunice in Lea county;
49. two million dollars ($2,000,000) to plan,
design and construct improvements to the wastewater system in
Hobbs in Lea county;
50. one million seventy-one thousand eight hundred
nineteen dollars ($1,071,819) to plan, design, construct,
equip and improve wastewater systems, including a wastewater
treatment plant and infrastructure, in Lovington in Lea
county;
51. one hundred twenty-eight thousand one hundred
eighty-one dollars ($128,181) to plan, design, construct,
purchase, equip and install a solar regenerative dryer system
for the wastewater treatment plant in Lovington in Lea
county;

52. two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000)

to plan, design, construct, equip and improve water systems,

including for emergencies, for the Alpine Village sanitation

district in Lincoln county;

53. four hundred thousand dollars ($400,000) to

purchase and equip a solid waste collection truck for the

Greentree solid waste authority in Lincoln county;

54. fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) to plan,
SFC/SB 240
Page 93

design, construct, replace, purchase and install water system
improvements, including water meters, for the Nogal mutual
domestic water consumers association in Lincoln county;
55. six hundred seventy-five thousand dollars
($675,000) to plan, design, construct, purchase and install a
water storage tank in Carrizozo in Lincoln county;
56. one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) to
purchase, replace, install and equip gate valves in the
Gamerco water and sanitation district in McKinley county;
57. one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) to
plan, design, construct, install and equip wastewater system
improvements for the Yah-Ta-Hey water and sanitation district
in McKinley county;
58. five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) to
plan, design, construct, expand and equip improvements to the
wastewater treatment plant in Gallup in McKinley county;
59. two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000)

to acquire property for and to plan, design, construct, equip

and improve water and utility systems for the Agua Pura

mutual domestic water consumers and mutual sewage works

association in Mora county;

60. one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000)

to plan, design and construct improvements to the wastewater

collection system, including sewer pipes and manholes, for

the Mora mutual domestic water consumers and mutual sewage
SFC/SB 240
Page 94

works association in Mora county;
61. one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) to
plan, design and construct improvements to septic systems for
the volunteer fire department in Watrous in Mora county;
62. forty thousand dollars ($40,000) to plan,
design, construct, repair and replace water system
components, including well houses and firehouse booster
stations, for the greater Chimayo mutual domestic water
consumers association in Chimayo in Rio Arriba and Santa Fe
counties;
63. one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000)
to plan, design, construct and improve water systems,
including a pump-set, water storage and water pressure, for
the Chippeway Park water association in Otero county;
64. five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) to
plan, design and construct water system improvements,
including replacement of a water line on Branding Iron way,

for the Cloud Country West mutual domestic water consumers

association in Otero county;

65. six hundred thousand dollars ($600,000) to

plan, design, construct and improve a wastewater collection

system, including sewer lines and manholes, in Tularosa in

Otero county;

66. five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) to

plan, design, construct and install water system improvements
SFC/SB 240
Page 95

in Tularosa in Otero county;
67. two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000) to
purchase and equip vehicles and equipment, including a
roll-off truck and dumpsters, and to plan, design, construct,
furnish and improve a solid waste transfer station in Logan
in Quay county;
68. fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) to plan,
design and construct a regional water system project to
connect the Chamita mutual domestic water consumers and
sewage works association and the Agua Sana water users
association in Rio Arriba county;
69. fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) to plan,
design and construct supplemental water wells for the Chamita
mutual domestic water consumers and sewage works association
and the Agua Sana water users association in Rio Arriba
county;
70. one hundred twenty-five thousand dollars

($125,000) to purchase and equip a backup power generator for

the Coyote mutual domestic water consumers' and mutual sewage

works association in Rio Arriba county;

71. fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) to plan,

design and construct a water storage tank and control system

for La Madera community in Rio Arriba county;

72. one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000)

to plan, design, construct and improve water systems,
SFC/SB 240
Page 96

including water storage tanks, for the Lumberton mutual
domestic water consumers and sewage works association in
Rio Arriba county;
73. one hundred twenty thousand dollars ($120,000)
to plan, design, construct, purchase and equip a bulk water
dispensing station in Floyd in Roosevelt county;
74. three hundred seventy-five thousand dollars
($375,000) to plan and design a storm water drainage
comprehensive master plan for Portales in Roosevelt county;
75. three hundred fifty thousand dollars
($350,000) to purchase and equip a street sweeper for Aztec
in San Juan county;
76. five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) to
purchase, equip and install an ultraviolet light disinfection
rack, including an automatic cleaning system, for the
wastewater treatment plant in Aztec in San Juan county;
77. five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) to

plan, design, construct, improve and equip water tanks,

including cathodic protection equipment, in Bloomfield in

San Juan county;

78. seventy-five thousand dollars ($75,000) to

purchase, equip and install water meters for the Chapelle

mutual domestic consumers' association in San Miguel county;

79. fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) to plan,

design and construct a wastewater system, including a
SFC/SB 240
Page 97

connection to the Pecos wastewater treatment plant, for the
east Pecos mutual domestic water consumer's association in
San Miguel county;
80. fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) to plan,
design, construct, install and expand drinking water systems,
including radio-read water meters, for the east Pecos mutual
domestic water consumers' association in San Miguel county;
81. fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000) to plan,
design and construct water system improvements, including
deepening trenches for existing water lines, for El Valle
water alliance in La Sacatosa in San Miguel county;
82. seventy thousand dollars ($70,000) to plan,
design, construct and improve the Lower Colonias water system
for El Valle water alliance in San Miguel county;
83. fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) to plan,
design and construct an emergency well for the Gabaldon
mutual domestic water consumers' association in San Miguel

county;

84. fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) to purchase,

equip and install a pump and to plan, design, construct and

improve the water system, including tank site road

remediation, for the San Jose mutual domestic water consumers

association in San Miguel county;

85. fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000) to plan,

design and construct water system improvements for the
SFC/SB 240
Page 98

Tecolotito mutual domestic water consumers association in
San Miguel county;
86. fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) to plan,
design and construct a well for the Tecolotito mutual
domestic water consumers association in San Miguel county;
87. sixty-five thousand dollars ($65,000) to plan,
design and construct a well for Ilfeld in the El Valle water
alliance service area in San Miguel county;
88. two hundred twenty-five thousand dollars
($225,000) to plan, design, construct and improve a solid
waste transfer station, including infrastructure and
equipment, in Las Vegas in San Miguel county;
89. fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) to acquire
property and easements for and to plan, design, construct,
improve and equip water, wastewater and effluent systems in
Pecos in San Miguel county;
90. fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) to plan,

design, construct and improve the solid waste collection

center in Pecos in San Miguel county;

91. one hundred twenty-five thousand dollars

($125,000) to plan, design, construct and replace a water

service line under the Jemez river at Gallagher Springs for

the Jemez Springs domestic water association in Sandoval

county;

92. two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000) to
SFC/SB 240
Page 99

plan, design, construct and replace water lines for the Jemez
Springs domestic water association in Sandoval county;
93. seven hundred thousand dollars ($700,000) to
plan, design and construct improvements to Stallion channel,
including pedestrian facilities, for the southern Sandoval
county arroyo flood control authority in Sandoval county;
94. fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) to plan,
design, construct and equip a water storage tank in Algodones
in Sandoval county;
95. ninety-seven thousand dollars ($97,000) to
plan, design and construct a bulk water dispensing station in
Cuba in Sandoval county;
96. two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000) to
plan, design, construct and renovate the Pecos channel
stormwater conveyance for the southern Sandoval county arroyo
flood control authority in Rio Rancho in Sandoval county;
97. fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) to plan,

design, construct and renovate the Sugar channel stormwater

conveyance for the southern Sandoval county arroyo flood

control authority in Rio Rancho in Sandoval county;

98. ninety-five thousand dollars ($95,000) to

purchase and equip a mini excavator and attachments for a

water system in San Ysidro in Sandoval county;

99. one million four hundred thousand dollars

($1,400,000) to plan, design, construct, improve and equip
SFC/SB 240
Page 100

wastewater collection systems for the greater Glorieta
community mutual domestic water consumers and sewage works
association in Santa Fe county;
100. eighty-five thousand dollars ($85,000) to
plan, design and construct water distribution lines for the
county portion of the Pojoaque basin regional water system in
Santa Fe county;
101. fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) to plan,
design and construct a bulk water station, including site
improvements and installation of dispensing infrastructure
and metering systems, in Santa Fe county;
102. two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000) for a
feasibility study to evaluate requirements for extending
water infrastructure for small-scale applications in Santa Fe
county;
103. three hundred seventy-five thousand dollars
($375,000) to plan, design, construct and improve water,

sewer and road infrastructure for the Dos Arroyos housing

development on Cerrillos road in Santa Fe in Santa Fe county;

104. six hundred thousand dollars ($600,000) to

plan, design, construct and expand the wastewater treatment

system, including treatment plant repairs and improvements,

for residential and commercial districts in Elephant Butte in

Sierra county;

105. two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000) to
SFC/SB 240
Page 101

plan, design, construct, purchase, equip and install a
geographic information system, including hardware, mapping
and information technology, for the San Antonio mutual
domestic water consumers association in Socorro county;
106. one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) to
plan, design, construct, repair, replace and improve
infrastructure, including a water storage tank, well houses,
water meters and the main water line, for the Chamisal mutual
domestic water consumers association in Taos county;
107. three hundred thousand dollars ($300,000) to
plan, design and construct sewer improvements for El Prado
water and sanitation district in Taos county;
108. one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000)
to plan, design, construct and equip water lines, including
well connections to a community water system, for the Llano
Quemado mutual domestic water consumers association in Taos
county;

109. one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) to

plan, design, construct and improve a water system for the

Vadito mutual domestic water consumers association in Taos

county;

110. twenty thousand dollars ($20,000) to acquire

water rights for the West Rim mutual domestic water users'

association in Taos county;

111. four hundred twenty-five thousand dollars
SFC/SB 240
Page 102

($425,000) to plan, design, construct and equip a septage
receiving station in Taos in Taos county;
112. fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) to purchase
and equip meter reading systems in the Homestead estates and
Sunset Acres areas for the Estancia, Moriarty, Willard and
Torrance regional water association in Torrance county;
113. four million dollars ($4,000,000) to plan,
design, construct and improve pipeline and water systems,
including controls and storage, for the Melody Ranch area in
Torrance county;
114. fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) to plan,
design, construct and expand a septage lagoon for the
Estancia Valley solid waste authority in Torrance county;
115. one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) to
purchase and equip a mobile shredder for use at the Estancia
Valley regional landfill and at illegal dump sites in the
Estancia Valley solid waste authority in Torrance county;

116. one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) to

plan, design, construct and improve the water system,

including meter upgrades and the pump house area, in Encino

in Torrance county;

117. fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) to plan,

design, construct and improve the water system in Estancia in

Torrance county;

118. fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) to plan,
SFC/SB 240
Page 103

design, construct and equip wastewater system improvements in
Estancia in Torrance county;
119. two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000)
to plan and design a survey of the Bosque drain in Belen in
Valencia county;
120. eight hundred thousand dollars ($800,000) to
plan, design, construct and replace the Rosedale lift station
in Belen in Valencia county; and
121. eight hundred thousand dollars ($800,000) to
plan, design and construct an expansion of the west side
booster pump station in Belen in Valencia county.
SECTION 44. DEPARTMENT OF FINANCE AND ADMINISTRATION
PROJECT--GENERAL FUND.--Three hundred seventy-five thousand
dollars ($375,000) is appropriated from the general fund to
the department of finance and administration to plan, design
and construct affordable cottage housing in the International
district in Albuquerque in Bernalillo county.

SECTION 45. CHILD CARE FACILITY REVOLVING LOAN FUND--

GENERAL FUND.--Ten million dollars ($10,000,000) is

appropriated from the general fund to the child care facility

revolving loan fund managed by the New Mexico finance

authority statewide.

SECTION 46. INDIAN AFFAIRS DEPARTMENT PROJECTS--GENERAL

FUND.--The following amounts are appropriated from the

general fund to the Indian affairs department for the
SFC/SB 240
Page 104

following purposes:
1. three hundred ninety-five thousand dollars
($395,000) to plan, design, construct, repair, expand,
furnish, equip and improve buildings and facilities at the
Indian pueblo cultural center in Albuquerque in Bernalillo
county;
2. four hundred sixty thousand dollars ($460,000)
to plan, design, construct, repair, equip and improve public
entrances at the Indian pueblo cultural center in Albuquerque
in Bernalillo county;
3. six hundred seventy-five thousand dollars
($675,000) to plan, design, construct, restore and renovate
the historic village in the Pueblo of Isleta in Bernalillo
county;
4. one hundred twenty-five thousand dollars
($125,000) to purchase and equip security and safety
equipment for a community school in the To'hajiilee chapter

of the Navajo Nation in Bernalillo county;

5. four hundred thousand dollars ($400,000) to

plan, design, construct, expand, furnish, equip and renovate

a dental clinic at a health facility in the To'hajiilee

chapter of the Navajo Nation in Bernalillo county;

6. one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) to

plan, design and construct a pre-kindergarten facility for

To'hajiilee community school in the To'hajiilee chapter of
SFC/SB 240
Page 105

the Navajo Nation in Bernalillo county;
7. one million one hundred twenty-five thousand
dollars ($1,125,000) to plan, design, construct, repair,
improve, furnish and equip a swimming pool facility at the
Pueblo of Acoma in Cibola county;
8. one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000)
to plan, design, construct and equip athletic fields at
middle and elementary schools in the Pueblo of Laguna in
Cibola county;
9. forty-five thousand dollars ($45,000) to plan,
design, construct and expand a fleet facility in the Pueblo
of Laguna in Cibola county;
10. one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000)
to purchase and equip a front-end loader for the Ramah
chapter of the Navajo Nation in Cibola county;
11. four hundred thousand dollars ($400,000) to
purchase and equip vehicles for the tribal police department

in the Ramah chapter of the Navajo Nation in Cibola county;

12. two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000)

to purchase and equip rugged terrain vehicles for the Ramah

chapter of the Navajo Nation in Cibola county;

13. eight hundred fifty thousand dollars

($850,000) to plan, design, construct, furnish and equip a

fire station for the Fort Sill Apache Tribe in Luna county;

14. three hundred fifty thousand dollars
SFC/SB 240
Page 106

($350,000) to purchase, equip and install a trash compactor
and bin for the Baahaali Chichiltah regional waste collection
and recycling center in the Baahaali chapter of the Navajo
Nation in McKinley county;
15. two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000) to
purchase, furnish and equip heavy equipment, including a
motor grader, for the Baca/Prewitt chapter of the Navajo
Nation in McKinley county;
16. four hundred fifteen thousand dollars
($415,000) to plan, design and construct a recreation park
and walking trail in the Becenti chapter of the Navajo Nation
in McKinley county;
17. one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) to
plan, design, construct, renovate, equip and furnish the
chapter house in the Casamero Lake chapter of the Navajo
Nation in McKinley county;
18. one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000)

to purchase and equip skid steers for the Chichiltah chapter

of the Navajo Nation in McKinley county;

19. one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) to

plan, design and construct a warehouse for the Chichiltah

chapter of the Navajo Nation in McKinley county;

20. two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000) to

plan, design, construct and equip a chapter house in the

Church Rock chapter of the Navajo Nation in McKinley county;
SFC/SB 240
Page 107

21. two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000) to
purchase and equip heavy equipment, including a dump truck,
for the Crownpoint chapter of the Navajo Nation in McKinley
county;
22. three hundred thousand dollars ($300,000) to
plan, design and construct water systems, including water
lines, in the Iyanbito chapter of the Navajo Nation in
McKinley county;
23. two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000) to
plan, design, construct and install an electrical power line
and residential wiring for the Manuelito chapter of the
Navajo Nation in McKinley county;
24. one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) to
plan, design, construct and improve the sewer lagoon in the
Manuelito chapter of the Navajo Nation in McKinley county;
25. one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) to
plan, design, construct and renovate a veterans' building in

the Manuelito chapter of the Navajo Nation in McKinley

county;

26. two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000)

to plan, design, construct, furnish and equip a multipurpose

complex for the Mexican Springs chapter of the Navajo Nation

in McKinley county;

27. two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000)

to plan, design, construct and equip a warehouse complex in
SFC/SB 240
Page 108

the Pinedale chapter of the Navajo Nation in McKinley county;
28. twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) to
purchase and equip farming machinery for the Red Lake 18
chapter of the Navajo Nation in McKinley county;
29. one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) to
plan, design, construct, install and equip residential
bathroom additions in the Smith Lake chapter of the Navajo
Nation in McKinley county;
30. two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000) to
plan, design and construct a regional water supply system for
the Thoreau, Casamero Lake, Smith Lake and Baca/Prewitt
chapters of the Navajo Nation in McKinley county;
31. one million fifty thousand dollars
($1,050,000) to plan, design and construct a public safety
complex in the Tohatchi chapter of the Navajo Nation in
McKinley county;
32. two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000)

to plan, design, construct, improve and equip utility

infrastructure, including power line extensions, in the

Tsayatoh chapter of the Navajo Nation in McKinley county;

33. one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) to

plan, design and construct bathroom additions, including

septic tanks and drain field systems, for homes in the

Tse'ii'ahi' chapter of the Navajo Nation in McKinley county;

34. seven hundred fifty thousand dollars
SFC/SB 240
Page 109

($750,000) to plan, design, construct, equip and improve a
multisports complex in the Pueblo of Zuni in McKinley county;
35. seven hundred thirty-five thousand dollars
($735,000) to plan, design, construct, furnish, equip and
improve the Zuni veterans' memorial park visitors' center in
the Pueblo of Zuni in McKinley county;
36. one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) to
purchase and install placards for chapters in the Navajo
Nation in McKinley and San Juan counties;
37. one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) to
acquire rights of way for and to plan, design and construct
water system improvements for the regional Beacon Bisti N9
lateral water project for the Lake Valley chapter of the
Navajo Nation in McKinley and San Juan counties;
38. five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) to
plan, design, construct and equip athletic fields for the
Mescalero Apache Tribe in Otero county;

39. seven hundred thousand dollars ($700,000) to

plan, design, construct, furnish and equip an emergency

management building for the Mescalero Apache tribe in Otero

county;

40. twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) to

purchase and equip vehicles and to plan, design, construct,

equip, furnish and improve the department of youth center,

including infrastructure, in the Jicarilla Apache Nation in
SFC/SB 240
Page 110

Rio Arriba county;
41. six hundred seventy-five thousand dollars
($675,000) to plan, design, construct, equip and improve
water systems, including emergency water storage facilities
and ground water wells, in the Jicarilla Apache Nation in
Rio Arriba county;
42. three million three hundred thousand dollars
($3,300,000) to plan, design, construct, furnish and equip a
community wellness and intergenerational center at the
educational complex in Ohkay Owingeh in Rio Arriba county;
43. one hundred eighty thousand dollars ($180,000)
to plan, design, construct and renovate a fire station in the
Pueblo of Santa Clara in Rio Arriba county;
44. one hundred thirteen thousand dollars
($113,000) to plan, design, construct and equip a helipad in
the Beclabito chapter of the Navajo Nation in San Juan
county;

45. three hundred thousand dollars ($300,000) to

plan, design, construct, equip and install a fire suppression

system at a multipurpose facility in the Crystal chapter of

the Navajo Nation in San Juan county;

46. one million six hundred sixty-five thousand

dollars ($1,665,000) to plan, design, construct, equip and

improve buildings and grounds, including drainage,

accessibility and infrastructure, at Navajo preparatory
SFC/SB 240
Page 111

school in Farmington in San Juan county;
47. two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000) to
plan, design, construct, repair, equip, furnish and improve
housing and facilities, including infrastructure, at Navajo
preparatory school in Farmington in San Juan county;
48. one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) to
plan, design, construct, renovate, furnish and equip the
Kirtland food distribution building, including electrical and
sewer lines, for the Navajo Nation in Kirtland in San Juan
county;
49. one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) to
plan, design, construct, replace, equip and improve heating,
ventilation and air conditioning systems in the Naschitti
chapter of the Navajo Nation in San Juan county;
50. one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000)
to plan, design, construct, furnish and equip a multipurpose
building in the Naschitti chapter of the Navajo Nation in

San Juan county;

51. two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000)

to plan, design, construct, equip, improve and furnish a

transfer station in the Red Valley chapter of the Navajo

Nation in San Juan county;

52. three hundred thousand dollars ($300,000) to

plan, design, construct and equip heating, ventilation and

air conditioning systems in the veterans memorial building
SFC/SB 240
Page 112

and chapter house in the Tse Alnaozti'i' chapter of the
Navajo Nation in San Juan county;
53. one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) to
acquire easements and rights of way and to plan, design and
construct a fenced community and veterans cemetery in the
Tse Alnaozti'i' chapter of the Navajo Nation in San Juan
county;
54. two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000)
to plan, design, construct, expand and improve the community
cemetery, including infrastructure, in the Shiprock chapter
of the Navajo Nation in San Juan county;
55. two hundred forty-four thousand dollars
($244,000) to plan, design, construct, furnish and equip a
domestic violence shelter for women and children in the
Shiprock chapter of the Navajo Nation in San Juan county;
56. fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) to purchase
and equip a wind roller swather for the Tse'Daa'Kaan chapter

of the Navajo Nation in San Juan county;

57. two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000)

to plan, design, construct, furnish, equip and renovate a

chapter house, including interior facilities, grounds, a

parking lot and utility infrastructure, in the Two Grey Hills

chapter of the Navajo Nation in San Juan county;

58. four hundred fifty thousand dollars ($450,000)

to plan, design, construct, equip and install a solid waste
SFC/SB 240
Page 113

transfer station in the Pueblo of Cochiti in Sandoval county;
59. five hundred fifty thousand dollars ($550,000)
to purchase and equip a bore machine for the Pueblo of Jemez
in Sandoval county;
60. seven hundred twenty thousand dollars
($720,000) to purchase and equip vacuum trucks for the Pueblo
of Jemez in Sandoval county;
61. five hundred seventy-five thousand dollars
($575,000) to plan, design, construct and improve a historic
ditch in the Pueblo of San Felipe in Sandoval county;
62. twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) to
plan, design, construct and improve farm services facilities
and infrastructure in the Pueblo of San Felipe in Sandoval
county;
63. twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) to
purchase and equip a sanitation truck for the Pueblo of
San Felipe in Sandoval county;

64. four hundred fifty thousand dollars ($450,000)

to plan, design, construct and improve the wastewater

treatment plant in the Pueblo of San Felipe in Sandoval

county;

65. four million five hundred thousand dollars

($4,500,000) to plan, design, construct, equip and furnish a

health care facility in the Pueblo of Sandia in Sandoval

county;
SFC/SB 240
Page 114

66. fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) to plan,
design, construct, repair and renovate housing in the Pueblo
of Santa Ana in Sandoval county;
67. one million two hundred thousand dollars
($1,200,000) to plan, design, construct, renovate, repair and
improve Tamaya historical village housing at the Pueblo of
Santa Ana in Sandoval county;
68. two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000) to
purchase and equip vehicles and equipment for the tribal
utility authority in the Pueblo of Santo Domingo in Sandoval
county;
69. one hundred twenty thousand dollars ($120,000)
to plan, design, construct, purchase, equip and improve water
system infrastructure, including a flushing system, in the
Pueblo of Santo Domingo in Sandoval county;
70. six million dollars ($6,000,000) to plan,
design, construct, renovate, replace, equip and furnish a

wastewater system, including lift stations, at the Pueblo of

Santo Domingo in Sandoval county;

71. one hundred forty-nine thousand dollars

($149,000) to plan, design and construct housing and

infrastructure in the Pueblo of Zia in Sandoval county;

72. three hundred thousand dollars ($300,000) to

plan, design, construct and improve the Zia Lake recreation

area, including restrooms, a pavilion and parking facilities,
SFC/SB 240
Page 115

in the Pueblo of Zia in Sandoval county;
73. four million dollars ($4,000,000) to plan,
design and construct phases 1 and 2 of the Eagle Ridge
project, including utility installation and road work, for
the Pueblo of Pojoaque in Santa Fe county;
74. two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000) to
plan and design a tribal court complex in the Pueblo of Nambe
in Santa Fe county;
75. one million one hundred ten thousand dollars
($1,110,000) to plan, design, construct, renovate, furnish
and equip a wellness center in the Pueblo of Pojoaque in
Santa Fe county;
76. four hundred twenty-five thousand dollars
($425,000) to purchase and install equipment for the natural
resources department in the Pueblo of San Ildefonso in
Santa Fe county;
77. three hundred thousand dollars ($300,000) to

purchase and equip heavy equipment and to plan, design and

construct a heavy equipment shelter for the transportation

department in the Pueblo of San Ildefonso in Santa Fe county;

78. two million dollars ($2,000,000) to plan,

design, construct, improve, equip and furnish the library,

including a learning center expansion, in the Pueblo of

San Ildefonso in Santa Fe county;

79. one hundred thirty thousand dollars ($130,000)
SFC/SB 240
Page 116

to plan, design, construct and replace security systems,
including fencing, at the Santa Fe Indian school in Santa Fe
in Santa Fe county;
80. two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000) to
plan, design, construct and equip an industrial and
vocational arts classroom in Alamo Navajo community school in
the Alamo chapter of the Navajo Nation in Socorro county;
81. five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) to
plan, design, construct, expand and rehabilitate a fishing
pond, including bank stabilization, shade and water
temperature mitigation, raceway and aquatic infrastructure
improvements and accessibility, in the Pueblo of Picuris in
Taos county;
82. four hundred eighty thousand dollars
($480,000) to plan, design, construct and equip a heavy
equipment storage and maintenance building in the Pueblo of
Picuris in Taos county;

83. one hundred twenty-five thousand dollars

($125,000) to plan, design, construct, repair and improve

historic village buildings in the Pueblo of Taos in Taos

county; and

84. four hundred thousand dollars ($400,000) to

plan, design, construct, furnish and equip buildings for game

wardens and wildland fire fighting for the Pueblo of Taos in

Taos county.
SFC/SB 240
Page 117

SECTION 47. INTERSTATE STREAM COMMISSION PROJECTS--
GENERAL FUND.--The following amounts are appropriated from
the general fund to the interstate stream commission for the
following purposes:
1. seventy-five thousand dollars ($75,000) to
plan, design, construct and equip improvements to acequias in
the middle Rio Grande conservancy district in Bernalillo
county;
2. fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) to purchase
and equip an excavator for the Pleasanton eastside ditch
association in Catron county;
3. one hundred twenty-five thousand dollars
($125,000) to purchase and equip a mini-excavator, including
tools and equipment, and to plan, design, construct and
improve infrastructure in the acequia de Los Luceros in Mora
county;
4. twenty thousand dollars ($20,000) to plan,

design and construct improvements to the acequia de

Rainsville norte in Mora county;

5. ten thousand dollars ($10,000) to plan, design,

construct, repair and improve the acequia de La Lomita in

Santa Fe and Rio Arriba counties;

6. fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) to plan,

design, construct and equip improvements to the acequia de

los Herreras in Santa Cruz in Rio Arriba and Santa Fe
SFC/SB 240
Page 118

counties;
7. one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000)
to purchase and equip a compact excavator and a utility
trailer for the acequia de Alcalde in Rio Arriba county;
8. forty thousand dollars ($40,000) to plan,
design, construct, equip and repair the acequia de La Canada
Ancha, including flood damaged infrastructure, in Rio Arriba
county;
9. one hundred ten thousand dollars ($110,000) to
plan, design, construct and improve the acequia de La Otra
Vanda (Griego) in the Ancones area in Rio Arriba county;
10. sixty thousand dollars ($60,000) to plan,
design, construct and install improvements, including
rehabilitation, to the acequia de La Plaza de Dixon in
Rio Arriba county;
11. one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) to
plan, design, construct and improve the acequia del Bosque,

including a presa diversion dam and a water control

structure, in Rio Arriba county;

12. one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) to

plan, design and construct a diversion dam for the Jose V.

Martinez ditch in Rio Arriba county;

13. fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) to plan,

design and construct improvements to the Polvadera number one

ditch for the Polvadera acequia number one association in
SFC/SB 240
Page 119

Canones in Rio Arriba county;
14. one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) to
plan, design, construct, renovate, repair and improve the
acequia de La Mesa Prieta in Ojo Caliente in Rio Arriba
county;
15. one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000)
to plan, design, construct and equip an irrigation project in
former common land for the San Joaquin del Rio de Chama land
grant-merced in Rio Arriba county;
16. six hundred thousand dollars ($600,000) to
plan, design, construct, repair and improve the Citizens
ditch, including stabilization measures and lining, near the
outlet of tunnel three for the Bloomfield irrigation district
in San Juan county;
17. four hundred thousand dollars ($400,000) to
plan, design, construct, repair and improve ditch banks in
the Bloomfield irrigation district in San Juan county;

18. one hundred seventy-five thousand dollars

($175,000) to plan, design, construct and install an

irrigation conservation piping system in the northern section

of the Hillside irrigation ditch in San Juan county;

19. fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) to plan,

design, construct, repair and improve the acequia de Los

Seguras, including bank stabilization, lining, culverts and

head gates, in the north San Isidro area of San Miguel
SFC/SB 240
Page 120

county;
20. sixty thousand dollars ($60,000) to plan,
design and construct improvements to La Fragua ditch in
San Miguel county;
21. sixty thousand dollars ($60,000) to plan,
design, construct and improve the Round House ditch in
Las Vegas in San Miguel county;
22. one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) to
plan, design, construct and equip water wells, test wells,
water storage tanks, water lines and a building for las
acequias de Placitas water cooperative in Sandoval county;
23. ten thousand dollars ($10,000) to plan,
design, construct and improve the acequia de La Puebla,
including a diversion dam, in Santa Fe county;
24. fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) to plan,
design and construct improvements to the acequia de Los
Cuarteles in Cundiyo in Santa Fe county;

25. ten thousand dollars ($10,000) to purchase and

equip heavy equipment, including a backhoe, for the acequia

de Los Fresquez in Santa Fe county;

26. ten thousand dollars ($10,000) to plan, design

and construct diversion dam improvements, including head

gates, to the acequia de Los Maestas in Santa Fe county;

27. ten thousand dollars ($10,000) to plan,

design and construct improvements to the acequia de Los
SFC/SB 240
Page 121

Ortizes-Cuyamungue in Santa Fe county;
28. ten thousand dollars ($10,000) to plan, design
and construct improvements to the acequia de Los Ranchos de
Chimayo in Santa Fe county;
29. sixty thousand dollars ($60,000) to plan,
design and construct improvements to the acequia de Sombrillo
in Santa Fe county;
30. fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) to purchase
and equip excavation equipment, including a trackhoe, for the
acequia de Sombrillo in Santa Fe county;
31. ten thousand dollars ($10,000) to plan,
design, construct and improve the acequia del Rancho,
including a diversion dam, in Santa Fe county;
32. ten thousand dollars ($10,000) to plan, design
and construct pipeline improvements for the acequia Larga de
Jacona in Santa Fe county;
33. one hundred forty thousand dollars ($140,000)

to plan, design, construct, repair and equip the Rio en Medio

ditches for the Rio en Medio ditch association in Santa Fe

county;

34. one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) to

plan, design, construct and improve drainage for the arroyo

Torreon in Santa Fe in Santa Fe county;

35. one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000)

to purchase and equip vehicles and heavy equipment, including
SFC/SB 240
Page 122

a backhoe and mower, for La Joya acequia in Socorro county;
36. one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) to
purchase a schoolhouse and to plan, design, construct and
renovate a building for the acequia Arriba de El Valle in
Taos county;
37. forty thousand dollars ($40,000) to plan,
design, construct, repair and equip ditch improvements,
including head gates, for the acequia Madre de Tio Gervacio
in Taos county;
38. seventy thousand dollars ($70,000) to purchase
and equip heavy equipment, including a skid steer loader, for
the acequias de Chamisal y Ojito in Taos county; and
39. one hundred eight thousand eight hundred
eighty-two dollars ($108,882) to plan, design and construct
improvements, including piping, for the Torreon acequia
association in Torrance county.
SECTION 48. LOCAL GOVERNMENT DIVISION OF THE DEPARTMENT

OF FINANCE AND ADMINISTRATION PROJECTS--GENERAL FUND.--The

following amounts are appropriated from the general fund to

the local government division of the department of finance

and administration for the following purposes:

1. sixty thousand dollars ($60,000) to acquire

land and rights of way for and to plan, design, construct,

equip, repair and improve medians on Westside boulevard from

Golf Course road NW to Wellsprings avenue SE in Albuquerque
SFC/SB 240
Page 123

and Rio Rancho in Bernalillo and Sandoval counties;
2. one million three hundred seventy thousand
dollars ($1,370,000) to plan, design, construct, renovate,
furnish and equip a multigenerational facility in the near
north valley in Bernalillo county;
3. one million eighty thousand dollars
($1,080,000) to plan, design, construct, expand, equip and
improve animal care service facilities in Bernalillo county;
4. five hundred ninety-five thousand dollars
($595,000) to plan and design a behavioral health residential
program and clinic in the Atrisco area of Bernalillo county;
5. three hundred twenty thousand dollars
($320,000) to plan, design, construct, furnish, equip and
improve El Centro familiar and Seybold village housing
complexes in Bernalillo county;
6. fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) to plan and
design a trails and connection plan, including acequias, bike

lanes and bridges connecting neighborhoods to the bosque, in

Bernalillo county;

7. one hundred twenty-five thousand dollars

($125,000) to plan, design and construct a perimeter multi-

use trail at John Adams middle school in Bernalillo county;

8. eight hundred forty-five thousand dollars

($845,000) to plan, design, construct, furnish and equip a

behavioral health care facility for immigrant and refugee
SFC/SB 240
Page 124

families in Bernalillo county;
9. three hundred fifty thousand dollars ($350,000)
to plan, design, construct and equip a roots room for a
community food hub in Bernalillo county;
10. four hundred forty-five thousand dollars
($445,000) to plan, design, construct, renovate, furnish and
equip a community facility, including infrastructure,
accessibility, exterior stucco and heating, ventilation and
air conditioning systems, for people with developmental
disabilities in Bernalillo county;
11. two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000)
to plan, design, construct, equip and furnish facility
improvements, including bleachers, shade structures, concrete
and common areas, at the East Mountain baseball complex in
Bernalillo county;
12. five hundred sixty thousand dollars ($560,000)
to purchase and equip a vehicle and to purchase and install

sound and lighting equipment, information technology, a

portable dance floor, sewing machines, musical instruments

and furnishings for a flamenco program in Bernalillo county;

13. seven hundred seventy-five thousand dollars

($775,000) to acquire buildings and to plan, design,

construct, improve and equip commercial and non-commercial

teaching kitchens and a food business incubator in Bernalillo

county;
SFC/SB 240
Page 125

14. one hundred twenty-five thousand dollars
($125,000) to plan, design, construct, furnish, equip and
improve fields and facilities at the Paradise Hills baseball
complex, including bleachers, shade structures, lighting and
landscaping, in Bernalillo county;
15. three hundred five thousand dollars ($305,000)
to purchase musical equipment and information technology,
including instruments, stage equipment and office
furnishings, for a children's music education program in
Bernalillo county;
16. twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) to
purchase vehicles for and to furnish and install equipment,
including simulators and related information technology, at a
workforce training facility in Bernalillo county;
17. forty thousand dollars ($40,000) to plan,
design, construct, furnish and equip a youth athletic
training facility in Bernalillo county;

18. seven hundred seventy-five thousand eight

hundred dollars ($775,800) to plan, design, construct,

furnish, equip and renovate an advanced training law

enforcement facility in Bernalillo county;

19. one hundred seventy-five thousand dollars

($175,000) to plan, design, construct, equip, furnish and

improve parks, including buildings, fields, accessibility,

roads, parking, pedestrian circulation, security fencing,
SFC/SB 240
Page 126

lighting, landscaping and irrigation, in the South Valley in
Bernalillo county;
20. one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) to
plan, design, construct, furnish and equip improvements to
the Sedillo Ridge open space, including a trailhead, parking,
shade structures and a picnic area, in Bernalillo county;
21. one million four hundred ninety thousand
dollars ($1,490,000) to purchase, equip and install crime
prevention technology for the county sheriff's office in
Bernalillo county;
22. fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) to purchase
and equip vehicles for the sheriff's office in Bernalillo
county;
23. two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000)
to plan, design, construct, furnish and equip improvements to
urban open spaces and community alleys in Bernalillo county;
24. six hundred fifteen thousand dollars

($615,000) to plan, design, construct, expand, furnish, equip

and improve a youth services center facility, including a

nursing station, in Bernalillo county;

25. four hundred ninety-five thousand dollars

($495,000) to plan, design, construct, improve, furnish and

equip the bugarium at the ABQ BioPark in Albuquerque in

Bernalillo county;

26. two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000)
SFC/SB 240
Page 127

to acquire land and rights of way for and to plan, design,
construct, repair, renovate, furnish and equip affordable
housing in Albuquerque in Bernalillo county;
27. two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000) to
plan, design, construct, equip and improve baseball
facilities and accessibility at baseball fields on Alameda
Park drive in Albuquerque in Bernalillo county;
28. one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) to
plan, design, construct, equip, repair and improve Alamosa
park, including the skate park, in Albuquerque in Bernalillo
county;
29. two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000) to
acquire rights of way and to plan, design, construct, equip,
rehabilitate and improve Altura park in Albuquerque in
Bernalillo county;
30. two hundred seventy-five thousand dollars
($275,000) to plan, design, construct, equip, furnish and

improve the Anderson Abruzzo international balloon museum,

including grounds and exhibits, in Albuquerque in Bernalillo

county;

31. one million four hundred fifty thousand

dollars ($1,450,000) to acquire land and rights of way for

and to plan, design, construct, furnish, equip and improve an

Asian, Pacific Islander and Native Hawaiian community center

in Albuquerque in Bernalillo county;
SFC/SB 240
Page 128

32. four hundred thousand dollars ($400,000) to
plan, design, construct, equip and improve Arroyo del Oso
golf course in Albuquerque in Bernalillo county;
33. one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) to
plan, design, construct, purchase, equip and install
improvements at Arroyo del Oso park in Albuquerque in
Bernalillo county;
34. one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) to
plan, design, construct, install, furnish, equip and renovate
Avalon park, including playgrounds, shade structures,
drinking fountains, sanitation and lighting, in Albuquerque
in Bernalillo county;
35. eighty thousand dollars ($80,000) to plan,
design, construct, purchase, equip and install improvements
at Aztec park in Albuquerque in Bernalillo county;
36. two hundred ten thousand dollars ($210,000) to
plan, design, construct, purchase and install audio and

visual equipment and associated infrastructure at Balloon

Fiesta park in Albuquerque in Bernalillo county;

37. one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) to

plan, design, construct, furnish, equip and improve the golf

and event center, including roofs and decking, plumbing,

kitchen appliances and flooring, at Balloon Fiesta park in

Albuquerque in Bernalillo county;

38. four hundred thirty-five thousand dollars
SFC/SB 240
Page 129

($435,000) to plan, design, construct, furnish, equip and
improve Balloon Fiesta park, including accessibility,
stabilization of east and south escarpments and viewing and
vendor platforms, in Albuquerque in Bernalillo county;
39. two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000)
to plan, design, construct, equip and improve the baseball
complex, including playing fields and batting cages, at
Balloon Fiesta park in Albuquerque in Bernalillo county;
40. twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) to
plan, design, construct, purchase, furnish and equip
restrooms and related infrastructure at Balloon Fiesta park
in Albuquerque in Bernalillo county;
41. four hundred twenty-five thousand dollars
($425,000) to plan, design, construct, improve and equip
Barelas park in Albuquerque in Bernalillo county;
42. eight hundred thousand dollars ($800,000) to
acquire rights of way for and to plan, design, construct,

improve and equip Bel Air-Miramontes park in Albuquerque in

Bernalillo county;

43. three hundred fifty thousand dollars

($350,000) to plan, design, construct, equip, install,

renovate and improve Bennie Aragon park in Albuquerque in

Bernalillo county;

44. seventy-five thousand dollars ($75,000) to

plan, design, construct, purchase, equip and install
SFC/SB 240
Page 130

improvements at Bennie Hargrove park in Albuquerque in
Bernalillo county;
45. one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000)
to plan, design, construct, equip, repair and improve Betsy
Patterson pool and facilities in Albuquerque in Bernalillo
county;
46. two hundred twenty-five thousand dollars
($225,000) to acquire rights of way for and to plan, design,
construct, equip, rehabilitate and improve bicycle and
pedestrian crossings and trail improvements in the area
bounded by Eubank boulevard NE, Lomas boulevard, interstate
25 and Montgomery boulevard in Albuquerque in Bernalillo
county;
47. twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) to
plan, design, construct, purchase, equip, install and improve
navigational systems and signage on bike trails in
Albuquerque in Bernalillo county;

48. fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) to plan,

design, construct, improve and equip the Calabacillas arroyo

trail in Albuquerque in Bernalillo county;

49. thirty thousand dollars ($30,000) to plan,

design, construct, replace, furnish, equip and improve

buildings and grounds, including electrical, security and

heating, ventilation and air conditioning systems, furniture

and carpeting, at the Central and Unser library in
SFC/SB 240
Page 131

Albuquerque in Bernalillo county;
50. twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) to
plan, design, construct, purchase, equip and install
improvements at Chelwood park in Albuquerque in Bernalillo
county;
51. six hundred twenty-five thousand dollars
($625,000) to plan, design, construct, equip, furnish and
improve Cherry Hills library in Albuquerque in Bernalillo
county;
52. one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) to
purchase, install, repair and improve technology for the
Albuquerque community safety department in Albuquerque in
Bernalillo county;
53. five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) to
acquire land for and to plan, design, construct, furnish,
equip and improve commercial spaces, including motels and
office buildings, for housing units in Albuquerque in

Bernalillo county;

54. three hundred thousand dollars ($300,000) to

plan, design, construct, furnish and equip the Conway Wood

northwest multigenerational center in Albuquerque in

Bernalillo county;

55. four hundred thousand dollars ($400,000) to

plan, design, construct, install, furnish and equip a park

for the Crestview Bluff SW neighborhood in Albuquerque in
SFC/SB 240
Page 132

Bernalillo county;
56. three hundred seventy-five thousand dollars
($375,000) to plan, design, construct, equip and improve
Daniel Webster park in Albuquerque in Bernalillo county;
57. two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000) to
plan, design, construct, purchase, equip and install
improvements at Dulcinea park in Albuquerque in Bernalillo
county;
58. one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000)
to plan, design, construct, improve and equip facilities at
east San Jose pool in Albuquerque in Bernalillo county;
59. seventy-five thousand dollars ($75,000) to
plan, design, construct, install, purchase, equip and improve
facilities at Eisenhower pool and splash pad in Albuquerque
in Bernalillo county;
60. seventy-five thousand dollars ($75,000) to
plan, design, construct, purchase, install, furnish and equip

improvements to the Elena Gallegos open space in Albuquerque

in Bernalillo county;

61. one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) to

purchase, equip, repair and improve heating, ventilation and

air conditioning systems at fire rescue facilities in

Albuquerque in Bernalillo county;

62. two hundred twenty-five thousand dollars

($225,000) to purchase, repair, equip and improve
SFC/SB 240
Page 133

rehabilitation vehicles for Albuquerque fire rescue in
Albuquerque in Bernalillo county;
63. one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) to
purchase, equip, repair and improve a fire rescue transport
unit for the southeast quadrant in Albuquerque in Bernalillo
county;
64. five hundred eighty-five thousand dollars
($585,000) to purchase, equip, repair and improve a fire
engine for the northeast quadrant of Albuquerque in
Bernalillo county;
65. five hundred fifty thousand dollars ($550,000)
to purchase, equip, repair and improve a fire engine for the
northwest quadrant of Albuquerque in Bernalillo county;
66. three hundred seventy-five thousand dollars
($375,000) to plan, design, construct, renovate, furnish,
equip and improve fire rescue training academy facilities in
Albuquerque in Bernalillo county;

67. two hundred seventy-five thousand dollars

($275,000) to acquire land for and to plan, design,

construct, furnish, equip, repair and improve a fire station

in the northwest quadrant of Albuquerque in Bernalillo

county;

68. one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000)

to plan, design, construct, equip and improve facilities at

fire rescue station 8 in Albuquerque in Bernalillo county;
SFC/SB 240
Page 134

69. three million five hundred thousand dollars
($3,500,000) to plan, design, construct, furnish and equip a
health and wellness facility for firefighters, including
equipment for pilates and dahn jon, in Albuquerque in
Bernalillo county;
70. one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) to
plan, design, construct, equip and furnish a behavioral and
primary health care facility at the Gateway center in
Albuquerque in Bernalillo county;
71. fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) to plan,
design, construct, improve and equip an outdoor space and a
support services annex at Gateway West shelter in Albuquerque
in Bernalillo county;
72. one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000)
to plan, design, construct, purchase, equip and install
improvements at Geneiva's arroyo and the Lowell greenway in
Albuquerque in Bernalillo county;

73. two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000)

to plan, design, construct, furnish, equip and improve Hahn

park in Albuquerque in Bernalillo county;

74. one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) to

plan, design, construct, equip and improve a linear park on

property owned by the middle Rio Grande conservancy district

in the North Valley area of Albuquerque in Bernalillo county;

75. forty thousand dollars ($40,000) to purchase
SFC/SB 240
Page 135

and install equipment for and to plan, design, construct and
improve Hazeldine park in Albuquerque in Bernalillo county;
76. two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000) to
plan, design, construct, equip, install, repair and improve
facilities, including roof replacement and classroom
renovation, at Highland pool in Albuquerque in Bernalillo
county;
77. three hundred seventy thousand dollars
($370,000) to plan, design, construct, furnish, equip,
install and improve park facilities, including playgrounds,
shade structures, benches and lighting, at a family homeless
shelter facility in Albuquerque in Bernalillo county;
78. three hundred seventy-five thousand dollars
($375,000) to plan, design, demolish, remove, develop,
construct, equip, expand, repair and improve Holiday park
community center, including the landscape and streetscape, in
Albuquerque in Bernalillo county;

79. eighty-five thousand dollars ($85,000) to

purchase and equip vehicles for homelessness services in

Albuquerque in Bernalillo county;

80. one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) to

plan, design, construct, furnish, equip and improve the

electrical, security, heating, ventilation and air

conditioning systems, furniture and carpeting at the

International District library in Albuquerque in Bernalillo
SFC/SB 240
Page 136

county;
81. four hundred thousand dollars ($400,000) to
plan, design, construct, equip and install improvements at
the International District library park in Albuquerque in
Bernalillo county;
82. twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) to
plan, design, construct, equip and improve Jeanne Bellamah
park and splash pad at the Jeanne Bellamah community center
in Albuquerque in Bernalillo county;
83. one hundred seventy-five thousand dollars
($175,000) to plan, design, construct, purchase, furnish,
equip and improve a multi-use trail along the Tijeras arroyo
between Juan Tabo boulevard and Innovation parkway in
Albuquerque in Bernalillo county;
84. two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000) to
plan, design, construct, furnish, equip and install phase 3
of Juan Tabo Hills park in Albuquerque in Bernalillo county;

85. four hundred sixty-five thousand dollars

($465,000) to plan, design, construct, furnish and equip the

Ken Sanchez indoor sports complex, including landscaping, in

Albuquerque in Bernalillo county;

86. twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) to

demolish and remove and to plan, design, construct, furnish,

equip and improve facilities and utility infrastructure at

La Boca Negra Horseman's complex in Albuquerque in Bernalillo
SFC/SB 240
Page 137

county;
87. two hundred twenty-five thousand dollars
($225,000) to plan, design, construct, furnish, equip and
improve La Paloma park in Albuquerque in Bernalillo county;
88. three hundred thousand dollars ($300,000) to
acquire rights of way for and to plan, design, construct,
equip, rehabilitate and improve La Palomita park in
Albuquerque in Bernalillo county;
89. one hundred seventy-five thousand dollars
($175,000) to plan, design, construct, equip and improve
Ladera golf course in Albuquerque in Bernalillo county;
90. one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) to
plan, design, construct, install, furnish, equip and renovate
Loma del Norte park, including playgrounds, shade structures,
drinking fountains, sanitation and lighting, in Albuquerque
in Bernalillo county;
91. one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000)

to plan, design, construct, improve and equip the south and

west patios at the clubhouse at Los Altos golf course in

Albuquerque in Bernalillo county;

92. twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) to

plan, design, construct, equip and improve grounds and

facilities at Los Altos golf course in Albuquerque in

Bernalillo county;

93. two hundred fifty-five thousand dollars
SFC/SB 240
Page 138

($255,000) to plan, design, construct and improve Los
Poblanos open space and a community farm, including
irrigation, garden and greenhouse improvements, small-scale
solar systems and extending electricity to an education and
event area, in Albuquerque in Bernalillo county;
94. seven hundred sixty-five thousand dollars
($765,000) to plan, design, construct, renovate, furnish and
equip the main library, including electrical and security
systems and heating, ventilation and air conditioning
systems, in Albuquerque in Bernalillo county;
95. twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) to
plan, design, construct, furnish and equip improvements at
the George J. Maloof memorial air park in Albuquerque in
Bernalillo county;
96. three hundred fifty thousand dollars
($350,000) to plan, design, construct, expand, furnish, equip
and improve the Manzano Mesa pickleball complex in southeast

Albuquerque in Bernalillo county;

97. three hundred seventy-five thousand dollars

($375,000) to plan, design, construct, equip and furnish a

teen center, including a gymnasium and a kitchen, in the

McKinley neighborhood in Albuquerque in Bernalillo county;

98. one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000)

to acquire land for and to plan, design, construct, renovate,

repair, furnish and equip a fire and police substation in
SFC/SB 240
Page 139

Mesa del Sol in Albuquerque in Bernalillo county;
99. two hundred twenty-five thousand dollars
($225,000) to plan, design, construct, improve and equip Mesa
Verde park in Albuquerque in Bernalillo county;
100. one hundred seventy-five thousand dollars
($175,000) to plan, design, construct, purchase, install,
equip and furnish park renovations, including artificial
turf, playgrounds, shade structures, drinking fountains,
sanitation and lighting, at Mile High park in Albuquerque in
Bernalillo county;
101. two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000) to
acquire land and rights of way for and to plan, design,
construct, purchase, furnish and equip a multigenerational
center at the southwest public safety center in Albuquerque
in Bernalillo county;
102. one million two hundred seventy-two thousand
dollars ($1,272,000) to plan, design, construct, furnish and

equip improvements to the Albuquerque museum, including the

education center, educational spaces, offices, parking lots,

fire suppression systems, restrooms and heating, ventilation

and air conditioning systems, in Albuquerque in Bernalillo

county;

103. seventy-five thousand dollars ($75,000) to

acquire land for and to plan, design and construct affordable

housing in the downtown area and the north corridor
SFC/SB 240
Page 140

metropolitan development area of Albuquerque in Bernalillo
county;
104. four million three hundred twenty-five
thousand dollars ($4,325,000) to purchase equipment and to
plan, design, construct, equip and furnish an aquatic center
at north Domingo Baca park in Albuquerque in Bernalillo
county;
105. two hundred twenty-five thousand dollars
($225,000) to acquire land and rights of way for and to plan,
design, construct, furnish, equip, repair and improve parks,
including playgrounds and shade structures, in the northeast
quadrant of Albuquerque in Bernalillo county;
106. thirty-five thousand dollars ($35,000) to
plan, design, construct, equip, install, improve and repair
facilities at New Mexico veterans memorial park in
Albuquerque in Bernalillo county;
107. one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) to

acquire land for and to plan, design and construct a

permanent structure for the African American museum and

cultural center of New Mexico in Albuquerque in Bernalillo

county;

108. six hundred five thousand dollars ($605,000)

to purchase and equip animal transport vehicles, veterinary

and animal care equipment and office equipment and

furnishings for a veterinary outreach program in Albuquerque
SFC/SB 240
Page 141

in Bernalillo county;
109. five hundred thirty-five thousand dollars
($535,000) to purchase and equip vehicles and to plan,
design, construct, renovate, furnish and equip buildings and
grounds, including infrastructure, wiring and information
technology, for a modern dance and arts organization serving
low-income, disabled and incarcerated youth and adults in
Albuquerque in Bernalillo county;
110. one hundred seven thousand dollars ($107,000)
to purchase and equip a vehicle and to purchase information
technology and office furniture and equipment for a
behavioral health facility in Albuquerque in Bernalillo
county;
111. one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000)
to plan, design, construct, equip and improve baseball
facilities, including wind screens, fencing, backstop pads
and shade structures, at Comanche south park in Albuquerque

in Bernalillo county;

112. one hundred ten thousand dollars ($110,000)

to plan, design, purchase, repair, equip and install

equipment and vans for commercial and teaching kitchens and a

food business incubator in Albuquerque in Bernalillo county;

113. fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) to purchase

equipment, including tractors, trailers, forklifts, pallet

jacks and pallet racks, for emergency food storage and
SFC/SB 240
Page 142

distribution facilities in Albuquerque in Bernalillo county;
114. fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) to plan,
design, construct and equip improvements to a garden center
in Albuquerque in Bernalillo county;
115. seven hundred sixty thousand dollars
($760,000) to acquire land and rights of way for and to plan,
design, construct, purchase, install, furnish and equip
improvements at a museum and educational center for genocide
and discrimination in Albuquerque in Bernalillo county;
116. seven hundred thousand dollars ($700,000) to
plan, design, construct, improve, furnish and equip a
cultural, sports, education and tourism center, including
information technology equipment and infrastructure, in
Albuquerque in Bernalillo county;
117. one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) to
purchase and equip a vehicle and to plan, design, construct,
furnish, equip and improve a dining room and staff offices

for a kitchen facility in Albuquerque in Bernalillo county;

118. one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) to

plan, design, construct, equip and improve baseball

facilities at Manzano Mesa park in Albuquerque in Bernalillo

county;

119. one hundred eighty thousand dollars

($180,000) to plan, design, construct, equip and improve

baseball facilities at Mariposa Basin park in Albuquerque in
SFC/SB 240
Page 143

Bernalillo county;
120. two hundred seventy-five thousand dollars
($275,000) to purchase and equip vehicles, including a
trailer, for a community workforce development program in
Albuquerque in Bernalillo county;
121. nine hundred sixty-one thousand six hundred
eighty-five dollars ($961,685) to plan, design, construct,
renovate, repair, furnish and equip a museum at the
Albuquerque rail yards, including railroad reconstruction,
roof replacement, window restoration and accessibility
improvements, in Albuquerque in Bernalillo county;
122. one hundred five thousand dollars ($105,000)
to plan, design, construct, equip and improve baseball
facilities, including restrooms, at Redlands park in
Albuquerque in Bernalillo county;
123. two hundred thirty-five thousand dollars
($235,000) to plan, design, construct, repair and improve

railroad and railyard infrastructure at the south railyards,

including tracks, utility services, a turntable and

historical structures, for a railroad historical organization

in Albuquerque in Bernalillo county;

124. nine hundred eighty-five thousand dollars

($985,000) to plan, design, construct, renovate, purchase,

equip and install exhibits and furnishings, information

technology and related infrastructure at a science center and
SFC/SB 240
Page 144

children's museum, including a science, technology,
engineering, art and mathematics learning campus and an early
learning center, in Albuquerque in Bernalillo county;
125. thirty-nine thousand dollars ($39,000) to
purchase equipment, including scanners and printing
equipment, for a community workforce development program in
Albuquerque in Bernalillo county;
126. three hundred forty-five thousand dollars
($345,000) to plan, design, renovate, construct, furnish and
equip the dental clinic space at the Ted M. Gallegos
community center in Albuquerque in Bernalillo county;
127. thirty-five thousand dollars ($35,000) to
purchase equipment, including information technology,
instruments and audiovisual equipment, for a youth creative
arts mentoring program in Albuquerque in Bernalillo county;
128. one hundred twenty-five thousand dollars
($125,000) to plan, design, construct, furnish, improve and

equip a library in the northwest quadrant of Albuquerque in

Bernalillo county;

129. two hundred fifty-one thousand five hundred

dollars ($251,500) to acquire land and rights of way for and

to plan, design, construct, furnish, equip and renovate

parks, including playgrounds and shade structures, in the

northwest quadrant in Albuquerque in Bernalillo county;

130. seventy-five thousand dollars ($75,000) to
SFC/SB 240
Page 145

plan, design, construct, install, furnish, equip and renovate
Parkwest park, including playgrounds, shade structures,
drinking fountains, sanitation and lighting, in Albuquerque
in Bernalillo county;
131. thirty thousand dollars ($30,000) to plan,
design, construct, equip and improve sidewalks and trails at
Pat Hurley park in Albuquerque in Bernalillo county;
132. thirty thousand dollars ($30,000) to purchase
and install equipment and to plan, design, construct and
renovate playgrounds at Pat Hurley park in Albuquerque in
Bernalillo county;
133. twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) to
plan, design, construct, renovate, furnish and equip Piedra
Lisa park, including playgrounds, shade structures, drinking
fountains, lighting and sanitation, in Albuquerque in
Bernalillo county;
134. nine hundred thirty thousand dollars

($930,000) to purchase technology and equipment for law

enforcement facilities and vehicles in Albuquerque in

Bernalillo county;

135. forty thousand dollars ($40,000) to plan,

design, construct, install, furnish, equip and renovate

Presidio park, including playgrounds, shade structures,

drinking fountains, sanitation and lighting, in Albuquerque

in Bernalillo county;
SFC/SB 240
Page 146

136. seventy-five thousand dollars ($75,000) to
plan, design, construct, improve, furnish and equip
libraries, including heating, ventilation and air
conditioning systems and infrastructure, in the northwest
quadrant in Albuquerque in Bernalillo county;
137. twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) to
plan, design, construct, improve, furnish and equip
libraries, including heating, ventilation and air
conditioning systems, roofs, carpets and safety, security and
fire detection systems, in Albuquerque in Bernalillo county;
138. twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) to
plan, design, construct, improve, equip and install public
restrooms in parks and common areas in Albuquerque in
Bernalillo county;
139. one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000)
to acquire land for and to plan, design, construct, furnish
and equip a multi-use trail near the biological park in

Albuquerque in Bernalillo county;

140. one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) for a

feasibility study of housing development at the rail yards in

Albuquerque in Bernalillo county;

141. seventy thousand dollars ($70,000) to plan,

design, construct, equip and improve Rio Grande triangle dog

park in Albuquerque in Bernalillo county;

142. forty-five thousand dollars ($45,000) to
SFC/SB 240
Page 147

plan, design, construct, equip, renovate and improve
Riverview park in Albuquerque in Bernalillo county;
143. thirty-five thousand dollars ($35,000) to
plan, design, construct, purchase, equip and install
improvements along historic route 66, including roadwork,
signage, historic preservation and educational projects, in
Albuquerque in Bernalillo county;
144. one hundred ten thousand dollars ($110,000)
to plan, design, construct, equip and improve a visitors'
center on west Central avenue, including historical
preservation, a pedestrian overlook bridge, signage and
multi-use trails, in Albuquerque in Bernalillo county;
145. thirty-five thousand dollars ($35,000) to
plan, design, construct, equip, repair and improve an
addition to the San Antonio Oxbow open space in Albuquerque
in Bernalillo county;
146. three hundred fifty thousand dollars

($350,000) to plan, design, construct, repair and install a

public arts installation in the San Antonio Oxbow Bluffs open

space in Albuquerque in Bernalillo county;

147. one hundred twenty-five thousand dollars

($125,000) to plan, design, construct, furnish, equip and

improve phase 2 of the growers market in the International

district in Albuquerque in Bernalillo county;

148. two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000) to
SFC/SB 240
Page 148

plan, design, construct, furnish, equip and improve San Pedro
library in Albuquerque in Bernalillo county;
149. one hundred five thousand dollars ($105,000)
to plan, design, construct, repair and equip Sandia Vista dog
park in Albuquerque in Bernalillo county;
150. one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000)
to plan, design, construct, expand, improve and equip Santa
Barbara-Martineztown multigenerational center facilities in
Albuquerque in Bernalillo county;
151. seventy-five thousand dollars ($75,000) to
acquire land and rights of way for and to plan, design,
construct, equip and improve Santa Barbara-Martineztown park,
including a parking area, in Albuquerque in Bernalillo
county;
152. two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000)
to acquire land and rights of way for and to plan, design,
construct, repair, improve, furnish and equip parks,

including playgrounds and shade structures, in the southeast

quadrant of Albuquerque in Bernalillo county;

153. fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) to plan,

design, construct, expand, furnish, equip and improve the

Sierra Vista tennis complex, including the pool, in

Albuquerque in Bernalillo county;

154. fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) to plan,

design, construct, purchase, equip and install improvements
SFC/SB 240
Page 149

at Sister Cities park in Albuquerque in Bernalillo county;
155. five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) to
plan, design, construct, improve and equip south San Jose
park in Albuquerque in Bernalillo county;
156. fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) to plan,
design, construct, purchase, equip and improve Summer Hills
park in Albuquerque in Bernalillo county;
157. one million dollars ($1,000,000) to plan,
design, construct, equip and improve Sunport pool and
facilities in Albuquerque in Bernalillo county;
158. two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000) to
purchase, equip and install gunshot detection systems and
infrastructure in Albuquerque in Bernalillo county;
159. one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) to
plan, design, construct, furnish, equip and improve southwest
mesa and South Valley area parks, including playgrounds and
lighting, in Albuquerque in Bernalillo county;

160. fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) to plan,

design, construct, purchase, furnish and equip improvements

to fire station 14 and the Shawn McWethy memorial police

department substation in the southwest mesa area in

Albuquerque in Bernalillo county;

161. one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000)

to acquire land and rights of way for and to plan, design,

construct, repair, improve, furnish and equip parks,
SFC/SB 240
Page 150

including playgrounds and shade structures, in the southwest
quadrant in Albuquerque in Bernalillo county;
162. two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000) to
plan, design, construct, purchase, furnish and equip
improvements to the Heights community center in Albuquerque
in Bernalillo county;
163. fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) to plan,
design, construct, purchase, equip and install improvements,
including playgrounds, shade structures, tables and lighting,
at Terrazas park in Albuquerque in Bernalillo county;
164. one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) to
plan, design, construct, equip, install, repair and improve
the Tijeras arroyo biozone education facility in Albuquerque
in Bernalillo county;
165. one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000)
to plan, design, construct, purchase, equip and install
improvements at Tom Bolack urban forest park in Albuquerque

in Bernalillo county;

166. three hundred five thousand dollars

($305,000) to plan, design, construct, improve and equip

sports and recreation fields and park facilities at Tower

Pond park and Westgate Heights park in Albuquerque in

Bernalillo county;

167. six hundred fifty thousand dollars ($650,000)

to plan, design, construct, equip, furnish and improve the
SFC/SB 240
Page 151

uptown connect project in Albuquerque in Bernalillo county;
168. thirty thousand dollars ($30,000) to plan,
design and construct the placement of the USS Albuquerque
memorial site in Albuquerque in Bernalillo county;
169. three hundred fifty thousand dollars
($350,000) to plan, design, construct, improve and equip
Ventana Ranch park in Albuquerque in Bernalillo county;
170. four hundred thousand dollars ($400,000) to
plan, design, construct, equip and improve Villela park in
Albuquerque in Bernalillo county;
171. one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) to
plan, design, construct, install, equip and improve Vista del
Norte park trail in Albuquerque in Bernalillo county;
172. five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) to
plan, design, construct, equip and improve aquatics
facilities at the west side splash pad in Albuquerque in
Bernalillo county;

173. five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) to

plan, design, construct, equip, furnish and improve Westgate

community center, including security and technology upgrades,

in Albuquerque in Bernalillo county;

174. one hundred ten thousand dollars ($110,000)

to plan, design, construct, purchase, equip and install

improvements at Westgate Heights park in Albuquerque in

Bernalillo county;
SFC/SB 240
Page 152

175. three hundred sixty-five thousand dollars
($365,000) to plan, design, construct, expand and renovate
the West Side animal shelter, including kennels, support
facilities, offices, public areas and a veterinary clinic, in
Albuquerque in Bernalillo county;
176. nine hundred thousand dollars ($900,000) to
plan, design, construct, equip, furnish and improve homeless
shelter facilities in the westside area of Albuquerque in
Bernalillo county;
177. three hundred thousand dollars ($300,000) to
plan, design, construct, purchase, equip and install
improvements, including green storm water infrastructure, at
Workers' memorial park in Albuquerque in Bernalillo county;
178. one million three hundred forty-five thousand
dollars ($1,345,000) to plan, design, construct, repair,
improve and equip a homeless facility for young adults in
Albuquerque in Bernalillo county;

179. seventy-five thousand dollars ($75,000) to

purchase and equip heavy equipment, including a boom lift,

for the Albuquerque metropolitan arroyo flood control

authority in Albuquerque in Bernalillo county;

180. four hundred fifty thousand dollars

($450,000) to plan, design, construct and improve retention

ponds, including Ladera pond, in Albuquerque in Bernalillo

county;
SFC/SB 240
Page 153

181. twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) to
purchase and equip a remote camera system for the Albuquerque
metropolitan arroyo flood control authority in Albuquerque in
Bernalillo county;
182. two hundred sixty thousand dollars ($260,000)
to plan, design, construct and improve the entrance of the
Hiland theater in Albuquerque in Bernalillo county;
183. three hundred thousand dollars ($300,000) to
acquire land and buildings for and to plan, design,
construct, renovate, furnish and equip affordable and
transitional housing in the International district in
Albuquerque in Bernalillo county;
184. one hundred forty thousand dollars ($140,000)
to plan, design, construct, furnish, equip and improve
facilities at the Mesa del Sol regional outdoor sports
complex in Albuquerque in Bernalillo county;
185. three hundred thousand dollars ($300,000) to

purchase and equip a vehicle as a mobile community center for

the International district in Albuquerque in Bernalillo

county;

186. two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000)

to plan, design, construct, furnish and equip renovations to

the Altamont baseball complex, including artificial turf

infields, a tournament field, irrigation, lighting,

playgrounds and parking, in Albuquerque in Bernalillo county;
SFC/SB 240
Page 154

187. three hundred sixty thousand dollars
($360,000) to purchase and equip vehicles and to plan,
design, construct, renovate, furnish and equip buildings,
facilities and grounds, including infrastructure, information
technology and wiring, for an economic development
organization in the South Valley area of Albuquerque in
Bernalillo county;
188. sixty-five thousand dollars ($65,000) to
purchase information technology, office equipment and
audiovisual equipment for a student-centered facility for
students and families in need of school clothing in
Albuquerque in Bernalillo county;
189. one hundred twenty-five thousand dollars
($125,000) to acquire land for and to plan, design,
construct, equip and furnish phase 3 and 4 improvements to
the Edward C. Sandoval north valley baseball complex,
including lighting, in Albuquerque in Bernalillo county;

190. one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) to

plan, design, construct, furnish and equip infrastructure and

site improvements for a multipurpose educational and

agriculture-related recreational facility in Albuquerque in

Bernalillo county;

191. four hundred fifty-five thousand dollars

($455,000) to plan, design, construct, furnish, equip and

improve a contemporary arts museum building, including roof
SFC/SB 240
Page 155

renovation and solar panels, in Santa Fe in Santa Fe county;
192. two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000)
to plan, design and construct a metal structure to store
vehicles and equipment for the Chilili land grant-merced in
Bernalillo county;
193. two million five hundred thousand dollars
($2,500,000) to plan, design, construct and equip
improvements, including electrical systems, at the Larry P.
Abraham agri-nature center, including the Anderson property,
in Los Ranchos de Albuquerque in Bernalillo county;
194. one hundred fifty-two thousand dollars
($152,000) to plan, design, construct and equip a veterans
memorial in Hartnett park in Los Ranchos de Albuquerque in
Bernalillo county;
195. three hundred thousand dollars ($300,000) to
acquire land for and to plan, design, construct, landscape,
furnish and equip site and building improvements at Los

Vecinos community center, including ball fields and a skate

park, in Tijeras in Bernalillo county;

196. one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) to

plan, design, construct, equip and improve the veterans

monument and memorial at Luis Garcia park in Tijeras in

Bernalillo county;

197. three hundred thirty thousand dollars

($330,000) to plan, design and construct site improvements at
SFC/SB 240
Page 156

the village hall complex in Tijeras in Bernalillo county;
198. one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) to
plan, design, construct, furnish, equip and improve county
road department facilities in Quemado in Catron county;
199. two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000)
to plan, design, construct, furnish, equip, expand and
improve the fire department facility, including a fire bay
building, in Reserve in Catron county;
200. three hundred thousand dollars ($300,000) to
plan, design, construct, equip, furnish and improve parks,
including landscaping, in Hagerman in Chaves county;
201. fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) to purchase,
equip and install equipment for a sewer cleaner truck,
including sewer cameras and related apparatus, in Lake Arthur
in Chaves county;
202. three hundred seventy-five thousand dollars
($375,000) to plan, design, construct, repair and improve the

main entrance at the administrative center, including

concrete areas and landscaping, in Roswell in Chaves county;

203. one hundred sixty thousand dollars ($160,000)

to plan, design, construct, replace and install a cooling

tower at the county courthouse in Roswell in Chaves county;

204. three hundred fifty thousand dollars

($350,000) to plan, design, construct, replace, equip and

install elevators at the county courthouse in Roswell in
SFC/SB 240
Page 157

Chaves county;
205. four hundred thousand dollars ($400,000) to
plan, design, construct and equip a fueling station for the
county flood commission in Roswell in Chaves county;
206. three hundred sixty thousand dollars
($360,000) to plan, design, construct, furnish and equip
improvements, including landscaping, at a domestic violence
shelter in Roswell in Chaves county;
207. one million five hundred thousand dollars
($1,500,000) to plan, design, construct, furnish, equip and
expand fire station 2 in Roswell in Chaves county;
208. five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) to
plan, design, construct, purchase, repair, improve, furnish
and equip flood-damaged grounds, facilities and equipment in
Roswell in Chaves county;
209. two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000) to
plan, design, construct, purchase and install emergency power

generators for administrative offices and courts in Grants in

Cibola county;

210. one hundred five thousand dollars ($105,000)

to purchase and equip medical technology, including an x-ray

unit, a mini c-arm and an ultrasound machine, for the county

general hospital in Grants in Cibola county;

211. one hundred twenty-five thousand dollars

($125,000) for site preparation and to plan, design,
SFC/SB 240
Page 158

construct, furnish and equip a domestic violence shelter
complex, including infrastructure, housing, administrative
facilities and communal space, in Grants in Cibola county;
212. one hundred twenty-five thousand dollars
($125,000) to plan, design, construct, furnish and equip a
fire station in Grants in Cibola county;
213. four hundred thousand dollars ($400,000) to
purchase and equip heavy equipment, including attachments,
for the public works department in Grants in Cibola county;
214. one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) to
plan, design, construct, renovate, repair, furnish and equip
the police station in Grants in Cibola county;
215. four hundred fifty thousand dollars
($450,000) to plan, design, construct, equip and improve
infrastructure at the Milan industrial park in Milan in
Cibola county;
216. two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000) to

plan, design, construct, renovate, repair and equip

improvements to the swimming pool in Milan in Cibola county;

217. one hundred seventy thousand dollars

($170,000) to purchase and equip a backhoe for the road

department in Colfax county;

218. one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000)

to purchase and equip vehicles for the road department in

Colfax county;
SFC/SB 240
Page 159

219. one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) to
plan, design, construct and equip affordable workforce
housing in Angel Fire in Colfax county;
220. one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) to
purchase and equip excavation equipment for the public works
department in Maxwell in Colfax county;
221. fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) to plan,
design, construct and improve a maintenance shop for the
public works department in Maxwell in Colfax county;
222. one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) to
plan, design, construct, furnish and equip a building for the
road department in Raton in Colfax county;
223. two hundred twenty-five thousand dollars
($225,000) to plan, design and construct improvements,
including streetscape seating and public art, on Main street
between First street and Fourteenth street in Clovis in Curry
county;

224. three hundred seventy-five thousand dollars

($375,000) to plan, design and construct a heating,

ventilation and air conditioning system at a food bank in

Clovis in Curry county;

225. two hundred thirty-seven thousand dollars

($237,000) to plan, design, construct, equip and relocate a

centralized trash collection center, including related

infrastructure, to a trash transfer station in Melrose in
SFC/SB 240
Page 160

Curry county;
226. four hundred fifty thousand dollars
($450,000) to purchase and equip semi tractors and trailers
for the road department in De Baca county;
227. one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) to
purchase, equip and replace emergency communications
equipment for the dispatch center in Fort Sumner in De Baca
county;
228. four hundred sixty thousand dollars
($460,000) to plan, design, construct, purchase, furnish,
install and equip improvements to the village hall in Fort
Sumner in De Baca county;
229. two hundred forty-five thousand dollars
($245,000) to plan, design, construct, improve, furnish and
equip a youth center in Fort Sumner in De Baca county;
230. three hundred fifty thousand dollars
($350,000) to acquire land for and to plan, design, purchase,

construct, furnish and equip a building, including building

relocation, for the Alto de las Flores mutual domestic water

consumers association in Dona Ana county;

231. one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) to

purchase and equip self-contained breathing apparatus for

fire stations and the fire academy in Dona Ana county;

232. one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) to

purchase and equip fire engines for the fire department in
SFC/SB 240
Page 161

Dona Ana county;
233. two hundred eight thousand dollars ($208,000)
to plan, design, construct and equip a terminal and office
building at the county international jetport in Dona Ana
county;
234. fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) to plan,
design, construct, furnish, equip and install a splash pad,
including related water systems, in the La Mesa area in Dona
Ana county;
235. four hundred forty thousand dollars
($440,000) to plan, design, construct, furnish, equip and
improve buildings and grounds at the Mesquite community
center in Dona Ana county;
236. three hundred fifty thousand dollars
($350,000) to plan, design and construct a communications
building and tower, including a repeater, for the Elephant
Butte irrigation district in Dona Ana county;

237. one hundred eighty thousand dollars

($180,000) to plan, design, construct, repair, replace,

purchase, install and equip a solar power system, including a

carport, a parking lot and accessibility upgrades, for La

Union mutual domestic sewer and water association in Dona Ana

county;

238. three hundred thousand dollars ($300,000) to

plan, design, construct, purchase, install, furnish and equip
SFC/SB 240
Page 162

a storage building, including a bathroom, for La Union
watershed district in Dona Ana county;
239. seven hundred five thousand dollars
($705,000) to purchase and equip electric vehicles and to
plan, design, construct and improve a bus facility and
electric vehicle charging infrastructure for the south
central regional transit district in Dona Ana county;
240. two hundred thirty thousand dollars
($230,000) to purchase and equip animal control vehicles and
equipment in Anthony in Dona Ana county;
241. eight hundred fifty thousand dollars
($850,000) to plan, design, construct and improve parking
lots at a community center and a municipal building in Hatch
in Dona Ana county;
242. two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000) to
plan, design, construct, repair, improve and equip the Paseos
Verdes affordable housing complex and related infrastructure,

including street improvements, pedestrian walkways and

utility upgrades, in Las Cruces in Dona Ana county;

243. one million seven hundred thousand dollars

($1,700,000) to plan, design, construct, expand, renovate,

furnish and equip the Thomas Branigan memorial library in Las

Cruces in Dona Ana county;

244. two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000)

to plan, design, construct, improve, equip and furnish the
SFC/SB 240
Page 163

East Mesa recreation center in Las Cruces in Dona Ana county;
245. seventy-two thousand dollars ($72,000) to
plan, design, construct, repair, replace, purchase and
install equipment and furnish improvements for fire stations
in Las Cruces in Dona Ana county;
246. four hundred thirty-four thousand dollars
($434,000) to plan, design, construct, expand, improve,
furnish, equip and improve the Mesilla Valley resource campus
providing services to the homeless, including supportive
housing, service buildings and traffic flow, in Las Cruces in
Dona Ana county;
247. two million nine hundred fifty thousand
dollars ($2,950,000) to plan, design, construct, renovate,
repair, replace, equip, install and furnish a facility for a
soup kitchen and community kitchen in Las Cruces in Dona Ana
county;
248. two million ninety thousand dollars

($2,090,000) to plan, design, construct, furnish and equip a

dedicated track for the police department in Las Cruces in

Dona Ana county;

249. one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) to

plan, design, construct, repair, equip, furnish and renovate

a real-time crime center for the police department in Las

Cruces in Dona Ana county;

250. one million dollars ($1,000,000) to plan,
SFC/SB 240
Page 164

design and construct a storm water detention pond in Las
Cruces in Dona Ana county;
251. nine hundred thousand dollars ($900,000) to
plan, design, construct, improve, equip and furnish the
woman's improvement association building in Las Cruces in
Dona Ana county;
252. two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000) to
purchase and equip portable buildings at community collection
centers for the south central solid waste authority in Las
Cruces in Dona Ana county;
253. five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) to
plan, design, construct, furnish and equip phase 3 of a town
hall, including community space and public safety facilities,
in Mesilla in Dona Ana county;
254. one million four hundred twenty thousand
dollars ($1,420,000) to plan, design, construct and improve a
municipal complex in Sunland Park in Dona Ana county;

255. two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000) to

purchase and equip vehicles and equipment for the police,

fire, emergency medical services and public works departments

and administrative offices in Sunland Park in Dona Ana

county;

256. one million seventeen thousand six hundred

forty-seven dollars ($1,017,647) to plan, design, construct,

furnish, equip and improve the county fairgrounds, including
SFC/SB 240
Page 165

livestock stalls, audiovisual equipment, bleachers, office
spaces and training rooms, in Eddy county;
257. five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) to
plan, design, construct, renovate, furnish and equip the city
hall in Artesia in Eddy county;
258. four hundred fifty thousand dollars
($450,000) to purchase and equip cardiac monitors for the
fire department in Artesia in Eddy county;
259. two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000) to
purchase and equip a rescue engine for the fire department in
Artesia in Eddy county;
260. five hundred fifty thousand dollars
($550,000) to purchase and equip self-contained breathing
apparatus for the fire department in Artesia in Eddy county;
261. seventy-five thousand dollars ($75,000) to
plan, design, construct and improve operating rooms,
including doors and flooring, at the general hospital in the

Artesia special hospital district in Eddy county;

262. three hundred fifty thousand dollars

($350,000) to purchase, install and equip patient beds for

the emergency department and medical surgical unit of the

general hospital in the Artesia special hospital district in

Eddy county;

263. six hundred seventy-five thousand dollars

($675,000) to purchase, install, equip and improve the
SFC/SB 240
Page 166

telephone system at the general hospital and clinics in the
Artesia special hospital district in Eddy county;
264. one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000)
to purchase and equip mobile triage carts for the general
hospital, emergency department and clinics in the Artesia
special hospital district in Eddy county;
265. six hundred thousand dollars ($600,000) to
purchase and equip ambulances for Carlsbad in Eddy county;
266. one million dollars ($1,000,000) to plan,
design, construct, furnish and equip a central dispatch
center in Carlsbad in Eddy county;
267. four hundred fifty thousand dollars
($450,000) to purchase and equip a brush truck for the fire
department in Hope in Eddy county;
268. one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) to
purchase and equip radios for the volunteer fire department
in Grant county;

269. two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000) to

purchase and equip self-contained breathing apparatus for the

volunteer fire department in Grant county;

270. two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000)

to plan, design, construct, equip and furnish improvements to

baseball fields and facilities, including restrooms, at

Bayard community park in Bayard in Grant county;

271. three hundred thousand dollars ($300,000) to
SFC/SB 240
Page 167

plan, design, construct, improve, equip, furnish and install
security systems in Hurley in Grant county;
272. one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) to
plan, design, construct, improve, furnish and equip city
parks in Santa Clara in Grant county;
273. five hundred fifty thousand dollars
($550,000) to purchase and install medical equipment at the
Gila regional medical center in Silver City in Grant county;
274. two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000) to
plan, design, construct, furnish and equip improvements to
Gough park in Silver City in Grant county;
275. three hundred thousand dollars ($300,000) to
plan, design, construct, equip, furnish and improve Scott
park, including accessibility, in Silver City in Grant
county;
276. two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000) to
plan, design, construct, renovate, repair, furnish and equip

an administrative building for the Anton Chico land

grant-merced in Guadalupe county;

277. two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000)

to plan, design, construct and improve the exterior of the

county courthouse, including educational signage and

historical markers, in Santa Rosa in Guadalupe county;

278. one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000)

to plan, design, construct, equip and furnish a hospice,
SFC/SB 240
Page 168

therapy and home health care facility in Santa Rosa in
Guadalupe county;
279. one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) to
purchase and equip vehicles, including radios, information
technology, prisoner cages and emergency equipment, for the
county sheriff's office in Santa Rosa in Guadalupe county;
280. three hundred thousand dollars ($300,000) to
purchase and equip a trash truck for Santa Rosa in Guadalupe
county;
281. three hundred thousand dollars ($300,000) to
purchase and equip a trash collection truck, dumpsters and
trash bins in Vaughn in Guadalupe county;
282. two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000)
to purchase and equip bulldozers and water trucks for the
county road department in Harding county;
283. five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) to
plan, design and construct improvements to the county

fairgrounds in Roy in Harding county;

284. two hundred twenty-five thousand dollars

($225,000) to purchase and equip a dump truck for Hidalgo

county;

285. three hundred fifty thousand dollars

($350,000) to purchase and equip graders for the road

department in Hidalgo county;

286. one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) to
SFC/SB 240
Page 169

plan, design, construct, furnish, equip and renovate the
county courthouse, including security and accessibility
improvements, in Hidalgo county;
287. one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) to
plan, design, construct, furnish and equip a multipurpose
center in Virden in Hidalgo county;
288. eight hundred thousand dollars ($800,000) to
plan, design, construct, furnish and equip a county services
complex in Lea county;
289. two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000)
to plan, design, construct, renovate, furnish and equip an
employee emergency response training facility in Hobbs in Lea
county;
290. five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) to
plan, design, construct and improve a cemetery, including a
committal shelter and columbarium area, in Jal in Lea county;
291. three hundred thousand dollars ($300,000) to

plan, design, construct, renovate and improve a building for

a museum in Jal in Lea county;

292. one million dollars ($1,000,000) to plan,

design, construct, furnish, equip and expand an operating

room for the Nor-Lea special hospital district in Lea county;

293. three hundred fifty thousand dollars

($350,000) to plan, design, construct, equip, install and

improve Tatum cemetery, including a sprinkler system, site
SFC/SB 240
Page 170

preparation, fencing and gate replacement, in Tatum in Lea
county;
294. two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000)
to plan, design, construct, repair and improve shoreline and
day use areas at the Bonito Lake recreational area owned by
Alamogordo and located near Ruidoso in Lincoln county;
295. five hundred fifteen thousand dollars
($515,000) to plan and design a regional public safety
communications system in Lincoln county;
296. five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) to
purchase and equip heavy road equipment for the county road
department in Luna county;
297. two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000) to
plan, design, construct, furnish, equip and improve Albert
Fields park in Columbus in Luna county;
298. two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000) to
purchase and equip vehicles for Columbus in Luna county;

299. three hundred thousand dollars ($300,000) to

purchase and equip a mobile crime scene unit for the police

department in Deming in Luna county;

300. three hundred thousand dollars ($300,000) to

plan, design, construct, improve, equip and furnish multi-use

paths, including lighting, shade structures and accessibility

upgrades, in Deming in Luna county;

301. two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000)
SFC/SB 240
Page 171

to plan, design, construct, equip and furnish improvements to
city parks in Deming in Luna county;
302. sixty-five thousand dollars ($65,000) to
plan, design, construct, renovate and equip a public safety
facility in Deming in Luna county;
303. four hundred seventy thousand dollars
($470,000) to purchase and equip heavy equipment for the road
department in McKinley county;
304. one million dollars ($1,000,000) to plan,
design, construct and improve infrastructure at the McKinley
county industrial park in McKinley county;
305. three hundred twenty thousand dollars
($320,000) to purchase and equip information technology
infrastructure, including storage, servers and power
supplies, for Rehoboth McKinley Christian health care
services in McKinley county;
306. one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) to

plan, design, construct, equip, install and furnish a

maintenance shop and office for the northwest New Mexico

regional solid waste authority in McKinley county;

307. two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000) to

acquire land for and to plan, design, construct, furnish and

equip affordable and workforce housing in Gallup in McKinley

county;

308. five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) to
SFC/SB 240
Page 172

acquire buildings and land for and to plan, design,
construct, furnish, equip and renovate affordable housing and
emergency domestic violence shelter facilities in Gallup in
McKinley county;
309. one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) to
plan, design, construct, purchase and equip an industrial
workforce program facility and housing construction warehouse
in Gallup in McKinley county;
310. one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) to
acquire land for a regional library in Gallup in McKinley
county;
311. one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000)
to plan, design, construct, install, equip and improve Red
Rock park facilities, including the recreational vehicle park
and campground, in Gallup in McKinley county;
312. eighty thousand dollars ($80,000) to plan,
design, construct, improve, furnish and equip the northwest

New Mexico council of governments building in Gallup in

McKinley county;

313. ninety thousand dollars ($90,000) to purchase

and equip a backhoe for the Buena Vista mutual domestic water

consumer's and sewage works association in Mora county;

314. one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000)

to purchase and install equipment for patrol vehicles for the

sheriff's department in Mora county;
SFC/SB 240
Page 173

315. one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000)
to plan, design, construct, furnish and equip a veterans
memorial in Mora county;
316. fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) to purchase,
install and equip information technology upgrades for Wagon
Mound in Mora county;
317. one hundred twenty-five thousand dollars
($125,000) to plan, design, construct, equip and improve a
community center, including a basketball court, walkways, a
playground and landscaping, in Watrous in Mora county;
318. fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) to purchase
and equip heavy equipment for the Elephant Butte irrigation
district in Dona Ana and Sierra counties;
319. one hundred eighty thousand dollars
($180,000) to plan, design and construct safety signage for
the Elephant Butte irrigation district in Dona Ana and Sierra
counties;

320. forty thousand dollars ($40,000) to purchase,

equip, install and replace information technology systems and

equipment for the north central New Mexico economic

development district offices in Santa Fe in Santa Fe county

and for non-metropolitan area agency on aging satellite

offices in multiple counties;

321. four hundred eighty thousand dollars

($480,000) to purchase and equip replacement transit buses
SFC/SB 240
Page 174

for fixed-route and on-demand services in the north central
regional transit district in Rio Arriba, Santa Fe, Los Alamos
and Taos counties;
322. one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) to
acquire land and buildings for and to plan, design,
construct, repair, improve, furnish and equip a community
center for the Santa Cruz de la Canada land grant in Rio
Arriba and Santa Fe counties;
323. one hundred twenty thousand dollars
($120,000) to purchase and equip heavy duty vehicles for La
Luz mutual domestic water consumers' association and mutual
sewage works association in Otero county;
324. four hundred twenty-six thousand five hundred
sixty-four dollars ($426,564) to plan, design, construct,
furnish, equip and expand the county dispatch facility in
Otero county;
325. four hundred seventy-three thousand dollars

($473,000) to purchase and equip a dump truck, including a

plow and a sander, in Otero county;

326. three hundred thousand dollars ($300,000) to

plan, design, construct, renovate and improve municipal

facilities in Alamogordo in Otero county;

327. four hundred twenty thousand dollars

($420,000) to purchase and equip vehicles and equipment for

the police department in Alamogordo in Otero county;
SFC/SB 240
Page 175

328. seven hundred seventy thousand thirty dollars
($770,030) to plan, design, construct, relocate, furnish and
equip a public safety facility for Chaparral in Otero county;
329. five hundred fifteen thousand seven hundred
fifty-nine dollars ($515,759) to purchase, equip and install
an emergency warning siren system in Cloudcroft in Otero
county;
330. one hundred ninety-eight thousand dollars
($198,000) to purchase, equip and install a dispatch radio
communication system for the police department in Tularosa in
Otero county;
331. three hundred thousand dollars ($300,000) to
purchase and equip a transport truck for the road maintenance
department in Quay county;
332. one hundred twenty-five thousand dollars
($125,000) to acquire land and to plan, design, construct,
equip and furnish an operations center for the north central

regional transit district in the Chama area in Rio Arriba

county;

333. fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) to plan,

design, construct and equip a maintenance facility for the

north central solid waste authority in Rio Arriba county;

334. three hundred thousand dollars ($300,000) to

purchase and equip vehicles and maintenance equipment,

including transport trailers, for the north central solid
SFC/SB 240
Page 176

waste authority in Rio Arriba county;
335. sixty-five thousand dollars ($65,000) to
plan, design, construct, purchase and equip aerial data
collection equipment for the assessor's office and emergency
management and fire services departments in Rio Arriba
county;
336. fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) to plan,
design, construct and improve the event facility center at
the county fairgrounds in Rio Arriba county;
337. one hundred twenty-five thousand dollars
($125,000) to purchase and equip vehicles for the sheriff's
office and the county animal control department in Rio Arriba
county;
338. seventy-five thousand dollars ($75,000) to
plan, design, construct, equip and furnish a public safety
complex for the county sheriff's office and the office of
emergency management in Rio Arriba county;

339. fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) to purchase

and equip heavy equipment, including a skid steer, bulldozer

and trailer, for the Tierra Amarilla land grant-merced in Rio

Arriba county;

340. two hundred forty-five thousand dollars

($245,000) to plan, design, construct, renovate, furnish and

equip a multipurpose facility, including infrastructure, for

the Tierra Amarilla land grant-merced in Rio Arriba county;
SFC/SB 240
Page 177

341. one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000)
to plan, design, construct, improve, furnish and equip a
multipurpose building for the Abiquiu land grant-merced in
Rio Arriba county;
342. fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) to plan,
design, construct and equip a playground and recreation area
in Alcalde in Rio Arriba county;
343. twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) to
plan, design and construct a park, including a playground,
paths, shelters and grills, at a community center in Cebolla
in Rio Arriba county;
344. one hundred seventy-five thousand dollars
($175,000) to plan, design, construct, renovate, repair,
improve and equip a community center, including accessibility
features, flooring and electrical and heating, ventilation
and air conditioning systems, in Chama in Rio Arriba county;
345. five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) to

plan, design, construct and equip improvements, including

roofs and heating, ventilation and air conditioning systems,

at the city hall building in Espanola in Rio Arriba county;

346. two million six hundred thousand dollars

($2,600,000) to purchase and install equipment for the police

department in Espanola in Rio Arriba county;

347. one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) to

purchase and equip vehicles for the county assessor's office
SFC/SB 240
Page 178

in Espanola in Rio Arriba county;
348. nine hundred thousand dollars ($900,000) to
plan, design, construct, furnish and equip a community
recreation facility in Espanola in Rio Arriba county;
349. seventy-five thousand dollars ($75,000) to
acquire property for and to plan, design, construct and equip
a regional detention facility in Espanola in Rio Arriba
county;
350. twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) to
acquire property for and to plan, design, construct, furnish
and equip a multipurpose community center in Ojo Caliente in
Rio Arriba county;
351. fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) to plan,
design, construct and renovate historic buildings in the San
Joaquin del Rio de Chama land grant-merced in Rio Arriba
county;
352. fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) to plan,

design, construct, renovate, furnish and equip the county

detention center in Rio Arriba county;

353. fifty-five thousand dollars ($55,000) to

purchase and equip ambulances for la Clinica del Pueblo de

Rio Arriba in Tierra Amarilla in Rio Arriba county;

354. fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) to purchase

and install information technology and equipment in ambulance

units for la Clinica del Pueblo de Rio Arriba in Tierra
SFC/SB 240
Page 179

Amarilla in Rio Arriba county;
355. two hundred fifteen thousand dollars
($215,000) to purchase and equip heavy equipment, including a
padfoot drum soil compactor, for the road department in
Roosevelt county;
356. one hundred eighty-five thousand dollars
($185,000) to purchase and equip heavy equipment, including a
smooth drum soil compactor, for the road department in
Roosevelt county;
357. four hundred fifty thousand dollars
($450,000) to purchase and equip trash trucks in Elida in
Roosevelt county;
358. two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000)
to plan, design, construct, expand, equip and improve the
Portales cemetery in Portales in Roosevelt county;
359. three hundred twenty-five thousand dollars
($325,000) to purchase and equip a street sweeper for

Portales in Roosevelt county;

360. two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000)

to purchase and equip backup generators for the Roosevelt

county special hospital district in Roosevelt county;

361. two million dollars ($2,000,000) to plan,

design, construct, furnish and equip an emergency medical

services station in San Juan county;

362. two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000)
SFC/SB 240
Page 180

to purchase and equip public safety vehicles for the police
department and animal control in Aztec in San Juan county;
363. one million one hundred thousand dollars
($1,100,000) to plan, design, construct, renovate, install
and equip improvements, including heating, ventilation and
air conditioning systems, at fire station 1 in Bloomfield in
San Juan county;
364. five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) to
plan, design, construct, equip and improve the vereda del Rio
San Juan, including trails, a bicycle path, walkways, a pump
track, a skills track, pickleball courts, a dog park,
lighting, a farmers' market and a music pavilion, in
Bloomfield in San Juan county;
365. eight hundred thousand dollars ($800,000) to
purchase and equip vehicles for the police department in
Farmington in San Juan county;
366. eight hundred thousand dollars ($800,000) to

purchase, equip, replace and upgrade radio transmitter

communications equipment in Farmington in San Juan county;

367. three hundred ninety thousand dollars

($390,000) to purchase, equip and expand a security camera

system in Farmington in San Juan county;

368. two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000)

to purchase, equip and install cooling towers for the main

hospital at the San Juan regional medical center in
SFC/SB 240
Page 181

Farmington in San Juan county;
369. forty-five thousand dollars ($45,000) to
purchase, replace, equip and install fire pumps for the east
wing at the San Juan regional medical center in Farmington in
San Juan county;
370. one hundred twenty thousand dollars
($120,000) to purchase, equip and install heat exchangers for
the main hospital at the San Juan regional medical center in
Farmington in San Juan county;
371. two hundred seventy thousand dollars
($270,000) to purchase, equip, replace and install medical
air and vacuum system equipment for the main hospital at the
San Juan regional medical center in Farmington in San Juan
county;
372. seventy-five thousand dollars ($75,000) to
purchase, equip and install a reverse osmosis unit for the
central sterile processing department at the San Juan

regional medical center in Farmington in San Juan county;

373. ninety-five thousand dollars ($95,000) to

purchase, replace, equip and install a domestic hot water

heat exchanger for the main hospital at the San Juan regional

medical center in Farmington in San Juan county;

374. eighty thousand dollars ($80,000) to

purchase, equip and install chilled and heating water pumps

for the east wing of the main hospital at the San Juan
SFC/SB 240
Page 182

regional medical center in Farmington in San Juan county;
375. three hundred fifty thousand dollars
($350,000) to purchase and equip vehicles, including a dump
truck, backhoe and utility vehicle, for the
Kirtland-Fruitland cemetery in Kirtland in San Juan county;
376. fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) to plan,
design, construct, equip and improve a building, including
heating and cooling systems, flooring and electrical systems,
for the east Pecos mutual domestic water consumers'
association in San Miguel county;
377. ten thousand dollars ($10,000) to plan,
design, construct, repair and improve an amphitheater at the
Norman L. King stadium, including erosion mitigation
measures, for the Las Vegas land grant in San Miguel county;
378. fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) to purchase,
equip and install equipment and fixtures at the Bernal
community center in San Miguel county;

379. one hundred thirty thousand dollars

($130,000) to plan, design and construct fencing around water

tanks for the Pendaries Village mutual domestic water

consumers association in San Miguel county;

380. fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) to purchase

and equip emergency response vehicles for the sheriff's

office in San Miguel county;

381. two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000) to
SFC/SB 240
Page 183

plan, design, construct, equip and improve the county
fairgrounds in San Miguel county;
382. fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) to plan,
design, construct, furnish, equip and improve county
buildings, including public works buildings and fire
stations, in San Miguel county;
383. forty thousand dollars ($40,000) to purchase
and equip heavy equipment and attachments for the San Miguel
del Bado land grant-merced in San Miguel county;
384. one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) to
plan, design, construct, renovate, furnish and equip a
historic building as a museum for the San Miguel del Bado
land grant-merced in San Miguel county;
385. fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) to acquire
land and buildings for the San Miguel del Bado land
grant-merced in San Miguel county;
386. one hundred twenty-five thousand dollars

($125,000) to plan, design, construct, furnish and equip an

animal shelter in Las Vegas in San Miguel county;

387. twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) to

plan, design, construct, purchase and install information

technology upgrades in Las Vegas in San Miguel county;

388. twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) to

plan, design, construct, renovate, equip and furnish the

historic old city hall building in Las Vegas in San Miguel
SFC/SB 240
Page 184

county;
389. twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) to
purchase and equip road and maintenance equipment in Las
Vegas in San Miguel county;
390. two hundred forty thousand dollars ($240,000)
to plan, design, construct, equip and improve public
buildings, infrastructure and parks in Pecos in San Miguel
county;
391. thirty thousand dollars ($30,000) to plan,
design and construct improvements to buildings and parking
lots for a veterans services organization in Pecos in San
Miguel county;
392. ninety-five thousand dollars ($95,000) to
purchase and equip vehicles and heavy equipment for Pecos in
San Miguel county;
393. four hundred seventy-five thousand dollars
($475,000) to purchase and equip ambulances for the county

fire department in Sandoval county;

394. five hundred eighty-three thousand dollars

($583,000) to acquire land for and to plan, design and

construct an animal shelter in Sandoval county;

395. one million dollars ($1,000,000) to plan,

design and construct a multipurpose community center in

Sandoval county;

396. two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000) to
SFC/SB 240
Page 185

acquire property for and to plan, design, construct and equip
an emergency public safety answering point and dispatch
center in Sandoval county;
397. one hundred sixty-five thousand dollars
($165,000) to purchase and equip vehicles, including a
refrigerated box truck and a forklift, for a community food
pantry in Sandoval county;
398. seven hundred thousand dollars ($700,000) to
purchase and equip vehicles, including lighting,
communication and safety equipment, for the county sheriff's
department in Sandoval county;
399. two million dollars ($2,000,000) to plan,
design, construct, furnish and equip a fire station in
Bernalillo in Sandoval county;
400. one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) to
plan, design, construct and renovate the Sena building at
el Zocalo plaza in Bernalillo in Sandoval county;

401. one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000)

to acquire land for and to plan, design, construct and

purchase road and parking improvements, including gates,

signage, vegetation management and utilities, at all Corrales

bosque access points in Corrales in Sandoval county;

402. two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000) to

purchase and equip vehicles and equipment, including

ballistic vests, safety gear, weapons and information
SFC/SB 240
Page 186

technology, for the police department in Corrales in Sandoval
county;
403. one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) to
purchase and equip search and rescue vehicles, including
transport trailers, for the police department in Cuba in
Sandoval county;
404. two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000)
to plan, design and construct a playground and picnic area at
a community park in Jemez Springs in Sandoval county;
405. one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000)
to plan, design and construct bathrooms at a community park
in Jemez Springs in Sandoval county;
406. one hundred seventy-five thousand dollars
($175,000) to plan, design, construct and improve the Esther
Bone memorial library, including shelving in the children's
area, in Rio Rancho in Sandoval county;
407. two hundred seventy-six thousand dollars

($276,000) to plan, design, construct and equip multipurpose

sport courts at Havasu park in Rio Rancho in Sandoval county;

408. one hundred ten thousand dollars ($110,000)

to purchase and equip traffic and equipment trailers for the

police department in Rio Rancho in Sandoval county;

409. five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) to

replace and equip vehicles for the police department in Rio

Rancho in Sandoval county;
SFC/SB 240
Page 187

410. three hundred fifty thousand dollars
($350,000) to plan, design and construct a youth baseball
field at the Rio Rancho sports complex north in Rio Rancho in
Sandoval county;
411. seventy-five thousand dollars ($75,000) to
purchase and equip a forklift and security systems for a food
pantry and children's clothing source in Rio Rancho in
Sandoval county;
412. two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000)
to purchase and equip vehicles for the Eldorado area water
and sanitation district in Santa Fe county;
413. two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000)
to plan, design, construct, equip and improve a mailroom,
including pressure relief valves for hazardous material
storage, at a county elections facility in Santa Fe county;
414. one hundred thirty-seven thousand dollars
($137,000) to acquire property and buildings for and to plan,

design and construct post-incarceration transitional housing

and to purchase and install equipment for workforce

development and technical training facilities in Santa Fe

county;

415. one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000)

to plan, design, construct and improve facilities providing

shelter and transitional living programs and services to the

homeless and special populations in Espanola in Santa Fe
SFC/SB 240
Page 188

county;
416. one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) to
purchase and equip a mobile command unit for the county
sheriff's office in Santa Fe county;
417. three hundred ten thousand dollars ($310,000)
to plan, design, construct, equip and improve Valle Vista
public housing, including a playground and accessible
showers, in Santa Fe county;
418. three hundred twenty-five thousand dollars
($325,000) for water-hauling vehicles and storage tanks in or
near Santa Fe county;
419. nine hundred thousand dollars ($900,000) to
plan, design, construct and landscape a community park in the
Acequia trail area for a program constructing affordable
housing in Santa Fe in Santa Fe county;
420. two million two hundred twenty-five thousand
dollars ($2,225,000) to plan, design, construct and renovate

housing units and site infrastructure at a public housing

development in Santa Cruz in Santa Fe county;

421. two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000) to

plan, design, construct, renovate, furnish and equip the

north central New Mexico economic development district office

building in Santa Fe in Santa Fe county;

422. two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000)

to plan, design, construct, equip and improve an arts and
SFC/SB 240
Page 189

cultural building, including accessibility and structural and
mechanical improvements, in Santa Fe in Santa Fe county;
423. two hundred thirty-five thousand dollars
($235,000) to plan, design, construct, improve and equip the
Camino de Jacobo public housing, including a playground and
window replacements, in Santa Fe in Santa Fe county;
424. one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) to
purchase and install broadband equipment at a county election
facility in Santa Fe in Santa Fe county;
425. two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000)
to purchase and install fitness equipment for the fire
department in Santa Fe in Santa Fe county;
426. seven hundred thousand dollars ($700,000) to
plan, design, construct, furnish, improve and equip Herb
Martinez park, including lighting, accessibility, fencing,
irrigation, playgrounds and landscaping, in Santa Fe in
Santa Fe county;

427. seven hundred fifty thousand dollars

($750,000) to plan, design, construct, furnish and equip a

large capacity homeless shelter in Santa Fe in Santa Fe

county;

428. fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) to acquire

land and property for and to plan, design, construct,

renovate, furnish and equip a firearms and driving training

facility for the police department in Santa Fe in Santa Fe
SFC/SB 240
Page 190

county;
429. seven hundred fifty thousand dollars
($750,000) to plan, design, construct and improve Ragle park,
including artificial turf, in Santa Fe in Santa Fe county;
430. three million two hundred fifty thousand
dollars ($3,250,000) to plan, design, construct and equip an
expansion of the regional airport terminal, including
improvements to the baggage area and related infrastructure,
in Santa Fe in Santa Fe county;
431. two hundred seventy-five thousand dollars
($275,000) to plan, design and construct infrastructure in
the Tierra Contenta subdivision for an affordable housing
project in Santa Fe in Santa Fe county;
432. one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) to
acquire land, easements and rights of way and to plan,
design, construct, furnish and equip an administration
building for the south central council of governments in

Sierra county;

433. five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) to

plan, design, construct and equip improvements to the

interior and exterior of the Lee Belle Johnson center in

Truth or Consequences in Sierra county;

434. one hundred sixty thousand dollars ($160,000)

to plan, design, construct, purchase, furnish and equip park

improvements, including paths, playgrounds, lighting,
SFC/SB 240
Page 191

drainage, landscaping, fencing and parking, in Williamsburg
in Sierra county;
435. forty thousand dollars ($40,000) to purchase
and equip vehicles for the San Antonio mutual domestic water
consumers association in Socorro county;
436. four hundred eighteen thousand dollars
($418,000) to plan, design, construct, furnish and equip a
multigenerational learning center at the Very Large Array
site in Socorro county;
437. five hundred fifty thousand dollars
($550,000) to purchase and equip vehicles for the county road
and facilities departments in Socorro county;
438. one hundred eighty thousand dollars
($180,000) to purchase and equip portable and mobile base
station radios for the marshal's office in Magdalena in
Socorro county;
439. forty-four thousand dollars ($44,000) to

purchase and equip mobile repeaters for marshal's office

vehicles in Magdalena in Socorro county;

440. eighty thousand dollars ($80,000) to purchase

and equip radar systems, printers and computers for marshal's

office vehicles in Magdalena in Socorro county;

441. fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) to plan,

design, construct, relocate and install a monument from

El Camino Real historic trail site at the Socorro convention
SFC/SB 240
Page 192

center, including landscaping, in Socorro in Socorro county;
442. one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) to
plan, design, construct, equip, furnish and improve the
Finley gymnasium complex in Socorro in Socorro county;
443. one million one hundred seventy-two thousand
dollars ($1,172,000) to plan, design, construct, equip,
furnish and improve a police station in the Zimmerly school
building in Socorro in Socorro county;
444. four million six hundred ninety thousand
dollars ($4,690,000) to provide urgent or emergency funding
for infrastructure and equipment needs statewide;
445. fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000) to acquire
land and buildings and to plan, design, construct, renovate,
repair, furnish and equip a community center for the Santa
Barbara land grant-merced in Taos county;
446. one hundred seventy-five thousand dollars
($175,000) to demolish and remove a vacant building at the

Amalia community center in Taos county;

447. one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) to

purchase and equip rescue vehicles for the sheriff's office

in Taos county;

448. seventy-five thousand dollars ($75,000) to

plan, design, construct, purchase, equip and improve a

building for the Union del Llano mutual domestic water

consumers association in Taos county;
SFC/SB 240
Page 193

449. two hundred thirty thousand dollars
($230,000) to acquire land and buildings and to plan, design,
construct, renovate, furnish and equip a multipurpose
building for the Arroyo Hondo Arriba community land
grant-merced in Taos county;
450. fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) to purchase
and equip heavy equipment, including an excavator and
attachments, for the Arroyo Hondo Arriba community land
grant-merced in Taos county;
451. one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000)
to plan, design, demolish, remove, construct, furnish and
equip a mini-pitch soccer facility in Questa in Taos county;
452. three hundred ten thousand dollars ($310,000)
to purchase, equip and install emergency generators for
public safety buildings, evacuation sites and water well
distribution systems in Red River in Taos county;
453. eighty-five thousand dollars ($85,000) to

purchase and equip heavy equipment, including a skid steer

loader, for the Santo Tomas Apostol del Rio de las Trampas

land grant-merced in Taos county;

454. two hundred seventy-five thousand dollars

($275,000) to purchase and equip patrol vehicles in Taos in

Taos county;

455. one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000)

to plan, design, construct, replace, equip and furnish
SFC/SB 240
Page 194

municipal offices in Taos Ski Valley in Taos county;
456. two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000)
to acquire land for the Manzano land grant-merced in Torrance
county;
457. one hundred thirty thousand dollars
($130,000) to plan, design, construct, purchase and install
fencing for the Manzano land grant-merced in Torrance county;
458. two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000) to
purchase and equip heavy equipment, including attachments,
for the Manzano land grant-merced in Torrance county;
459. one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000)
to acquire land and buildings and to plan, design, construct,
renovate, furnish and equip a multipurpose facility for the
Tajique land grant-merced in Torrance county;
460. fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) to plan,
design, construct, renovate, furnish and equip emergency
management facilities, including a training room, an

emergency operations center, a shelter, storage, a parking

lot, a garage and a security system, in Torrance county;

461. one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) to

plan, design, construct and improve a community center in

Encino in Torrance county;

462. fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) to purchase

and equip vehicles and heavy equipment, including mowers and

a tractor, for Encino in Torrance county;
SFC/SB 240
Page 195

463. two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000) to
plan, design, construct, equip and improve recreational
facilities, including a pool, in Estancia in Torrance county;
464. seven hundred eighty-five thousand dollars
($785,000) to plan, design, construct, equip and furnish
county administrative offices in Estancia in Torrance county;
465. one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000)
to purchase and equip portable and mobile radios for county
departments in Estancia in Torrance county;
466. five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) to
plan, design, construct and upgrade paving for public
facilities in Moriarty in Torrance county;
467. fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) to plan,
design, construct, upgrade, equip and furnish a veterans
monument in Moriarty in Torrance county;
468. one hundred seventy-five thousand dollars
($175,000) to plan, design, construct, renovate and equip the

county annex building for a New Mexico state university

cooperative extension service center in Union county;

469. eighty-seven thousand five hundred dollars

($87,500) to plan, design, construct, furnish, equip and

install improvements to the emergency communications system

for public safety, emergency services, public works and

utilities in Union county;

470. three hundred fifty thousand dollars
SFC/SB 240
Page 196

($350,000) to plan, design, construct and equip a maintenance
facility in Union county;
471. two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000) to
plan, design, construct, renovate, replace and improve the
roof of the D.D. Monroe civic building in Clayton in Union
county;
472. one hundred twenty-five thousand dollars
($125,000) to purchase and equip heavy equipment, including
skid steers and trailers, for the public works department in
Folsom in Union county;
473. two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000)
to purchase and install renewable energy equipment at county
buildings in Valencia county;
474. one million dollars ($1,000,000) to plan,
design, construct, equip and furnish county facilities,
including a sports complex and fairgrounds, in Valencia
county;

475. one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) to

plan, design and construct improvements to Vivian fields in

Belen in Valencia county;

476. one hundred eleven thousand dollars

($111,000) to purchase and equip a vehicle for animal control

services in Bosque Farms in Valencia county;

477. fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000) to

purchase and equip off-road electric bicycles for the police
SFC/SB 240
Page 197

department in Bosque Farms in Valencia county;
478. four hundred sixteen thousand dollars
($416,000) to purchase and equip patrol vehicles for the
police department in Bosque Farms in Valencia county;
479. one million five hundred thousand dollars
($1,500,000) to acquire land for and to plan, design and
construct a police station in Los Lunas in Valencia county;
480. five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) to
purchase and equip a pumper truck for the fire department in
Los Lunas in Valencia county;
481. two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000) to
purchase, equip and install a fire station alerting system in
Los Lunas in Valencia county;
482. fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) to plan,
design, construct and equip Las Maravillas park in Los Lunas
in Valencia county;
483. four hundred thousand dollars ($400,000) to

plan, design, construct, renovate and improve the Meadowlake

community center in Los Lunas in Valencia county;

484. three hundred thousand dollars ($300,000) to

plan, design, construct and improve Meadowlake park,

including sporting equipment, grills, shade structures and

accessibility features, in Los Lunas in Valencia county;

485. fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) to purchase,

equip, install and improve emergency response communications
SFC/SB 240
Page 198

equipment in Los Lunas in Valencia county;
486. one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000)
to plan, design, construct, equip and furnish a park in
Peralta in Valencia county;
487. three hundred thousand dollars ($300,000) to
plan, demolish and remove dangerous and nuisance buildings,
including building contents, trash and debris, on properties
adjacent to public roads in Rio Communities in Valencia
county;
488. eight hundred seventy thousand dollars
($870,000) to purchase and equip public safety vehicles and
equipment for Rio Communities in Valencia county;
489. five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) to
acquire land and to plan, design, construct and improve land
and housing, including irrigation ditches, for the town of
Tome land grant-merced in Valencia county;
490. four hundred twenty-five thousand dollars

($425,000) to plan, design, construct and equip water lines

and distribution systems for fire suppression in Corrales in

Sandoval county; and

491. ten million dollars ($10,000,000) to acquire

property for and to plan, design, construct, furnish and

equip a Navajo code talkers museum for the Navajo Nation in

McKinley county.

SECTION 49. DEPARTMENT OF MILITARY AFFAIRS PROJECT--
SFC/SB 240
Page 199

GENERAL FUND.--One million sixty-four thousand dollars
($1,064,000) is appropriated from the general fund to the
department of military affairs to plan, design, construct,
repair and improve exhibits and facilities at the New Mexico
national guard military museum in Santa Fe in Santa Fe
county.
SECTION 50. DEPARTMENT OF FINANCE AND
ADMINISTRATION--NEW MEXICO MORTGAGE FINANCE AUTHORITY
PROJECTS--GENERAL FUND.--The following amounts are
appropriated from the general fund to the department of
finance and administration for the New Mexico mortgage
finance authority for the following purposes:
1. three hundred ninety-five thousand dollars
($395,000) to plan, design and construct affordable
single-family homes on Williams street SE in the San Jose
neighborhood in Albuquerque in Bernalillo county;
2. six hundred fifty thousand dollars ($650,000)

to plan, design and construct affordable single-family homes

at 64th street NW and Cleghorn road in Albuquerque in

Bernalillo county;

3. fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000) to acquire

land for the development of an affordable single-family home

in Clovis in Curry county;

4. two hundred seventy thousand dollars ($270,000)

to plan, design and construct affordable single-family homes
SFC/SB 240
Page 200

in Las Cruces in Dona Ana county;
5. one million one hundred four thousand dollars
($1,104,000) to plan, design and construct affordable
single-family homes in Hobbs in Lea county;
6. three hundred twenty-five thousand dollars
($325,000) to acquire land for and to plan, design and
construct affordable single-family homes in Espanola in Rio
Arriba county;
7. fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000) to acquire
land for the development of an affordable single-family home
in Portales in Roosevelt county;
8. forty-five thousand dollars ($45,000) to plan,
design and construct energy-efficient affordable
single-family homes in Kirtland in San Juan county;
9. one million five hundred fifty thousand dollars
($1,550,000) to plan, design and construct affordable
single-family homes in Santa Fe in Santa Fe county; and

10. four hundred thousand dollars ($400,000) to

plan, design and construct affordable single-family homes in

Taos in Taos county.

SECTION 51. OFFICE OF THE STATE ENGINEER

PROJECT--GENERAL FUND.--Two hundred thousand dollars

($200,000) is appropriated from the general fund to the

office of the state engineer to plan, design, construct,

improve and restore habitat in the Rio Grande bosque,
SFC/SB 240
Page 201

including hazardous fuels mitigation, invasive species
removal and installation of benches and pedestrian bridges,
in the middle Rio Grande conservancy district in Albuquerque
in Bernalillo county.
SECTION 52. OFFICE OF SUPERINTENDENT OF INSURANCE
PROJECT--GENERAL FUND.--One million five hundred thousand
dollars ($1,500,000) is appropriated from the general fund to
the office of superintendent of insurance to purchase and
install information technology systems, including a statewide
digital provider directory, for the office of superintendent
of insurance in Santa Fe in Santa Fe county.
SECTION 53. DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION PROJECTS--
GENERAL FUND.--The following amounts are appropriated from
the general fund to the department of transportation for the
following purposes:
1. two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000) to
acquire rights of way for and to plan, design and construct

improvements, including storm drainage, on Ann avenue and

Armijo road SW in Bernalillo county;

2. one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) to

plan, design and construct storm, drainage and road

improvements for Barcelona road, including streets from the

Armijo drain to the Isleta drain, in Bernalillo county;

3. fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) to plan,

design, construct, rehabilitate, improve and equip road and
SFC/SB 240
Page 202

utility infrastructure in the East Mountain area of
Bernalillo county;
4. two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000)
to plan, design, construct and improve county roads in the
East Mountain area, including chip seal and rehabilitation,
in Bernalillo county;
5. four hundred twenty-five thousand dollars
($425,000) to plan, design, construct and improve drainage
infrastructure and trails at the Hahn arroyo from Delwood
road NE to California street in Bernalillo county;
6. five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) to
acquire rights of way for and to plan, design and construct
sidewalks and drainage infrastructure in the Mountainview
community in Bernalillo county;
7. sixty thousand dollars ($60,000) to plan,
design, construct and equip road and utility infrastructure
improvements in the North Valley in Bernalillo county;

8. four hundred fifty thousand dollars ($450,000)

to plan, design, construct, equip and improve roads and

utility infrastructure in the South Valley of Bernalillo

county;

9. eight hundred sixty thousand dollars ($860,000)

to plan, design, construct and improve roads, utilities and

infrastructure, including water and sewer systems and

bridges, in the Kinney Brick and Mountain View neighborhoods
SFC/SB 240
Page 203

in Bernalillo county;
10. four hundred fifty thousand dollars ($450,000)
to acquire rights of way for and to plan, design, construct
and improve roads, including drainage, along Condershire
drive, Meade avenue and Grace Vigil road in Bernalillo
county;
11. three hundred fifty thousand dollars
($350,000) to acquire rights of way and to plan, design and
construct road and storm drainage improvements along Hardy
court SW in the Atrisco community in Bernalillo county;
12. seventy-five thousand dollars ($75,000) to
acquire rights of way for and to plan, design, construct and
improve Nashville avenue SW at the Gatewood avenue
intersection in Bernalillo county;
13. fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) to plan,
design, construct, repair, improve and replace sidewalks in
the Paradise Hills neighborhood in Bernalillo county;

14. three hundred thousand dollars ($300,000) to

plan, design, construct, equip, improve and install street

lighting on south Coors boulevard in Bernalillo county;

15. fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) to plan,

design, construct, renovate and equip Tapia boulevard SW from

San Ygnacio road to Robertson avenue in Bernalillo county;

16. one hundred ten thousand dollars ($110,000) to

plan, design, construct, equip and install intersection
SFC/SB 240
Page 204

improvements, including traffic signals, on 86th street SW
and Tower road on the southwest mesa in Albuquerque in
Bernalillo county;
17. one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) to
plan, design, construct, equip and install intersection and
traffic signal improvements on 98th street SW and Amole Mesa
avenue in the southwest mesa area of Albuquerque in
Bernalillo county;
18. one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) to
acquire property and rights of way for and to plan, design,
construct, equip and improve green storm water infrastructure
in Albuquerque in Bernalillo county;
19. one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) to
acquire land and rights of way for and to plan, design,
construct, upgrade, purchase, install and repair traffic
signals at the intersection of Constitution avenue NE and
Eubank boulevard in Albuquerque in Bernalillo county;

20. twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) to

plan, design, construct, equip, install and repair crosswalks

in Albuquerque in Bernalillo county;

21. one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) to

plan, design, construct and equip improvements, including

bicycle lanes, vertical delineations, striping and drainage,

on Lead avenue and Coal avenue from 2nd street SW to Oak

street SE in Albuquerque in Bernalillo county;
SFC/SB 240
Page 205

22. fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) to acquire
rights of way and to plan, design, construct, equip and
improve safety features at the Mariposa diversion channel
trail crossing at Montano road NW, including a pedestrian
hybrid beacon, curbs, ramps, striping and signs, in
Albuquerque in Bernalillo county;
23. one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) to
acquire rights of way for and to plan, design, construct and
equip safety improvements on residential city streets near
schools, including signage, lighting, crosswalks, sidewalks
and landscaping, in the southeast quadrant of Albuquerque in
Bernalillo county;
24. three hundred fifty thousand dollars
($350,000) to plan, design, construct, repair, improve and
equip San Pedro drive NE north of Montgomery boulevard in
Albuquerque in Bernalillo county;
25. one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) to

plan, design, construct, equip, purchase and install street

lights in the southwest mesa area of Albuquerque in

Bernalillo county;

26. two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000)

to plan, design, construct, install, equip and improve safety

on Tower road SW between Coors and Unser boulevards,

including median landscaping, irrigation and traffic calming

measures, in Albuquerque in Bernalillo county;
SFC/SB 240
Page 206

27. three hundred thousand dollars ($300,000) to
plan, design, construct, purchase, equip and install public
safety equipment, including automated speed cameras, radar
feedback signs and trailers, in southeast Albuquerque in
Bernalillo county;
28. fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000) to plan,
design, construct, rehabilitate, install and improve
landscaping on Tramway boulevard in Albuquerque in Bernalillo
county;
29. two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000) to
acquire rights of way and to plan, design, construct and
improve roads and storm drains along Blake road SW from the
Isleta drain to Isleta boulevard in Albuquerque in Bernalillo
county;
30. one hundred seventy-five thousand dollars
($175,000) to plan, design, construct, equip and improve
Broadway boulevard NE between Lomas boulevard and Coal

avenue, including landscaping, complete street and multimodal

improvements, multi-use paths and a protected signalized

pedestrian crossing, in Albuquerque in Bernalillo county;

31. four hundred thousand dollars ($400,000) to

plan, design, construct, purchase, equip and install road

improvements, including mid-block crossings with pedestrian

hybrid beacons, at Buena Vista drive between Gibson

boulevard, avenida Cesar Chavez and Central avenue in
SFC/SB 240
Page 207

Albuquerque in Bernalillo county;
32. fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000) to acquire
rights of way and to plan, design, construct, equip and
improve safety features, including signage, striping, traffic
calming measures and rapid flashing beacons, on streets
between Candelaria road NE and Montgomery boulevard,
including Chelwood road, Chelwood Park boulevard, La Charles
drive and Bermuda drive, in Albuquerque in Bernalillo county;
33. one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) to
plan, design, construct, equip and install traffic signals
and intersection improvements at Coors boulevard SW and
Gonzales road in Albuquerque in Bernalillo county;
34. four hundred fifty thousand dollars ($450,000)
to plan, design, construct, equip, repair and improve medians
and median landscaping on Coors road NW in Albuquerque in
Bernalillo county;
35. one hundred twenty-five thousand dollars

($125,000) to acquire rights of way for and to plan, design,

construct, purchase, install and improve street lighting on

east Central avenue between Eubank boulevard and Tramway

boulevard in Albuquerque in Bernalillo county;

36. six hundred fifty thousand dollars ($650,000)

to acquire rights of way for and to plan, design, construct,

equip, rehabilitate and improve Girard boulevard NE between

Hannett avenue and Indian School road in Albuquerque in
SFC/SB 240
Page 208

Bernalillo county;
37. two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000)
to plan, design, construct and equip road and pedestrian
improvements on Griegos road NW from 4th street to Rio Grande
boulevard, including pedestrian safety and traffic calming
measures, striping, medians and landscaping, in Albuquerque
in Bernalillo county;
38. one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) to
acquire rights of way and to plan, design, construct and
improve the intersection of Southern boulevard SE and Juan
Tabo boulevard SE, including lighting and landscaping, in
Albuquerque in Bernalillo county;
39. ten thousand dollars ($10,000) to plan,
design, construct, install and improve medians on La Bajada
road NW in Albuquerque in Bernalillo county;
40. three hundred seventy-five thousand dollars
($375,000) to plan, design, construct, rehabilitate, equip

and improve the Laurelwood neighborhood entrance medians and

parkways, including landscaping and irrigation, in

Albuquerque in Bernalillo county;

41. five hundred fifty thousand dollars ($550,000)

to acquire rights of way and to plan, design, construct and

install improvements, including green storm water

infrastructure and a road diet, on Lomas boulevard NE between

Arizona street and Vassar drive in Albuquerque in Bernalillo
SFC/SB 240
Page 209

county;
42. one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) to
acquire rights of way and to plan, design, construct, expand
and improve McMahon boulevard NW between Kayenta street NW
and Rockcliff drive NW, including storm drainage
improvements, multimodal access, lighting and landscaping, in
Albuquerque in Bernalillo county;
43. three hundred seventy thousand dollars
($370,000) to acquire rights of way for and to plan, design,
construct, equip, rehabilitate and improve Menaul boulevard
NE between Carlisle boulevard and interstate 25 in
Albuquerque in Bernalillo county;
44. two hundred seventy-five thousand dollars
($275,000) to acquire land and rights of way for and to plan,
design, construct, equip and install a high-intensity
activated crosswalk signal at Montano road NW and Guadalupe
trail in Albuquerque in Bernalillo county;

45. one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) to

plan, design, construct, equip and install traffic signals at

the intersection of Tierra Viva place NW and Montano road in

Albuquerque in Bernalillo county;

46. five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) to

plan, design, construct and renovate the paseo del Norte

overpass at Coors boulevard in Albuquerque in Bernalillo

county;
SFC/SB 240
Page 210

47. one million seven hundred thousand dollars
($1,700,000) to acquire rights of way for and to plan,
design, construct and improve paseo del Norte from Unser
boulevard NW to the Albuquerque city limits and from Unser
boulevard NW to Kimmick drive in Albuquerque in Bernalillo
county;
48. seven hundred thousand dollars ($700,000) to
plan, design and construct road improvements to San Pedro
drive NE, including streetscaping and sidewalks, from Cagua
place to Lomas boulevard in Albuquerque in Bernalillo county;
49. one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000)
to plan, design, construct, repair and improve landscaping on
University boulevard SE between Rio Bravo boulevard and
Fritts crossing in Albuquerque in Bernalillo county;
50. one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) to
plan, design and construct improvements, including
traffic-calming measures, road widening and roundabouts, on

Osuna road NW from 2nd street to 4th street in Los Ranchos de

Albuquerque in Bernalillo county;

51. five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) to

plan, design and construct improvements to paseo del Norte

boulevard, including sound barriers and mitigation

strategies, in Los Ranchos de Albuquerque in Bernalillo

county;

52. three hundred fifty thousand dollars
SFC/SB 240
Page 211

($350,000) to plan and design storm water drainage and
conveyance systems in Roswell in Chaves county;
53. two hundred twenty-five thousand dollars
($225,000) to plan, design, construct, improve and expand the
west Country Club road corridor from two to four lanes
between north Union avenue, also known as north Montana
avenue, and north Sycamore avenue in Roswell in Chaves
county;
54. two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000) to
plan, design and construct road and drainage improvements to
Willow drive and Pinon street in Milan in Cibola county;
55. two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000) to
plan, design, construct and make road improvements on Euclid
avenue, Washington avenue, 9th street, 12th street, 13th
street and Lincoln avenue in Cimarron in Colfax county;
56. one million three hundred eighty-three
thousand dollars ($1,383,000) to plan, design, construct and

improve county roads in Curry county;

57. seven hundred sixty-eight thousand five

hundred dollars ($768,500) to plan, design, construct and

replace sewer lines along Brady avenue in Clovis in Curry

county;

58. sixty-six thousand dollars ($66,000) to plan,

design, construct and improve the water system, including

replacing water lines along New Mexico highway 478 and Boyer
SFC/SB 240
Page 212

road, for the lower Rio Grande public water works authority
in Dona Ana county;
59. four hundred fifty thousand dollars ($450,000)
to plan, design and construct roads in the Picacho Hills
area, including Picacho Hills drive, in Dona Ana county;
60. eight hundred thousand dollars ($800,000) to
plan, design, construct and improve streets, drainage,
sidewalks and lighting in Anthony in Dona Ana county;
61. one million dollars ($1,000,000) to acquire
rights of way for and to plan, design, construct, improve,
expand and equip Engler road, including street lighting,
sidewalks, bicycle lanes and utilities, in Las Cruces in Dona
Ana county;
62. two million fifty thousand dollars
($2,050,000) to plan, design, construct, expand and improve a
north-south principal arterial road extension of Mesa Grande
drive, including east-west connections, in Las Cruces in Dona

Ana county;

63. four hundred thousand dollars ($400,000) to

plan, design, construct, purchase, install and equip

improvements in the Mount Cristo Rey boulevard and Bronze

Hill avenue areas, including streets, drainage, fire

hydrants, bike lanes and pedestrian crossings, in Sunland

Park in Dona Ana county;

64. five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) to
SFC/SB 240
Page 213

plan, design, construct, repair and improve roads in Grant
county;
65. three hundred thousand dollars ($300,000) to
purchase vehicles and heavy equipment for the Southwest solid
waste authority in Grant county;
66. two million dollars ($2,000,000) to plan,
design, construct and improve roads, including New Mexico
highway 132 and Turner street, in Hobbs in Lea county;
67. one million one hundred fifty-four thousand
dollars ($1,154,000) to plan, design and construct utility
and road infrastructure for affordable housing projects in
Los Alamos in Los Alamos county;
68. three hundred thousand dollars ($300,000) to
plan, design, construct and improve Badger loop, also known
as Navajo route 9505, in the Mexican Springs chapter of the
Navajo Nation in McKinley county;
69. two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000) to

plan, design, construct and extend Hasler Valley road,

including bridge and drainage infrastructure, in McKinley

county;

70. five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) to

plan, design, construct and improve the Allison road

corridor, including utilities relocation, in Gallup in

McKinley county;

71. two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000)
SFC/SB 240
Page 214

to plan, design, construct and improve roads, including Lone
Pine drive and Cedar avenue, for the Red Lake chapter of the
Navajo Nation in McKinley county;
72. three hundred thousand dollars ($300,000) to
acquire rights of way for and to plan, design, construct and
improve the Francisco pond road bridge in the Rock Springs
chapter of the Navajo Nation in McKinley county;
73. seven hundred fifty thousand dollars
($750,000) to plan, design, construct and replace water and
sewer lines on mountaintop streets, including Sugar Pine
drive, Corona avenue and Maple drive, in Cloudcroft in Otero
county;
74. five hundred forty-five thousand dollars
($545,000) to acquire easements and rights of way for and to
plan, design and construct improvements to roads in Logan in
Quay county;
75. four hundred thousand dollars ($400,000) to

plan, design, construct, extend and improve Silkey way

between north Riverside drive and north McCurdy road in

Espanola in Rio Arriba county;

76. one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) to

plan, design and construct drainage improvements on Roosevelt

road Q 1/2 and Roosevelt road 7 for Portales in Roosevelt

county;

77. two hundred forty-three thousand dollars
SFC/SB 240
Page 215

($243,000) to plan, design and construct a helipad access
road for the Beclabito chapter of the Navajo Nation in San
Juan county;
78. two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000) to
plan, design and construct a pedestrian bridge and solar
street lighting at the junction of New Mexico highway 64 and
Navajo route 5031 in the Tse'Daa'Kaan chapter of the Navajo
Nation in San Juan county;
79. fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) to plan,
design, construct and install a box bridge off of county road
B43B to agricultural land for the acequia de los Seguras in
San Miguel county;
80. fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) to plan,
design, construct, repair and improve county road C43B,
including chip seal, from south San Ysidro to north San
Ysidro in San Miguel county;
81. four hundred thousand dollars ($400,000) to

plan, design, construct and replace asbestos-cement pipeline

for the Jemez Springs domestic water association in Sandoval

county;

82. two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000)

to plan, design, construct, repair and improve Ojo Encino

road, including pothole remediation, in Sandoval county;

83. two million fifteen thousand five hundred

dollars ($2,015,500) to plan, design and construct a landfill
SFC/SB 240
Page 216

access road near 29th avenue NW and Encino road in Sandoval
county;
84. one hundred seventy-three thousand three
hundred fifteen dollars ($173,315) to plan, design,
construct, repair and improve Coronado road, including
repavement and drainage, in Corrales in Sandoval county;
85. two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000) to
plan, design, construct and improve Reclining Acres road,
including striping and paving, in Corrales in Sandoval
county;
86. one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) to
plan, design and construct paseo del Volcan NE from Unser
boulevard to Rainbow boulevard in Rio Rancho in Sandoval
county;
87. one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000)
to plan, design and construct and renovate pedestrian curb
ramps for accessibility improvements in Rio Rancho in

Sandoval county;

88. fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) to purchase,

equip and install improvements, including intelligent

transportation systems and infrastructure, for Broadmoor

boulevard in Rio Rancho in Sandoval county;

89. four hundred ninety-seven thousand dollars

($497,000) to plan, design and construct Westside boulevard

SE median landscaping from A Park Above court to Wellspring
SFC/SB 240
Page 217

avenue in Rio Rancho in Sandoval county;
90. fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) to plan,
design, construct, repair and improve roads, including access
to the Placitas water system, in the San Antonio de las
Huertas land grant-merced in Sandoval county;
91. fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) to plan and
design drainage improvements near camino Torcido loop in the
La Cieneguilla community in Santa Fe county;
92. five hundred thirty-two thousand dollars
($532,000) to plan, design and construct an all-weather
crossing on county road 51 at the Galisteo river in Santa Fe
county;
93. two hundred eighty-three thousand dollars
($283,000) to plan, design, construct and improve the
New Mexico highway 14 Turquoise trail multi-use extension in
Santa Fe county;
94. one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) to

plan, design, construct, improve and extend a road noise

mitigation project on New Mexico highway 285 north of

Santa Fe in Santa Fe county;

95. one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000)

to plan, design and construct community gateway signs and

median islands in the Tesuque area in Santa Fe county;

96. five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) to

acquire easements and to plan, design, construct, repair and
SFC/SB 240
Page 218

improve Church street, including paving and drainage, in
Edgewood in Santa Fe county;
97. four hundred sixty thousand dollars ($460,000)
to plan, design, construct, improve and repair a bridge on
avenida Vista Grande in Eldorado in Santa Fe county;
98. four hundred thousand dollars ($400,000) to
plan, design and construct road improvements in the Eldorado
subdivision in Santa Fe county;
99. three hundred fifty thousand dollars
($350,000) to plan, design, construct and install phase 3
improvements to Tova Muusa Poe road, including utility
infrastructure, grading, drainage, paving and trenching, in
the Pueblo of Nambe in Santa Fe county;
100. six hundred fifty thousand dollars ($650,000)
to plan, design, construct and improve water, sewer and road
infrastructure for the north Ridgetop road housing
development in Santa Fe in Santa Fe county;

101. four hundred fifty thousand dollars

($450,000) to plan, design, construct, equip and improve

medians on arterials and collector roads in Santa Fe in

Santa Fe county;

102. three hundred seventy-five thousand dollars

($375,000) to plan, design and construct improvements to

Marie street from north Date street to Palo Verde street in

Truth or Consequences in Sierra county;
SFC/SB 240
Page 219

103. two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000) to
acquire easements and rights of way for and to plan, design,
construct and equip street improvements, including drainage
and flood control, in Williamsburg in Sierra county;
104. two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000)
to plan, design, construct and equip sewer mains along
Cuchilla road, including manholes, service lines and asphalt
patching, in the El Valle de los Ranchos water and sanitation
district in Taos county;
105. one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000)
to purchase road equipment and to plan, design, construct,
replace and improve roads, including streetlights, in
Estancia in Torrance county;
106. five hundred ten thousand dollars ($510,000)
to perform traffic studies on the west and central
interchanges on interstate 40 between mile posts 194 and 199
in Moriarty in Torrance county;

107. four hundred thousand dollars ($400,000) to

purchase and equip road equipment, including street sweepers,

and to plan, design, construct and improve roads in Clayton

in Union county;

108. fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) to plan,

design, construct and improve the Manzano expressway safety

corridor to schools on the east side, including street

lighting, in Valencia county;
SFC/SB 240
Page 220

109. fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) to plan,
design, construct and improve Meadowlake road, including
lighting, school zones, bike paths and sidewalks, in Valencia
county;
110. four hundred thousand dollars ($400,000) to
plan, design, construct and improve the intersection of Sun
Ranch Village road and New Mexico highway 6 in Los Lunas in
Valencia county;
111. five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) to
plan, design, construct and equip road improvements and flood
control systems in Peralta in Valencia county; and
112. one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) to
plan, design, construct, purchase and install street lighting
on United States highway 491 for the Bahast'lah chapter of
the Navajo Nation in McKinley county.
SECTION 54. EASTERN NEW MEXICO UNIVERSITY PROJECTS--
GENERAL FUND.--The following amounts are appropriated from

the general fund to the board of regents of eastern

New Mexico university for the following purposes:

1. one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) to

purchase, equip and install air conditioning system trainers

for the automotive technology program at the Roswell branch

campus of eastern New Mexico university in Chaves county;

2. fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) to purchase

and equip an aerial lift at the Roswell branch campus of
SFC/SB 240
Page 221

eastern New Mexico university in Chaves county;
3. sixty thousand dollars ($60,000) to purchase
and equip a forklift for the aviation maintenance program at
the Roswell branch campus of eastern New Mexico university in
Chaves county;
4. two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000)
to purchase, equip and install information technology at the
Roswell branch campus of eastern New Mexico university in
Chaves county;
5. fifty-seven thousand dollars ($57,000) to
purchase and equip a metal brake press for the welding and
agriculture mechanics technology programs at the Roswell
branch campus of eastern New Mexico university in Chaves
county;
6. fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) to purchase
and install biology laboratory equipment for science programs
at the Roswell branch campus of eastern New Mexico university

in Chaves county;

7. sixty-four thousand dollars ($64,000) to

purchase and equip a sewer jetter at the Roswell branch

campus of eastern New Mexico university in Chaves county;

8. one hundred twenty-five thousand dollars

($125,000) to purchase, equip and install an immersive

simulation room for health science programs at the Roswell

branch campus of eastern New Mexico university in Chaves
SFC/SB 240
Page 222

county;
9. fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) to purchase
and equip utility vehicles for the physical plant at the
Roswell branch campus at eastern New Mexico university in
Chaves county;
10. one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) to
purchase and equip meat processing equipment for an
agriculture program at the Ruidoso branch campus of eastern
New Mexico university in Lincoln county;
11. one hundred eighty thousand dollars ($180,000)
to purchase and equip vehicles and equipment, including a
pickup truck and a stock trailer, for the Ruidoso branch
campus of eastern New Mexico university in Lincoln county;
12. four hundred fifty thousand dollars ($450,000)
to purchase and equip agricultural vehicles and equipment,
including a utility tractor and trailer, a liquid sprayer, a
rotary tiller, a conservation seeder, a disk harrow and

agronomy and horticulture research equipment, at eastern

New Mexico university in Portales in Roosevelt county; and

13. three hundred thousand dollars ($300,000) to

purchase and equip vehicles for the department of public

safety at eastern New Mexico university in Portales in

Roosevelt county.

SECTION 55. NEW MEXICO HIGHLANDS UNIVERSITY PROJECTS--

GENERAL FUND.--The following amounts are appropriated from
SFC/SB 240
Page 223

the general fund to the board of regents of New Mexico
highlands university for the following purposes:
1. two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000)
to plan, design, demolish, remove, construct, equip and
improve the Leveo and Patricia Sanchez family stadium,
including tracks, football fields and soccer fields, at
New Mexico highlands university in Las Vegas in San Miguel
county;
2. fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) to plan,
design, construct, demolish, remove, improve and equip campus
safety infrastructure, including lockdown systems, cameras
and a security switchboard, at New Mexico highlands
university in Las Vegas in San Miguel county;
3. four hundred thousand dollars ($400,000) to
plan, design, construct, equip and improve the Gene Torres
golf course, including a youth golf area, irrigation systems,
fairways and greens, at New Mexico highlands university in

Las Vegas in San Miguel county;

4. fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) to plan,

design, construct, demolish, remove, renovate, replace,

purchase, equip and install information technology

infrastructure at New Mexico highlands university in Las

Vegas in San Miguel county;

5. one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) to

purchase instruments and equipment for the music department
SFC/SB 240
Page 224

at New Mexico highlands university in Las Vegas in San Miguel
county; and
6. one hundred eighty-five thousand dollars
($185,000) to plan, design, construct, install and equip
campus improvements, including electric vehicle charging
stations, solar infrastructure and removal of plastic turf,
at New Mexico highlands university in Las Vegas in San Miguel
county.
SECTION 56. NEW MEXICO INSTITUTE OF MINING AND
TECHNOLOGY PROJECTS--GENERAL FUND.--The following amounts are
appropriated from the general fund to the board of regents of
New Mexico institute of mining and technology for the
following purposes:
1. two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000) to
plan, design, construct, equip and improve classrooms,
laboratories and academic, research and outreach spaces at
New Mexico institute of mining and technology campuses in

Socorro, Hidalgo and Eddy counties;

2. one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000)

to purchase, repair, replace and upgrade equipment at

New Mexico institute of mining and technology campuses in

Socorro, Hidalgo and Eddy counties;

3. one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) to

plan, design, construct and equip accessibility improvements

to Altamirano hall at the New Mexico institute of mining and
SFC/SB 240
Page 225

technology in Socorro in Socorro county;
4. one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) to
purchase, equip and install lighting at athletic fields at
the New Mexico institute of mining and technology in Socorro
in Socorro county;
5. fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) to plan,
design, construct and repair the parking lot at the energetic
materials research and testing center at the New Mexico
institute of mining and technology in Socorro in Socorro
county; and
6. one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) to
plan, design, construct and improve the southwest campus
entrance, including signage and landscaping, at the
New Mexico institute of mining and technology in Socorro in
Socorro county.
SECTION 57. NEW MEXICO STATE UNIVERSITY PROJECTS--
GENERAL FUND.--The following amounts are appropriated from

the general fund to the board of regents of New Mexico state

university for the following purposes:

1. one million dollars ($1,000,000) for matching

funds for a water conservation program for the central Curry

soil and water conservation district in Curry county;

2. two hundred five thousand dollars ($205,000) to

purchase and equip precision agricultural research equipment,

including a tractor and a utility vehicle, at the New Mexico
SFC/SB 240
Page 226

state university agricultural science center in Clovis in
Curry county;
3. one million two hundred twenty-five thousand
dollars ($1,225,000) to plan, design, construct, renovate,
furnish and equip the press box at Aggie memorial stadium at
New Mexico state university in Las Cruces in Dona Ana county;
4. nine hundred twenty-five thousand dollars
($925,000) to plan, design and construct campus safety
improvements, including accessibility, at New Mexico state
university in Las Cruces in Dona Ana county;
5. seven hundred thousand dollars ($700,000) to
plan, design, construct, demolish, remove, equip and renovate
campus safety systems at New Mexico state university in Las
Cruces in Dona Ana county;
6. two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000)
to plan, design, construct, demolish, replace and improve the
New Mexico state university golf course in Las Cruces in Dona

Ana county;

7. three hundred thirty thousand dollars

($330,000) to plan, design, construct, furnish and equip a

multipurpose field for band, recreational and intramural use

at New Mexico state university in Las Cruces in Dona Ana

county;

8. five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) to

plan, design, construct and improve facility safety systems
SFC/SB 240
Page 227

at a child care center at New Mexico state university in Las
Cruces in Dona Ana county;
9. one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) to
plan, design and construct improvements, including life
safety systems, lighting, accessibility and spectator safety
features, at the Pan American center at New Mexico state
university in Las Cruces in Dona Ana county;
10. one hundred seventy thousand dollars
($170,000) to purchase and equip agricultural equipment,
including a vehicle and sprinkler systems, at the
agricultural science center at New Mexico state university in
Artesia in Eddy county;
11. fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) to purchase
and equip heavy equipment for the McKinley soil and water
conservation district in McKinley county;
12. fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) to purchase,
equip and install greenhouse research equipment and cooling

upgrades at the John T. Harrington forestry research center

at New Mexico state university in Mora in Mora county;

13. three hundred thousand dollars ($300,000) to

acquire land for and to plan, design, construct, furnish and

equip a facility for the southwestern Quay soil and water

conservation district in Quay county;

14. one hundred sixty-five thousand dollars

($165,000) to purchase, install and equip agricultural
SFC/SB 240
Page 228

equipment, including an excavator and a vehicle, for the
Rex E. Kirksey agricultural science center at New Mexico
state university in Tucumcari in Quay county;
15. one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) to
plan, design, construct and repair facilities for the east
Rio Arriba soil and water conservation district in Rio Arriba
county;
16. fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) to plan,
design, construct and renovate buildings and grounds,
including lighting, electricity, security cameras and
technology, heating, ventilation and air conditioning systems
and a parking lot, in the upper Chama soil and water
conservation district in Rio Arriba county;
17. fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) to purchase
and install agricultural equipment, including an irrigation
well and a vehicle, at the agricultural science center at the
Alcalde branch of New Mexico state university in Sandoval

county;

18. four hundred nine thousand dollars ($409,000)

to plan, design, construct, purchase and install a storage

structure for shade balls in the Roosevelt soil and water

conservation district in Roosevelt county;

19. two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000)

for removal of storm-damaged trees and debris and to plan,

design, construct, repair and improve access routes in Pena
SFC/SB 240
Page 229

Blanca for the Coronado soil and water conservation district
in Sandoval county;
20. thirty thousand dollars ($30,000) to plan,
design, construct, furnish, equip and improve an outdoor faux
wall on an administrative building for the central tri-county
soil and water conservation district in Torrance county;
21. eighty thousand dollars ($80,000) to plan,
design, construct, equip, replace and improve the roof on an
administrative building for the central tri-county soil and
water conservation district in Torrance county;
22. one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) to
purchase and equip vehicles and equipment, including a truck,
utility task vehicle and trailer, for the east Torrance soil
and water conservation district in Torrance county;
23. one hundred ninety thousand dollars ($190,000)
to purchase and install methane monitoring and backup power
equipment at the New Mexico state university livestock

research center in Clayton in Union county;

24. one hundred eighty-five thousand dollars

($185,000) to plan, design, construct and improve

accessibility at the Whitfield wildlife conservation area and

the visitors' and education center, including the front

entrance and the pedestrian stairway, for the Valencia soil

and water conservation district in Valencia county;

25. twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) to
SFC/SB 240
Page 230

purchase and equip an electric vehicle, including trailers
and tractor attachments, and to plan, design and construct an
electric vehicle charging station at the Whitfield wildlife
conservation area for the Valencia soil and water
conservation district in Valencia county;
26. two hundred forty-five thousand dollars
($245,000) to plan, design, construct and improve
infrastructure, including a workspace and storage container,
installation of solar panels and repair of the irrigation
system, at the Whitfield wildlife conservation area for the
Valencia soil and water conservation district in Valencia
county; and
27. three hundred fifty thousand dollars
($350,000) to purchase and equip agricultural equipment,
including a bale wagon, at the New Mexico state university
agricultural science center in Los Lunas in Valencia county.
SECTION 58. UNIVERSITY OF NEW MEXICO PROJECTS--GENERAL

FUND.--The following amounts are appropriated from the

general fund to the board of regents of the university of

New Mexico for the following purposes:

1. nine hundred thousand dollars ($900,000) to

plan, design, construct, relocate, renovate, equip and

furnish the accessibility resource center at the university

of New Mexico in Albuquerque in Bernalillo county;

2. two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000)
SFC/SB 240
Page 231

to plan, design, construct and improve campus lighting and
security infrastructure at the university of New Mexico in
Albuquerque in Bernalillo county;
3. four hundred thirty-five thousand dollars
($435,000) to purchase, equip and improve campus safety and
security systems, including the LoboLift ride service
program, at the university of New Mexico in Albuquerque in
Bernalillo county;
4. one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) to
purchase equipment for the pediatric emergency department of
the university of New Mexico children's hospital in
Albuquerque in Bernalillo county;
5. one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) to
purchase, install, replace and upgrade information
technology, including servers, at the university of
New Mexico in Albuquerque in Bernalillo county;
6. four hundred fifty thousand dollars ($450,000)

to plan, design, construct, repair, equip and improve

laboratory safety systems, including fume hoods, at the

university of New Mexico in Albuquerque in Bernalillo county;

7. one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) to

purchase, install and upgrade rain sensors for campus

irrigation systems at the university of New Mexico in

Albuquerque in Bernalillo county;

8. one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) to
SFC/SB 240
Page 232

plan, design, construct, furnish, equip and improve the law
center building at the university of New Mexico in
Albuquerque in Bernalillo county;
9. fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) to plan,
design, construct, repair, purchase, equip and improve
facilities at Popejoy hall at the university of New Mexico in
Albuquerque in Bernalillo county;
10. one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000)
to plan, design, construct, repair, renovate, purchase,
install, furnish and equip the quantum materials and
technologies laboratories at the center for high technology
materials at the university of New Mexico in Albuquerque in
Bernalillo county;
11. two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000)
to plan, design, construct, purchase, install, improve and
equip fire suppression systems in residential facilities at
the university of New Mexico in Albuquerque in Bernalillo

county;

12. one hundred twenty-five thousand dollars

($125,000) to purchase machinery and automotive components

for and to plan, design, construct and equip a formula-style

electric vehicle for the school of engineering at the

university of New Mexico in Albuquerque in Bernalillo county;

13. one million eleven thousand dollars

($1,011,000) to plan, design, construct, furnish, equip and
SFC/SB 240
Page 233

improve the softball clubhouse at the university of
New Mexico in Albuquerque in Bernalillo county;
14. two hundred twenty-five thousand dollars
($225,000) to plan, design, construct, purchase, equip and
install solar panels on the student union building at the
university of New Mexico in Albuquerque in Bernalillo county;
15. one hundred twenty-five thousand dollars
($125,000) to plan, design, construct, furnish, equip and
improve the stadium at the university of New Mexico in
Albuquerque in Bernalillo county;
16. one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) to
plan, design, construct, furnish, equip and install video
boards at athletic venues at the university of New Mexico in
Albuquerque in Bernalillo county;
17. one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000)
to plan, design, construct and replace the roof, including
gutters, on building 4 at the Los Alamos branch campus of the

university of New Mexico in Los Alamos county;

18. fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) to purchase

and install audiovisual equipment and information technology

for the auditorium at the Gallup branch campus of the

university of New Mexico in McKinley county;

19. twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) to

purchase and equip police vehicles at the Gallup branch

campus of the university of New Mexico in McKinley county;
SFC/SB 240
Page 234

20. two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000) to
plan, design, construct and renovate the center for creative
learning at the Harwood museum of art, including
accessibility improvements, in Taos in Taos county;
21. three hundred twenty-five thousand dollars
($325,000) to purchase and install equipment for a culinary
program at the Taos branch campus of the university of
New Mexico in Taos in Taos county;
22. four hundred thousand dollars ($400,000) to
plan, design, construct, purchase and install equipment,
including lifts and audiovisual systems, for the automotive
program at the Valencia branch campus of the university of
New Mexico in Valencia county; and
23. fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) to purchase,
equip and install audiovisual and projection systems for the
student community center at the Valencia branch campus of the
university of New Mexico in Valencia county.

SECTION 59. WESTERN NEW MEXICO UNIVERSITY PROJECTS--

GENERAL FUND.--The following amounts are appropriated from

the general fund to the board of regents of western

New Mexico university for the following purposes:

1. two hundred twenty thousand dollars ($220,000)

to plan, design, construct, replace, purchase, equip and

install irrigation infrastructure, including trenching,

valves, controllers, isolation points, collapsed and capped
SFC/SB 240
Page 235

systems and landscape restoration, at western New Mexico
university in Silver City in Grant county;
2. one hundred twenty thousand dollars ($120,000)
to purchase and equip an accessible van, including safety
equipment, for western New Mexico university in Silver City
in Grant county; and
3. one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) to
plan, design, construct, renovate, furnish and equip a
collaborative learning hub, including tutoring spaces,
modular study units, group rooms, technology-enabled
collaboration areas and support equipment, at western
New Mexico university in Silver City in Grant county.
SECTION 60. WORKFORCE SOLUTIONS DEPARTMENT PROJECT--
GENERAL FUND.--Twenty-six million five hundred seventy-five
thousand dollars ($26,575,000) is appropriated from the
general fund to the workforce solutions department for
housing and homelessness projects statewide.

SECTION 61. DEPARTMENT OF GAME AND FISH PROJECT--TRAIL

SAFETY FUND.--Five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) is

appropriated from the trail safety fund to the department of

game and fish for developments, restoration and improvements

to off-highway vehicle trails statewide.

SECTION 62. STATE LAND OFFICE PROJECT--STATE LANDS

MAINTENANCE FUND.--Seven hundred fifty thousand dollars

($750,000) is appropriated from the state lands maintenance
SFC/SB 240
Page 236

fund to the state land office to plan, design, construct,
furnish and equip improvements to the state land office
building in Santa Fe in Santa Fe county.
SECTION 63. DEPARTMENT OF GAME AND FISH PROJECT--SIKES
ACT ACCOUNT OF THE GAME PROTECTION FUND.--Two million five
hundred thousand dollars ($2,500,000) is appropriated from
the Sikes Act account of the game protection fund to the
department of game and fish for wildfire and riparian habitat
restoration and for improvements at properties owned by the
state game commission statewide.
SECTION 64. PUBLIC EDUCATION DEPARTMENT PROJECTS--
PUBLIC SCHOOL CAPITAL OUTLAY FUND.--The following amounts are
appropriated from the public school capital outlay fund to
the public education department for the following purposes:
1. four hundred thirty-five thousand dollars
($435,000) to purchase cameras and school buses statewide;
and

2. eighteen million eight hundred eighty thousand

dollars ($18,880,000) to purchase district-owned school buses

statewide.

SECTION 65. MINERS' HOSPITAL PROJECT--MINERS' TRUST

FUND.--One million five hundred thousand dollars ($1,500,000)

is appropriated from the miners' trust fund to the miners'

Colfax medical center to acquire and install medical and

other equipment and to plan, design, construct, furnish and
SFC/SB 240
Page 237

equip facility improvements for the miners' Colfax medical
center hospital and long-term care facility in Raton in
Colfax county.
SECTION 66. DEPARTMENT OF GAME AND FISH PROJECT--
HABITAT MANAGEMENT FUND.--Two million dollars ($2,000,000) is
appropriated from the habitat management fund to the
department of game and fish for wildfire and riparian habitat
restoration and for improvements at properties owned by the
state game commission statewide.
SECTION 67. INDIAN AFFAIRS DEPARTMENT PROJECT--CAPITAL
DEVELOPMENT PROGRAM FUND.--One million fifty thousand dollars
($1,050,000) is appropriated from the capital development
program fund to the Indian affairs department to plan,
design, construct, equip and furnish a convenience station at
the Roadrunner recreational vehicle park in the Pueblo of
Pojoaque in Santa Fe county.
SECTION 68. LOCAL GOVERNMENT DIVISION OF THE DEPARTMENT

OF FINANCE AND ADMINISTRATION PROJECTS--CAPITAL DEVELOPMENT

PROGRAM FUND.--The following amounts are appropriated from

the capital development program fund to the local government

division of the department of finance and administration for

the following purposes:

1. one million three hundred seventy thousand

dollars ($1,370,000) to plan, design, construct, furnish and

equip a fire station in Grants in Cibola county;
SFC/SB 240
Page 238

2. four million eight hundred forty thousand
dollars ($4,840,000) to plan, design, construct, renovate,
equip and furnish the Amador hotel in Las Cruces in Dona Ana
county;
3. four hundred thirty thousand dollars ($430,000)
to plan, design, construct and improve electrical systems for
the fire department and Shuler theater buildings in Raton in
Colfax county;
4. two million nine hundred sixty thousand dollars
($2,960,000) to plan, design, construct, furnish and equip an
animal shelter in Clovis in Curry county;
5. one million six hundred fifty thousand dollars
($1,650,000) to plan, design, construct, renovate, expand,
equip and furnish a fleet maintenance facility in Rio Rancho
in Sandoval county;
6. two million two hundred thousand dollars
($2,200,000) to plan, design, construct, equip and furnish an

emergency operations center in Truth or Consequences in

Sierra county; and

7. two million four hundred eighty thousand

dollars ($2,480,000) to plan, design and construct a county

administration building and district attorney's office in Los

Lunas in Valencia county.

SECTION 69. DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION PROJECTS--

CAPITAL DEVELOPMENT PROGRAM FUND.--The following amounts are
SFC/SB 240
Page 239

appropriated from the capital development program fund to the
department of transportation for the following purposes:
1. seven hundred fifty thousand dollars ($750,000)
to plan, design, construct and equip roadway and drainage
improvements in Bayard in Grant county;
2. nine hundred sixty thousand dollars ($960,000)
to plan, design, construct and equip road and drainage
improvements in Hurley in Grant county;
3. nine hundred forty thousand dollars ($940,000)
to plan, design and construct road and drainage improvements
in Santa Clara in Grant county;
4. one million five hundred forty thousand dollars
($1,540,000) to plan, design and construct improvements to
Coal avenue, including alleys, in Gallup in McKinley county;
5. four million seven hundred ten thousand dollars
($4,710,000) to plan, design, construct, repair, replace and
improve Bergin lane in Bloomfield in San Juan county; and

6. three hundred fifty thousand dollars ($350,000)

to plan, design, construct and equip a low-water crossing

structure at the San Ysidro crossing on the Santa Fe river in

Santa Fe in Santa Fe county.

SECTION 70. CAPITAL PROGRAM FUND PROJECTS--PUBLIC

SCHOOL CAPITAL OUTLAY FUND.--The following amounts are

appropriated from the public school capital outlay fund to

the capital program fund for the following purposes:
SFC/SB 240
Page 240

1. ten million dollars ($10,000,000) for
expenditure in fiscal years 2026 through 2030 to construct,
furnish and equip a literacy institute in Albuquerque in
Bernalillo county; and
2. ten million dollars ($10,000,000) to design,
construct, furnish and equip a science, technology,
engineering and mathematics institute in Albuquerque in
Bernalillo county.
SECTION 71. CAPITAL PROGRAM FUND PROJECTS--CAPITOL
BUILDINGS REPAIR FUND.--The following amounts are
appropriated from the capitol buildings repair fund to the
capital program fund for the following purposes:
1. one million five hundred thousand dollars
($1,500,000) to plan, design, construct, renovate, furnish
and equip improvements to the John F. Simms building in
Santa Fe in Santa Fe county;
2. four million dollars ($4,000,000) to plan,

design, construct, furnish and equip improvements to the

Phillip Gonzales building for the public regulation

commission in Santa Fe in Santa Fe county; and

3. five million dollars ($5,000,000) to plan,

design, construct, furnish and equip improvements to

state-owned facilities statewide.

SECTION 72. DEPARTMENT OF GAME AND FISH PROJECT--BIG

GAME ENHANCEMENT ACCOUNT OF GAME PROTECTION FUND.--Two
SFC/SB 240
Page 241

million five hundred thousand dollars ($2,500,000) is
appropriated from the big game enhancement account of the
game protection fund to the department of game and fish for
wildfire and riparian habitat restoration and for
improvements at properties owned by the state game commission
statewide.
SECTION 73. A new section of the Severance Tax Bonding
Act is enacted to read:
"SUPPLEMENTAL SEVERANCE TAX BONDS--UNIVERSITY OF
NEW MEXICO SCHOOL OF MEDICINE.--
A. The state board of finance shall issue and sell
supplemental severance tax bonds in an amount not exceeding a
total of two hundred eighty million dollars ($280,000,000) in
fiscal years 2026 through 2029 when the board of regents of
the university of New Mexico certifies the need for the
issuance of bonds to plan, design, construct, equip, furnish
and landscape a new school of medicine; provided that the

total issuance of supplemental severance tax bonds in fiscal

years 2026 through 2029 shall not exceed the debt service

limitations provided for in Subsection D of Section 7-27-14

NMSA 1978. The proceeds from the sales of the bonds are

appropriated to the board of regents of the university of

New Mexico for the purposes enumerated in this subsection.

B. The state board of finance shall schedule the

issuance and sale of the bonds in the most expeditious and
SFC/SB 240
Page 242

economical manner possible upon a finding of the board that
the project has been developed sufficiently to justify the
issuance and that the project can proceed to contract and
completion within a reasonable time. The state board of
finance shall further take appropriate steps necessary to
comply with the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as
applicable."
SECTION 74. Section 7-27-12 NMSA 1978 (being Laws 1961,
Chapter 5, Section 10, as amended) is amended to read:
"7-27-12. WHEN SEVERANCE TAX BONDS TO BE ISSUED.--
A. The state board of finance shall issue and sell
all severance tax bonds when authorized to do so by any law
that sets out the amount of the issue and the recipient of
the money.
B. The state board of finance shall also issue and
sell severance tax bonds authorized by Sections 72-14-36
through 72-14-42 NMSA 1978, and such authority as has been

given to the interstate stream commission to issue and sell

such bonds is transferred to the state board of finance. The

state board of finance shall issue and sell all severance tax

bonds only when so instructed by resolution of the governing

body or by written direction from an authorized officer of

the recipient of the bond money.

C. Except as provided in Section 73 of this 2026

act, proceeds from supplemental severance tax bonds shall be
SFC/SB 240
Page 243

used only for public school capital outlay projects pursuant
to the Public School Capital Outlay Act or the Public School
Capital Improvements Act or for education technology
infrastructure projects pursuant to the Broadband Access and
Expansion Act.
D. Except as provided in Section 73 of this 2026
act, the state board of finance shall issue and sell
supplemental severance tax bonds when so instructed by
resolution of the public school capital outlay council
pursuant to Section 7-27-12.2 NMSA 1978 or by certification
by the director of the office of broadband access and
expansion pursuant to Section 7-27-12.6 NMSA 1978."
SECTION 75. TEMPORARY PROVISION--TRIBAL INFRASTRUCTURE
BOARD--FUNDING SUFFICIENT TO COMPLETE PROJECTS.--For fiscal
years 2026 and 2027, the tribal infrastructure board shall
provide up to fifteen percent of available annual funds for
any single project. The board shall make every effort to

award funding to qualifying projects in amounts sufficient to

complete funding for the projects, after accounting for other

funding already secured for those projects.

SECTION 76. PROJECT SCOPE--EXPENDITURES.--If an

appropriation for a project authorized in this act is not

sufficient to complete all the purposes specified, the

appropriation may be expended for any portion of the purposes

specified in the appropriation. Expenditures shall not be
SFC/SB 240
Page 244

made for purposes other than those specified in the
appropriation.
SECTION 77. ART IN PUBLIC PLACES.--Pursuant to Section
13-4A-4 NMSA 1978 and where applicable, the appropriations
authorized in this act include one percent for the art in
public places fund.
SECTION 78. EMERGENCY.--It is necessary for the public
peace, health and safety that this act take effect
immediately. SFC/SB 240
Page 245